_	Japanese Imperial scholars such as Ryuzo Torii and Ogasawara Shōzō’ advocated the position that Korean and Japanese folk traditions shared a common, shamanic link, which bolstered Imperial Japanese claims about the legitimacy of the Korean occupation.
_	This is no different from FEBC unless ERBC differentiates itself from FEBC by declaring that it does not take the position that the original language Scriptures in Hebrew, Aramaic and Greek underlying the KJV are perfect (i.e. ERBC believes that the Hebrew Masoretic Text and the Greek TR underlying the KJV contain mistakes).
_	Khawaja Shahudin took the position that he is interested in the world hereafter and want someone who could lead him in the path of Allah.
_	Nepalese leaders asserted the position that as per the UN charter, transit privileges were "a fundamental and a permanent right of a land-locked country" and thus India's demand for a single treaty was unacceptable.
_	After the start of the 20th century, church leaders openly took the position that the doctrine should no longer to be taught publicly.
_	However, Hilary Putnam, the originator of functionalism, has also adopted the position that the mind–body problem is an illusory problem which should be dissolved according to the manner of Wittgenstein.
_	According to an analysis by Walid El-Malik in 1993, only the Maliki school took the position that all kinds of natural resources are state-owned; the Hanafi school took the opposite view and held that mineral ownership followed surface ownership, while the other two schools, Shafi'i and Hanbali, drew a distinction between "hidden" and "unhidden" minerals.
_	The psychologist James Hillman writes that Neumann's identification of consciousness with the "heroic-Apollonic mode" forced him into the position that consciousness is masculine even in woman, which Hillman finds absurd.
_	France maintained the position that it did not approve post-war expulsions and that therefore it was not responsible to accommodate and nourish the destitute expellees in its zone.
_	The Ottoman Empire wanted to remove the threat of Armenian resistance and the Turkish authorities today hold the position that the deaths incurred by Armenians as a whole were the result of the turmoil of World War I and that the Ottoman Empire was fighting against Russia, Armenian volunteer units, and the Armenian militia.
_	He called for federalist politicians to reject this strategy, and approach future constitutional talks from the position that "Quebec separatists are the problem and they need to be fixed".
_	The sisters are not very bright and are power-hungry and resentful, believing that Countess Gertrude holds the position that they rightfully deserve.
_	Schelling told Weinberg shortly after accepting the position that he believed the senior government leaders were incredibly unprepared to deal with making important decisions, should one of the strategies realistically happen.
_	Additionally, he restated the position that when Egypt does become a democratic nation and that "there is no reason to believe that a democracy in Egypt would not lead to a better relationship with the US based on respect and equity."
_	In the subsequent president's administration, U.S. officials took the position that the sanctions could be lifted if Iraq complied with "all" of the UN resolutions it was violating, not just with UN weapons inspections.
_	This matter had been tenaciously discussed at the 1919 Berlin Conference, with the Russian delegate, Lazar Shatskin, advancing the position that the various national youth groups should be under the immediate direction and control of the corresponding adult parties.
_	The brief characterized the theory of brainwashing as not scientifically proven and advanced the position that "commitment to advancing the appropriate use of psychological testimony in the courts carries with it the concomitant duty to be vigilant against those who would use purportedly expert testimony lacking scientific and methodological rigor."
_	The NAACP held the position that it would perpetuate the continual discrimination and neglect of the public schools for black people.
_	Some Christians, such as Apostolic-Prophetic Movement Christian minister and author Bill Hamon, put forward the position that rhema are a process within Christian epistemology.
_	In the traditional view of socialism, thinkers including Fredrick Engels and Saint-Simon took the position that the state will change in nature in a socialist society, with the function of the state changing from one of "political rule" over people into a scientific administration of the processes of production.
_	There are a few philosophers who argue for what could be considered a partial nihilism, or what has been called quasi-nihilism, which is the position that only objects of a certain kind have parts.
_	They took the position that the decision fell far short of what Kenyans were expecting.
_	Less controversial than the position that Thales learnt Babylonian mathematics is the claim he was influenced by Egyptians.
_	Added to this was the position that his progressivism more closely reflected the interests and views of voters in District 52.
_	This move is attested by the large discrepancy in the position that Tacitus puts them, relative to where Ovid had earlier put them.
_	That raised the issue of how well the professional military reflected overall American society and values; the soldiers typically took the position that their service represented the highest and best American values.
_	In contrast, feminist Susan Brownmiller in her book "Femininity" (1984) took the position that women without bras shock and anger men because men "implicitly think that they own breasts and that only they should remove bras."
_	Perverted-Justice takes the position that it has precautions in place to thwart the entrapment issue.
_	He has long taken the position that the financial models in use by major institutions are insufficiently conservative.
_	The FIS has maintained its control over the Olympics, giving credence to the position that snowboarding is a discipline of skiing and not its own, individual sport.
_	He has taken the position that Latin America’s own ideological structures have prevented the area's most progressive intellectuals from grasping their own reality.
_	With great enthusiasm we learned that Hellas was finally forced to take up arms in order to gain her freedom and the position that she once held among the nations of the world.
_	In addition to demanding that the authorities comply with the law, Chalidze also adhered to the position that the dissidents, too, must obey the law.
_	Some scholars have advanced the position that the resolution was passed as a non-binding Chapter VI recommendation.
_	‘B’ Company was to be kept in reserve and hold the position that ‘A’ Company took on the 6th.
_	Meanwhile, in Nuremberg, when the St. Sebaldus Church organist Georg Caspar Wecker (and his possible former teacher) died on 20 April 1695, the city authorities were so anxious to appoint Pachelbel (then a famous Nuremberger) to the position that they officially invited him to assume it without holding the usual job examination or inviting applications from prominent organists from lesser churches.
_	Accounts by Clement Mansfield Ingleby in 1859 and George Dawson in 1888 took the position that the father was responsible for the forgeries and the son's "Confession" was a tissue of lies.
_	The State Department has taken the position that the Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties represents established law.
_	A number of other states took the position that flag state responsibility for IUU fishing should take the form of a general responsibility to perform due diligence with respect to vessels and their activities, rather than an obligation to assist in prosecutions or another more substantive requirement.
_	The Hispanics Across America advocacy group wants Clemente's number set aside the way the late Robinson's No. 42 was in 1997, but Sharon Robinson maintained the position that such an honor should remain in place for Jackie Robinson only.
_	The hosts took the position that yellow rain was unlikely to have been a chemical agent.
_	Maher concludes the book with his analysis of how the United States has behaved in comparison to other superpowers in the past, and pushes the position that the US would have acted "better" than any other nation in such a position of power.
_	U2 were cast in the role of the band's guardian angels, watching over the position that corresponds to their instrument in U2.
_	Planned Parenthood also takes the position that laws requiring parental notification before an abortion can be performed on a minor are unconstitutional on privacy grounds.
_	He participated at the International Socialist Congress in Copenhagen the same year and gave an important speech criticizing the position that Austrian social-democrats took on the national issue, especially the Austro-Hungarian annexation of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
_	The Monkman team persevered with their lobbying of the federal and provincial governments, maintaining the position that all such projects were worthy of support.
_	Since then KeepVault has taken the position that unlimited plans are unsustainable.
_	His claims were, however, disputed by Hoare in a subsequent response to his defense, concluding ""It is dangerous to both Croatia and Bosnia-Hercegovina for someone holding such views, and with such poor analytical judgement and grasp of reality, to occupy the position that he does."".
_	The Turkish government, in advance of the anniversary of 100 years from the genocide at 2015, has reverted to the position that the matter should be subject to further study by historians, sponsoring the website www.lethistorydecide.org.
_	By the time of Young's death, he had taken the position that all boys needed some priesthood experience and that they should receive the Aaronic priesthood before reaching adulthood.
_	Although little actually changed from the position that Henry took early in the dispute – he was still able to appoint his own choices as bishops, as well as enjoying many of the rights
_	In the 1890s Gilder and his editors took the position that labor unions were a foreign imposition, one of the many negative consequences of a relatively open immigration policy.
_	The Mayor of London, then Boris Johnson, took the position that London needs more airport capacity, favouring the construction of an entirely new airport in the Thames Estuary rather than expanding Heathrow.
_	The slant of the face will vary according to the position that the stick is used for.
_	Their explicit goal was judicial economy through the rejection, as a matter of law, of the position that consumer welfare can be harmed if manufacturers of complex durable equipment are allowed to recover monopoly profits in aftermarkets (like service or software) of their products.
_	"Desenlace" was focused on politics; the work by no means endorsed violence, the position that Llauder was to maintain through all later life.
_	Rich took the position that it broke new ground and that special deference should be given his views because of his relation to the process as draftsman of the bill.
_	Radical behaviorism inherits from behaviorism the position that the science of behavior is a natural science, a belief that animal behavior can be studied profitably and compared with human behavior, a strong emphasis on the environment as cause of behavior, and an emphasis on the operations involved in the modification of behavior.
_	King came to agree with the position that only personality is real.
_	Kaypakkaya also took the position that there is a national question involved with the Kurdish people.
_	Opposition to the constitutional changes was led by the New Democratic Party (NDP), which held the position that the proposed constitution would neither reduce the power of the prime minister nor strengthen the country's democracy.
_	Being in the position that he is, he would have most likely have been present when the Dust Men staged a coup in an attempt to rescue their leader, Alden Tate.
_	Bahnsen was critical of ""hedonistic"" pessimism - the position that the pains of the world outnumber it's pleasures in quality and quantity.
_	In February 2015, Rubio took the position that the United States Department of Veterans Affairs was "simply buckling under the weight of its own bureaucracy", and he endorsed their proposal to open veterans' care to private providers.
_	Under increasingly immense pressure to resign, Agnew took the position that a sitting vice president could not be indicted and met with Speaker of the House Carl Albert on September 25, asking for an investigation.
_	Molotov took the position that he could not take a "definite stand" on this without Stalin's agreement.
_	'Palm to palm' is the position that results when the handcuffs are applied in front of the body, with the palms of the hands facing each other.
_	'Back to back' is the position that results when the handcuffs are applied with the hands behind the body, with the backs of the hands facing each other.
_	Damages in tort are generally awarded to place the claimant in the position that would have been taken had the tort not taken place.
_	The gay rights activist Dennis Altman, writing in "The Homosexualization of America" (1982), described Foucault's work as representative of the position that homosexuals emerged as a social category in 18th and 19th century western Europe.
_	The Bureau of Consumer Protection has traditionally taken the position that as long as consumers are provided with notice through company privacy policies, collection and use of consumer data is acceptable, and that the Bureau should only intervene when a company’s information practices cause concrete, economic harm to consumers.
_	The Jockey Club has taken the position that it will not allow cloned Thoroughbreds to be registered in the "American Stud Book", making it impossible for such horses to compete in most races.
_	The Catholic Church has consistently taken the position that, while dissolution of a valid natural marriage, even if consummated, may be granted for the sake of someone's Christian faith (""in favorem fidei""), though not for other reasons, and that a valid sacramental marriage, if not consummated, may be dissolved, a valid sacramental consummated marriage is indissoluble.
_	The "moderns" (epitomised by Bernard le Bovier de Fontenelle) took the position that the modern age of science and reason was superior to the superstitious and limited world of Greece and Rome.
_	Zwingli began preaching his version of reform, with certain points as the aforementioned doctrine of justification, but others (with which Luther vehemently disagreed) such as the position that veneration of icons was actually idolatry and thus a violation of the first commandment, and the denial of the real presence in the Eucharist.
_	Straight officials took the position that drug use in all forms is harmful and requires treatment.
_	Molotov took the position that he could not take a "definite stand" on this without Stalin's agreement.
_	In 1987, he led the ACLU's lawsuit against the President's Commission on the HIV Epidemic's hearings, in which he defended the position that the commission's makeup was not representative of the group of people actually affected by AIDS.
_	Benjamin, in his speeches in the Senate, took the position that the Union was a compact by the states from which any of them could secede.
_	Palestine as a state is not recognised by Israel and countries of North America, Europe Union, Australia, besides others, though these countries generally support a two-state solution to the Israeli–Palestinian conflict, taking the position that the establishment of this state can only be determined through direct negotiations between Israel and the PNA.
_	Kecmanović (1963) takes the position that Hörmann and Kállay pursued the policy of inventing an "artificial" Bosnian identity to aid Austria-Hungary in Cathlocicising the region, which first required Serbian "denationalisation".
_	Although protests led to the repeal of the Stamp and Townshend Acts, Parliament adhered to the position that it had the right to legislate for the colonies "in all cases whatsoever" in the Declaratory Act of 1766.
_	Third, other courts and commentators have taken the position that windfalls, including found monies, were properly includable in gross income under Section 22(a) of the 1939 Code, which is the predecessor of Section 61(a) in the 1954/1986 Code.
_	Miguel moved to S.L. Benfica in the 2000 summer, making the transition to right midfielder and then right back (by the hand of former Benfica player Fernando Chalana, in his only game as a transition coach) – the position that ultimately brought him international recognition.
_	The court explained, "The Supreme Court's broad statement of the law of patent exhaustion simply cannot be squared with the position that the "Quanta" holding is limited to its specific facts.
_	As the distinction between the overall corporation and the magazine operation grew, the position that had been "Group Vice President, Magazines" or "Executive Vice President, Magazines" became president and chief executive of a "magazine group" in 1985 (under Kelso F. Sutton to 1986,and then Reginald K. Brack Jr.) and then became president and CEO of a newly incorporated subsidiary,"The Time Inc. Magazine Company" in 1988 (initially with John A. Meyers as chairman).
_	The Susan B. Anthony List takes the position that the health care legislation allows for taxpayer-funded abortion, a claim which was ruled by a judge to be factually incorrect.
_	At a December 2011 campaign event, Gingrich took the position that waterboarding was technically not torture but that it should be used only at the direction of the president and in extraordinary circumstances.
_	The thing which appeared to save Eisenstein's career at this point was that Stalin ended up taking the position that the "Bezhin Meadow" catastrophe, along with several other problems facing the industry at that point, had less to do with Eisenstein's approach to filmmaking as with the executives who were supposed to have been supervising him.
_	"Third, given the fact that Congress has enacted specific legislation responsive to the concerns that gave rise to these cases, the principal beneficiaries of the Court's dramatic retreat from the position that federal prosecutors and federal courts have maintained throughout the history of this important statute will certainly be the class of professional criminals whose conduct persuaded Congress that the public needed federal protection from extortion."
_	The categories they used were contingent on the position that the athlete played.
_	Theological noncognitivism is the position that religious language – specifically, words such as "God" – are not cognitively meaningful.
_	De los Ríos, Teodomiro Menéndez, Indalecio Prieto, Gabriel Morón, Miguel Mora Requejo and others took the position that the PSOE should work with other republicans in taking action against the dictatorship, although the majority in the party was opposed to such an alliance.
_	In a few cases, state courts took the position that their judgments were final and were not subject to review by the Supreme Court.
_	In more severe cases, this reaction results in strong tetanic contractions of the agonist and antagonist muscles, causing an uncontrolled stiffness that may cause the goat to remain “frozen” in the position that it was in previous to the attack, or cause it to fall to the ground on its side.
_	Cicero then inserts himself into the discussion, maintaining the position that the pursuit of philosophy is the most important endeavor.
_	Susan Brownmiller in her book "Femininity" (1984) took the position that women without bras shock and anger men because men "implicitly think that they own breasts and that only they should remove bras."
_	Despite being a working woman, Gooding was of the position that women did not need suffrage.
_	In 1993 in a statement delivered at the World Conference on Human Rights, the Minister for Foreign Affairs Wong Kan Seng took the position that "order and stability are essential for development" as economic growth requires a stable legal environment protective of contractual and property rights.
_	They rejected the position that the scene had been staged, but when Enderlin's voiceover said Muhammad was dead, Enderlin "had no possibility of determining that he was in fact dead, and even less so, that he had been shot by IDF soldiers."
_	In 2010, RadioGraphics - a publication of the Radiological Society of North America that serves to provide continuing medical education to radiologists - published an article series taking the position that Neurography has an important role in the evaluation of entrapment neuropathies.
_	In it, the authors took the position that the education system was an alien collectivist (socialist) philosophy, much of which came from Europe, crashed onto the shores of our nation, bringing with it radical changes in economics, politics, and education, funded—surprisingly enough—by several wealthy American families and their tax-exempt foundations.
_	In the spring of 1775, Adams took the position that each state should call a special convention to write a constitution and then submit it to a popular vote.
_	She took the position that all women were capable of humility, diligence and moral rectitude, and that duly educated all women could become worthy residents of the imaginary "City of Ladies".
_	Related to the Great Western Railway, it was expected to achieve the position that was ultimately secured by the Cunard Line.
_	In this environment, Zwingli began preaching his version of reform, with certain points as the aforementioned doctrine of justification, but others (with which Luther vehemently disagreed) such as the position that veneration of icons was actually idolatry and thus a violation of the first commandment, and the denial of the real presence in the Eucharist.
_	Benjamin applied to the king to retain the position that his father had occupied in the Louvre Galleries, and on 7 June 1762 this was granted to him, and he thus assumed his father's job as medallist to the King.
_	Officially, the Saudi government took the position that it would not aggressively retake the mosque, but rather starve out the militants.
_	Agnostics generally hold the position that like the existence of God, the existence of supernatural phenomena, such as souls or life after death, is unverifiable and therefore unknowable.
_	Although Ariovistus assured Caesar that the Aedui hostages would be safe as long as they continued their yearly tribute, he took the position that he and the Romans were both conquerors and that Rome had no jurisdiction over his actions.
_	While positivists believe that research is or can be value-free or value-neutral, postpositivists take the position that bias is undesired but inevitable, and therefore the investigator must work to detect and try to correct it.
_	He supported the position that the Peruvian economy depended on the export of precious metals.
_	Aša occupies the position that other texts assign to Mithra, who is traditionally identified with fairness.
_	Singer told CBC's "The Fifth Estate" in 2006 that he stood by the position that the EPA had "cooked the data" to show that second-hand smoke causes lung cancer.
_	Similarly, Montreal Expos fans have taken little or no interest in the achievements of Nationals players, and some Expos fans strongly oppose the inclusion of former Expos in the Ring, taking the position that to do so is to co-opt the history of the Expos, which they say belongs solely in Montreal.
_	Nearing the end of the season, they played Liverpool away at Anfield with both teams in the position that to win every remaining game would mean winning the league.
_	However, the solicitor to the Audit Commission, Tony Child, advised the Commission that, contrary to the opinions of the two barristers, the district auditors should take the position that "all" derivatives contracts with local authorities were unlawful.
_	Also in Central Rook when the gold cannot move to the position that the rook is on.
_	After the clash in 1555 between Pfeffinger (who in his "Propositiones de libero arbitrio" had held closely to the formula of Melanchthon) and Amsdorf and Flacius, Strigel went deeper into the matter in 1559 and insisted that grace worked upon sinful men as upon personalities, not natural objects without a will; and that in the position that there was a spontaneous cooperation of human powers released by grace there was an actual lapse into the Roman Catholic view.
_	He told Castro, "You know that not only in these letters but today also, we hold to the position that you will keep all the weapons and all the military specialists with the exception of the 'offensive' weapons and associated service personnel, which were promised to be withdrawn in Khrushchev's letter [of October 27]."
_	The group now takes the position that the terms 'left-' and 'right-wing' no longer carry any meaning.
_	"Logical pluralism" can be defined a number of ways: the position that there is more than one correct account of logical consequence (or no single, 'correct' account at all), that there is more than once correct set of logical constants or even that the 'correct' logic depends on the relevant logical questions under consideration (a sort of logical instrumentalism).
_	On this basis, the staff took the position that Kinder Surprise was in violation of the small parts regulation and should be banned from importation into the US.
_	The Browns and the NFL now both support the position that the team was indeed named after Paul Brown.
_	It also argued that in any case it should only be liable for loss by comparison with the position that AIB would be in if Mark Redler had done what it should (registering the first charge) that around £275,000.
_	In his book "Statistics As Principled Argument", Robert P. Abelson articulates the position that statistics serves as a standardized means of settling disputes between scientists who could otherwise each argue the merits of their own positions "ad infinitum".
_	On March 7, 2007, however, the Michigan Civil Rights Commission, which had previously fought against Proposal 2, issued a report at the behest of the Governor, taking the position that Proposal 2 did not eliminate "all" affirmative action.
_	In his later years, he had repeatedly expressed the position that what Marx called the European proletariat no longer existed, and the wealthy West sorely needed to help developing countries to overcome widespread poverty through large monetary gifts similar to the Marshall Plan.
_	However, the court sided with the United States government on the position that the final determination of facts of the case (specifically, whether the appellant had relatives in the United States, and whether she would be able to support herself financially) was to be made by the immigration authorities.
_	In view of the position that ancient peoples migrated from the north into Mexico and Central America, the linking of Mesoamerican artifacts with “ancient inhabitants ...of ...the Book of Mormon” is not inconsistent with Joseph Smith's statements placing Book of Mormon lands in northern America.
_	For the matters discussed in this section, Socialist Studies generally adopts the position that anyone who does not hold their interpretation cannot be regarded as a true socialist.
_	The parties also differed on practical details: the City took the position that promotions would be made according to Civil Service requirements, the CIO took the position that seniority provisions would still govern.
_	The George W. Bush administration took the position that the Geneva Conventions do not apply to unlawful combatants, saying they apply to soldiers serving in the armies of nation states and not terrorist organizations such as Al-Qaeda.
_	They see the traditions of autocracy and patrimonialism as dominating Russia's political culture for centuries; for example, Stephen White is described as "the most consistent" defender of the position that the uniqueness of Russian political heritage is inseparable from its ethnic identity.
_	The academy takes the position that parents should make the final decision about circumcision, after appropriate information is gathered about the risks and benefits of the procedure.
_	After the printing became common, publishers took the position that having purchased a work from an author, the right to control its publication continued permanently.
_	The declaration also stated the ambition to break what it termed "the siege" on the resistance in Iraq, called on neighbouring countries to support "the legitimate Iraqi resistance", and took the position that the Iraqi resistance is "the sole representative of the Iraqi People".
_	The table shows the position that Greece held in December of each year (and the current position as of 2013), as well as the highest and lowest positions annually.
_	Crucé took the position that wars were the result of international misunderstandings and the domination of society by the warrior class, both of which could be reduced through commerce which brought people together.
_	The League took the position that it was not their role, but the role of member states, to deal with equality between men and women.
_	Clearance delivery is the position that issues route clearances to aircraft, typically before they commence taxiing.
_	Flight data (which is routinely combined with clearance delivery) is the position that is responsible for ensuring that both controllers and pilots have the most current information: pertinent weather changes, outages, airport ground delays/ground stops, runway closures, etc.
_	For example, they continued to hold the position that the Soviet Union was a "state capitalist" society.
_	He took the position that “industrialists had the right to occupy their positions only till such time as workers, organized into new syndicates, had mastered the requisite competence to take command.”
_	He is noted for his advocacy of a textualist reading of the United States Constitution and of the position that the liberties guaranteed in the Bill of Rights were imposed on the states ("incorporated") by the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	The Electronic Frontier Foundation said that his agenda was "ambitious and impressive" and that if President Barack Obama granted him the position that it would be an excellent step toward fulfilling his promise to introduce "an unprecedented level of openness in Government."
_	Some hold the position that a blues dance that does not possess the stylistic, aesthetic and rhythmic qualities of Africanist dance cannot qualify as blues dance.
_	On January 13, 2016, Volf and Qureshi debated the topic "Do Muslims and Christians worship the same God?" on an episode of "Seeking Truth with Julie Roys" with Volf arguing the position that they worship the same God and Qureshi arguing the position that they do not.
_	In the general election, he took the position that there was plenty of money in Richmond if adequately prioritized for transportation and pledged to cut waste from the state government, opposing tax increases for transportation improvements, such as funding for adding lanes to Interstate 95 or additional cars for the Virginia Railway Express, both of which were eventually achieved without an increase in transportation taxes.
_	The resolution reaffirmed the position that the status quo was unacceptable and that the situation must be settled on the basis of a single state of Cyprus with two politically equal communities in a bi-communal and bi-zonal union without secession or union with another country.
_	Respect is not something based solely on personal or professional qualifications, but also on the position that God has given that person.
_	Gingell refused, taking the position that foreigners had the Treaty rights to reside within the city, and that the magistrate himself had already placed his seal on the agreement.
_	In another letter from 7 January 1834, when he had received more information on what had happened, a change of mind announces itself: he would later advocate the position that Hauser himself had inflicted the wound by pressure, and that, after he had squeezed the point of the knife through his wadded coat, it had penetrated much deeper than he had intended.
_	However, this is the position that Schneider, Sahlins and other anthropologists explicitly reject.
_	While Hồ Chí Minh supported the position that Vietnam had entered the stage of transition to socialism in 1954, he held the belief that Vietnam was still "a democratic regime in which people are the masters" and not socialist.
_	Kurokawa, despite dying after Akamoto (having tripped and fallen on a spear) arrived in the after life before him, stealing his identity and the position that had been reserved for him by the Shogun.
_	President Thomas Jefferson took the position that the Court could not give him a mandamus (i.e. an order) even if the Court had jurisdiction:
_	They argued about the role of unions, with DeVos taking the position that "Workers and job creators, through hard work, ingenuity, sweat and risk-taking, literally made the strongest economy in the world and the greatest standard of living in history...
_	Unresolved issues of the book's historicity and the lack of supporting archaeological evidence have led some adherents to adopt the position that the Book of Mormon may have been the creation of Smith, but that it was nevertheless divinely inspired.
_	BC Transit, and later, TransLink, took the position that the barrier-free proof of payment system was more effective than having fare gates or turnstiles.
_	The Security Council, as well as the UN in general, has consistently affirmed the position that East Jerusalem (but not west Jerusalem) is occupied Palestinian territory subject to the provisions of the Fourth Geneva Convention.
_	The "strong" form is the position that the interaction itself contributes to language development.
_	The "weak" form is the position that interaction is simply the way that learners find learning opportunities, whether or not they make productive use of them.
_	The classicist Walter Burkert called Foucault's work the leading example of the position that sexuality takes different forms in different civilizations and is therefore a cultural construct.
_	One way patristic thinkers tried to harmonize the texts was through the position that there had actually been no sexual intercourse in Eden: on this reading, sex happened after the fall of man and the expulsion from Eden, thus preserving virginity as the perfect state both in the historical Paradise and the anticipated Heaven.
_	In such a case, the arbitrageur will face a cost to close out the position that is equal to the change in price that eliminated the arbitrage condition.
_	From this ruling and the position that Shanghai High Court allowed both plaintiff and defendant to submit and cross examine the reports prepared by the economic experts on the relevant markets, J&J’s products and its market share, the effects of pro- and anti-competition of the alleged vertical agreement in question with restriction on the minimum resale price, etc., it appears that Shanghai High Court is rather in favour of agreeing to conduct a comprehensive examination of all related aspects in particular of the pro- and anti-competition effects of "Article 14 agreements" in accordance with the doctrine of the “rule of reason”.
_	The article took the position that the video was designed as a negative commentary on the kind of "nerd-guilds" whose members fastidiously plan raids with all the seriousness of actual military tacticians.
_	The German government had also taken the position that it would be "inadvisable ... to elevate the question of war guilt".
_	"Unlike the combinational player, the positional player is occupied, first and foremost, with the elaboration of the position that will allow him to develop in the unknown future.
_	France maintained the position that it had not approved the expulsions and therefore was not responsible for accommodating and nourishing the destitute expellees in its zone of occupation.
_	The party holds the position that capitalism must be removed in order to overcome the social and economic factors underpinning racism and the problematic coexistence of Romanis and the majority.
_	Because local sentiment made a full pardon out of the question, Alcamo took the position that Bickham's sentence should be commuted, or reduced, to a specific term of 75 years.
_	Siegan also had held the position that the U.S. Supreme Court had erred in major civil rights rulings.
_	The church took some while to come to the position that the Sabbath need not be kept, and it is hard to think that Jesus explicitly said so."
_	Likewise, Pentecostal churches such as the Assemblies of God, as well as Restorationist churches, like Jehovah's Witnesses and The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, also take the position that homosexual activity is immoral.
_	There was disagreement on whether to wait for government approval, with Levinger taking the position that settlement should go ahead regardless.
_	Walker has also taken the position that there will be no technological change that will mitigate health care and social security problems into 2050 despite ongoing discoveries.
_	The Comptroller of Income Tax took the position that payments made by the respondent to its subsidiaries pursuant to those swap agreements fell within the ambit of section 12(6) of the Income Tax Act, such that the withholding tax requirements imposed by section 45 of the same statute applied.
_	"It's going to sit there until there's another plan, and right now we don't have a plan... we have taken the position that we think it's the province's responsibility, and they say they won't," Crouse said. , there is no timeline for completion of the interchange.
_	He has criticised the move publicly as part of "ever increasing list of the cost of Brexit" and holds the position that the plan is "a completely superficial expenditure which could have been spent on our hospitals and our schools."
_	The Canadian Psychological Association takes the position that, "Publishing the questions and answers to any psychological test compromises its usefulness" and calls for "keeping psychological tests out of the public domain."
_	Newton rejected the second alternative after adopting the position that "the centre of the system of the world is immoveable", which "is acknowledg'd by all, while some contend that the Earth, others, that the Sun is fix'd in that centre".
_	The attack was conducted on 7 April, and while it succeeded in clearing Hangard Wood (at a cost of 151 casualties), the position that the attacking troops were expected to fortify was poorly sited, and as a result the attacking troops retreated to their starting positions.
_	Later chroniclers often referred to the position that St-Calais held as justiciar, although the formal office did not yet exist.
_	When the party's members fought over accepting the support of Communists, Rogge took the position that the party needed to draw a clear line that established its independence from Communist influence.
_	Universal reconciliation does not commit one to the position that one can be saved apart from Christ.
_	It only commits one to the position that all will eventually be saved through Christ.
_	Neither does universal reconciliation commit one to the position that there is no Hell or damnation—
_	It said: Sir, I wonder very much at a man like you pretending to be a faithful follower of Christ to act in the unjust way that you are doing for I assure you that you are not following the precepts of our Saviour by so fondly embracing and cherishing and upholding the unjust Claims of the Masters and at the same time despising the poor working Men and trying to drive them in to work below the country price and to make black sheep of them, but A man holding the position that you hold should try to make white sheep ... if I ever see another Letter from you ... you may preach your own funeral sermon...
_	The Tolkien Estate maintains the position that the geographical layout of Middle-earth or any other places in the imaginary universe created by J.R.R. Tolkien was the intellectual property of J.R.R. Tolkien and subsequently is that of his heirs.
_	She reiterated the position that reducing unintended pregnancy is a "core moral value" in her speech at the 2008 Democratic National Convention.
_	In his "Second Treatise of Government", John Locke takes the position that government authority arises from the consent of the governed, and not through the accidental birth of rulers.
_	John. D. Zizioulas (the Metropolitan of Pergamon) in his doctoral thesis (University of Athens, 1964) takes the position that by the mid-3rd century the Bishops were exercising "fermentum" with the (local to the Metropolitan) parishes that did have a presiding Bishop in order to communicate/retain the unity of the Church under the Bishop.
_	In 1967, when the debate about interfaith dialogue had reached new heights, with some rabbis taking the position that it might be appropriate for Christian and Jewish leaders to discuss issues of "social justice," but not "theology," Siegel once again took a strong position in favor of religious dialogue.
_	MacArthur held the position that Japan would not attempt an invasion of the Philippines before April 1942.
_	some Government agencies now take the position that a citizen may only request information via FOIL—i.e., an official letter designated as such and including the 95 shekel fee.
_	In 1985, Mr. Tang was appointed Superintendent of the Chinese Air Force Academy, and was later promoted to Director of the Air Force's Department of Political Warfare, the position that he held from 1986 to 1989.
_	It also took the position that works councils as they stood were not ‘up to the task of playing their full role in anticipating and managing change and building up a genuine transnational dialogue between management and labour’.
_	He had a strong impact in the Pedagogical Congress of 1882 where he maintained the position that public education had to be Catholic having a strong argument with Leandro Alem.
_	The administration took the position that the Supreme Court should apply "heightened scrutiny" to California's ban—a standard under which legal experts say no state ban could survive.
_	It has opposed the beatification of Pius XII, stating that a majority of independent historians did not agree with the position that Pius worked ceaselessly to save Jews.
_	The Ustashe recognized both Roman Catholicism and Islam as the national religions of Croatia, but held the position that Eastern Orthodoxy, as a symbol of Serb identity, was a dangerous foe.
_	Many conceptual works take the position that art is created by the viewer viewing an object or act as art, not from the intrinsic qualities of the work itself.
_	Some individuals, such as Bernardo de Azevedo da Silva Ramos, have advanced the position that the inscription is of Phoenician origin and possibly proof of pre-Columbian contact from Old World cultures.
_	He held the position that knowledge of the future, even by the prophets and by God, was probabilistic knowledge only.
_	The American Alliance of Museums Code of Ethics takes the position that "in no event shall they [deaccessioning proceeds] be used for anything other than acquisition or direct care of collections".
_	It may be the case, therefore, that the governments of these states took the position that their own legal systems offered sufficient protection to their own indigenous peoples.
_	Both D.C. mayor Muriel Bowser and the Council of the District of Columbia took the position that the voter-approved initiative became self-enacting.
_	As of 2016 the NTSB has not directly investigated passenger car and light truck brake-by-wire vehicle accidents, and the manufacturers have taken the position that their vehicles are completely safe, and that all reported accidents are the result of "driver error".
_	Instead, he took the position that some elements of authentic Ur III letters were incorporated into the Old Babylonian curriculum, but that these were extensively redacted; in some cases it is possible to tell that a letter was fabricated, while in others, it is more likely that the core of the letter represents original Ur III content.
_	The Adventist Church has, through the decades of the past, taken the position that those who overcome their sins will have them blotted out of the books of record in the judgment.
_	Ford took the position that he gave Conrad some benefit as a bonding partner, writing: "I was useful to Conrad as a writer and as a man in a great many subordinate ways during his early days of struggle and deep poverty..."
_	Monism is the position that mind and body are not ontologically distinct entities (independent substances).
_	Neutral monists such as Ernst Mach and William James argue that events in the world can be thought of as either mental (psychological) or physical depending on the network of relationships into which they enter, and dual-aspect monists such as Spinoza adhere to the position that there is some other, neutral substance, and that both matter and mind are properties of this unknown substance.
_	This one change resulted in a state of affairs in which software vendors began to take the position that customers do not own their software but rather only "license" it.
_	When Alice comments on the caterpillar's inevitable transformation into a butterfly, the caterpillar champions the position that in spite of changes it is still possible to know something, and that Alice is the same Alice at the beginning and end of a considerable interval.
_	However, Meir Shamgar, the former Israeli Supreme Court President, states, "With respect to expropriation in Judea and Samaria, it should be mentioned that international law generally denies the military government the authority to expropriate land in occupied territories; however, there is evidence supporting the position that it is permissible to expropriate land for the needs of the local population upon payment of compensation.”
_	The U.S. Government, however, has taken the position that paying debts with such coins at their face value, where the face value is lower than its intrinsic value, will implicate money laundering and tax evasion statutes.
_	Authority has, of late, taken the position that the ancient site of Gamla is to be identified with the site known as "Tell es Salām" (shown on map) which, itself, is a corruption of the Arabic word, "es-Sanām" (the hump).
_	In 1948, the French Reformed Church officially adopted the position that conscientious objection was legitimate and requested the State to grant a legal status to conscientious objectors; the French Catholic Church will wait until 1965 to take the same position.
_	Survivors and commentators questioned whether the law goes far enough, noting many groups are religious in nature and start from the position that homosexuality is a sin.
_	Rutledge, on behalf of the four dissenting justices, took the position that the majority had indeed permitted a violation of the wall of separation in this case: "Neither so high nor so impregnable today as yesterday is the wall raised between church and state by Virginia's great statute of religious freedom and the First Amendment, now made applicable to all the states by the Fourteenth."
_	In 1972, TWA started interviewing young men for the position that was previously exclusively held by women.
_	In the philosophy of religion, skeptical theism is the position that we should be skeptical of our ability to assess God's motivations or lack of motivation from our perceptions of the circumstances we observe in the world.
_	In her 2003 book "Unpacking Queer Politics: A Lesbian Feminist Perspective", Australian radical lesbian feminist Sheila Jeffreys advances the position that lesbian culture has been negatively affected by emulating the sexist influence of the gay male subculture of dominant/​submissive sexuality.
_	While Life B-P Church faced essentially a similar problem since they apparently took the position that all the preserved words of God are in the Traditional/Majority/Byzantine/Received Text, and not in the Westcott-Hort /Alexandrian/Minority/Critical Text, discord appeared to be sowed with their promotion of the dual-language (Chinese and English) “Why We Do Not Accept the Doctrine of Verbal Plenary Preservation,” issued by the Chinese Session of Calvary Pandan Bible-Presbyterian Church ("Calvary Pandan B-P Church"), a copy of which is still on Life B-P Church’s website.
_	As for politics and society, New Republicanism takes the position that any institution that does not "mould men into fine and vigorous forms" must "be destroyed."
_	If a member of the commission left the position that qualified him for membership, he would leave the commission as well.
_	Blumenthal has been a vocal advocate of the position that human activity is responsible for rising global temperatures and that prompt action to reduce greenhouse gas emissions must be taken.
_	The association also takes the position that the Streamlined Sales Tax Project (SSTP) is not sufficiently simplified and would "decimate" small online retailers.
_	Today, Orthodox and many Conservative rabbis maintain the position that only a man can act as a "kohen", and that a daughter of a "kohen" is recognized as a "bat kohen" only in those very limited ways that have been identified in the past.
_	He took the position that baptism of blood and baptism of desire are unavailing and that therefore no non-Catholics will be saved.
_	The school took the position that the name was a "gift" to the Arab peoples for their contribution to the economy of the Coachella Valley, not as a foreign racial symbol.
_	Benjamin Netanyahu, leader of the Likud party, said this in 2009, arguing the position that the Golan cannot return to Syria.
_	Such results would support the position that there is no way to explain the phenomena of quantum mechanics in terms of a more fundamental description of nature that is more in line with the rules of classical physics.
_	In 1948, the Chinese Communist Army named Zhu as the Ethnic Affairs Minister (Simplified Chinese: 民族事务处长), the position that administered all the minority issues of the whole northeastern provinces.
_	Kim took the position that the JROTC program should not be hosted by San Francisco as long as the U.S. military continued its "don't ask, don't tell" policy.
_	Generally, Polish American leaders took the position that Polish Prime Minister Władysław Sikorski should make deals and negotiate with the Soviet Union.
_	Freud made several arguments to support the position that the memories he had uncovered were genuine.
_	The name "Strict" represented the position that the churches had on a strict or closed communion (also known at the Lord's Table), whereby the churches required all those taking part in this ordinance to be baptised by immersion.
_	Against the Economists' demand for "freedom of criticism", Lenin advanced the position that the orthodox Marxists had the same right to criticize in return.
_	Catholics are, according to and Cardinal Ratzinger, obliged to hold the position that Anglican orders are invalid.
_	Moral realism (also ethical realism or moral Platonism) is the position that ethical sentences express propositions that refer to objective features of the world (that is, features independent of subjective opinion), some of which may be true to the extent that they report those features accurately.
_	The organisation was established in 1999, and takes the position that it has no declared political or national bias and is independent of EU institutions (although it does receive some funding from them).
_	Health law professor George Annas and technology law professor Lori Andrews are prominent advocates of the position that the use of these technologies could lead to such human-posthuman caste warfare.
_	According to the historian Nicholas Tarling, the United Kingdom government took the position that it was "strategically undesirable" for control of the territory to pass to Indonesia because it created a precedent for encouraging territorial changes base on political prestige and geographical proximity.
_	She succeeded Aguadilla mayor Carlos Méndez in the position that once was held by former Governor Don Luis A. Ferré, founder of the New Progressive Party and Dr. Jose Celso Barbosa the founder of both the Republican Party and the statehood movement in Puerto Rico.
_	Takurõ the lawyer for thirteen Holiness ministers, argued that the investigators of this case ... mistakenly assumed that all Holiness ministers followed the interpretation of Bishop Nakada, who in 1933 developed the position that the salvation of the Jews and earthly return and millennial reign of Christ were indispensable ingredients of a biblical eschatology.
_	In the Sixth Circuit, Ohio had taken the position that they did not.
_	The Ustaše held the position that Eastern Orthodoxy, as a symbol of Serbian nationalism, was their greatest foe and never recognized the existence of a Serb people on the territories of Croatia or Bosniathey recognized only "Croats of the Eastern faith".
_	Mr Shaw says he could not have put it better but the judgment leaves him in the position that he believes that the British police and legal system have let him down badly and have deliberately and cynically blocked his ability to establish the truth.
_	Despite assurances by the Graham government, Williams took the position that just as Quebec and its regulatory agencies had permitted Hydro-Québec to interpret the OATT rules in such a way as to monopolize and block transmission via Quebec, it would similarly be possible to block his only other land transmission route via New Brunswick.
_	The state of Nebraska took the position that D&X abortions were never medically necessary, meaning that an exception was not needed.
_	In 2016, Professor Laura Moy of the Georgetown University Law Center filed a formal complaint to the FCC regarding the use of the devices by law enforcement agencies, taking the position that because the devices mimic the properties of cell phone towers, the agencies operating them are in violation of FCC regulation, as they lack the appropriate spectrum licenses.
_	In February 2002, he characterized the position that "God had no part in the process [of the evolution of mankind]" as the "standard scientific theory".
_	Other theologians singled out TAV, and its associated leaders, John & Caroll Arnott, as part of a bigger criticism of the Charismatic Movement, arguing from the position that the gifts of the Spirit have ceased.
_	Lev took the position that Machiavelli's account on the matter, being quite vulgar, may in fact have been more a reflection of his own dislike of Caterina.
_	Regarding space, C. S. Lewis's "Space Trilogy" took the position that "as long as humanity remains flawed and sinful, our exploration of other planets will tend to do them more harm than good"; and most scientific romance authors had not even that much interest in the topic.
_	Pakistan believes, and international convention under uti possidetis juris supports, the position that it should not require an agreement to set the boundary; courts in several countries around the world and the Vienna Convention have universally upheld via "uti possidetis juris" that binding bilateral agreements are "passed down" to successor states.
_	Actually, however, a good case can be made out for the position that the district court's "drastic" decree is simply a courageous application of legislative intent as expressed in the antitrust laws.
_	Hales took the position that if the Queen were to have no children, Lady Catherine should be next in line to the throne.
_	He's taken the position that Israel shouldn't exist.
_	The two competed to fill the position that had been vacated in January 2013 by Clayton Luckie, who had earlier announced his withdrawal from the election following the news that he was being investigated on criminal charges.
_	A constitutional crisis developed in mid 2013 when prime minister Willy Telavi took the position that, under the Constitution, he was only required to convene parliament once a year, and was thus under no obligation to summon it until December 2013.
_	In this reading there may be room for the position that some might come to the Father through this salvation not knowing (at least originally) its connection to Jesus.
_	In her article "Naturalist Reflections on Knowledge", Millikan defends the position that the justification of true beliefs through an explanation in accordance with evolution constitutes knowledge.
_	It presents arguments that mutual funds and the stock market are not looking out for the consumer and takes the position that permanent life insurance is the best investment one can make, citing examples of people and companies who have used life insurance to their benefit and profit.
_	Brutus took the position that the Constitution should adopt the English system "in toto" (with minor modifications); Hamilton defended the present system.
_	On March 31, Romney took the position that no other states recognized same-sex marriage and therefore residents of other states could not marry in Massachusetts.
_	Reilly took the position that 38 states expressly denied recognition to same-sex marriages and that residents of other states could obtain licenses.
_	At the conservatoryy, Steinberg first became a lecturer, then in 1915, Professor of Composition and Orchestration, the position that Rimsky-Korsakov had held.
_	In a statement issued along with Srinivas Iyengar, Jawaharlal Nehru and others, Tyagi supported the position that the Principles of the Constitution of India drafted by the Motilal Nehru Committee should have been based on independence rather than Dominion Status.
_	Solidarity has taken the position that the Northern Territory intervention is not primarily driven by a drive for uranium mining in the Northern Territory, but by a government policy of "assimilation", arguing in a debate in Green Left Weekly that the Intervention "is part of a neoliberal, assimilationist ideology that says the only communities that are 'viable' are those that can establish links with the 'real economy'... mining companies gain no greater rights through the “hub towns” policy or the intervention."
_	The director of nursing has special training beyond the training of a staff nurse for the position that pertains to health care management, and in some places, a director of nursing must hold a special license in order to be employed in that capacity.
_	A referendum was held to formally fill the position that fall, an election in which Work was elected over J.O. Bentall, 22,081 to 6,449.
_	Mereological nihilism (also called compositional nihilism) is the position that objects with proper parts do not exist (not only objects in space, but also objects existing in time do not have any temporal parts), and only basic building blocks without parts exist, and thus the world we see and experience full of objects with parts is a product of human misperception (i.e., if we could see clearly, we would not perceive compositive objects).
_	The BMA statement of 2003 took the position that non-therapeutic circumcision of children is lawful in the United Kingdom.
_	Guest noted that the Consumers Union had favored health care reform since 1939, "taking the position that everybody in the country ought to have insurance coverage."
_	The International Society for Clinical Densitometry takes the position that a diagnosis of osteoporosis in men under 50 years of age should not be made on the basis of densitometric criteria alone.
_	Health law professor George Annas and technology law professor Lori Andrews are prominent advocates of the position that the use of these technologies could lead to such human-posthuman caste warfare.
_	The name Action Replay referred to the fact that could instantly restart a game from the position that had saved it.
_	The firestorms overwhelm the position that Daren's team occupies before they can be retrieved.
_	Shang-Da transferred from the San Francisco Bay pack and took the role of Richard's Hati without any fights, as no one else wanted the position that badly.
_	Justice Roberts, joined by Justice Reed, took the position that the "Leeds & Catlin" case should be considered good law, so that there was no misuse here.
_	In the context of public schools, the ADL has taken the position that because creationism and intelligent design are religious beliefs, and the government is prohibited from endorsing the beliefs of any particular religion, they should not be taught in science classrooms: "The U.S. Constitution guarantees the rights of Americans to believe the religious theories of creation (as well as other theories), but it does not permit them to be taught in public school science classes."
_	Owen Granger (portrayed by Miguel Ferrer) is the new Assistant Director of NCIS, filling the position that was held by Leon Vance before he became the new NCIS Director.
_	The Ustaše recognized both Roman Catholicism and Islam as the national religions, but held the position that Eastern Orthodoxy, as a symbol of Serbian identity, was their greatest foe.
_	Ludwig Keller, Thomas M. Lindsay, H. C. Vedder, Delbert Grätz, John T. Christian and Thieleman J. van Braght (author of Martyrs Mirror) all held, in varying degrees, the position that the Anabaptists were of Waldensian origin.
_	The historic peace churches have, from their origins as far back as the 16th century, always taken the position that Jesus was himself a pacifist who explicitly taught and practiced pacifism, and that his followers must do likewise.
_	The government asserted the position that Pave Paws would protect the American coastline, while hiding the fact that it had no defensive armaments in the event an incoming missile was detected.
_	By the close of the 18th century, Russia, Scandinavia, France, and the United States had taken the position that "free ships make free goods": that is, cargo on a neutral ship could not be condemned as a prize.
_	The film takes the position that the referendum result was a failure of courage and that the Québécois were numbed by prosperity and the explicitly Machiavellian manipulations of federalist leaders.
_	But Einstein and his supporters took the position that this "light postulate" together with the principle of relativity renders the ether superfluous and leads directly to Einstein's version of relativity.
_	In the discussions that led to the county being divided, Katharina took the position that dividing the county and allowing Philipp the Elder to marry would increase the chances of survival for the House of Hanau and was therefore preferable to strictly observing the primogeniture decree.
_	The "Handbook of Seventh-day Adventist Theology" takes the position that speaking in tongues refers to "previously unlearned human languages" (xenoglossy), using the experience on the day of Pentecost in as the "criterion" for later interpretation.
_	In epistemology, pluralism is the position that there is not one consistent means of approaching truths about the world, but rather many.
_	The court responded by saying, "Congress, in enacting RFRA, took the position that 'the compelling interest test as set forth in prior Federal court rulings is a workable test for striking sensible balances between religious liberty and competing prior governmental interests' ...
_	Initially, the Bulgarian diplomacy maintained the position that the question about the possession of Adrianople and Eastern Thrace was an international matter resolved by the terms of the Treaty of London of 1913, but this line soon had to be abandoned due to the lack of support by the Great Powers and their unwillingness to pressure the Ottoman Empire.
_	Pakistan's ambassador to the US Ashraf Jehangir Qazi, issued a response saying "There is only one country in the world that takes the position that Kashmir is an integral part of India, and that is India itself."
_	However, in 2004, the South Korean government issued the following statement: "Our government takes the position that the 1909 Gando Convention, signed by Japan illegally without Korea's consent, is null and void, to the extent that the Eulsa Treaty, which deprived Korea of its diplomatic rights in 1905, is a null-and-void treaty obtained through duress."
_	CM Addict's Andrew Funderburk called it "possibly the greatest comeback project in Christian music today" that "doesn’t slow its pace until the project ends", and has the message of "empowerment for us to rise to the position that Jesus Christ has made for us and to live in that position of our identity in Him."
_	The BDF took the position that capitalist consumerism and advances in production techniques had removed the ability of middle-class women, particularly single women, to contribute to the economy of the home.
_	This society expanded into the American Anti-Slavery Society, which espoused the position that slavery should be immediately abolished.
_	He confirms the position that the integration of the regional transport system into the international transport system will form the Asian macrologistical platform and will provide an opportunity to transform the Republic of Buryatia into an international transport hub.
_	Surprisingly Malloch took the position that former President Barack Obama had lied every day on Twitter.
_	In process theology dipolar theism is the position that in order to conceive a perfect God, one must conceive Him as embodying the "good" in sometimes-opposing characteristics, and therefore cannot be understood to embody only one set of characteristics.
_	"We are dedicated to the position that we have no country: we do not support mindless patriotic pleas for 'national unity,' nor are we interested in keeping America number one.
_	Ramjeet was sworn in as Belize's Solicitor-General on 15 June 2009, filling the position that had been vacant for a year since the sudden departure of Tanya Herwanger after only five months on the job.
_	The Hindu traditions such as those influenced by Advaita Vedanta have asserted the position that everything (Atman, Brahman, Prakriti) is ultimately one identical reality.
_	Based on the position that the chess pieces had taken on the chessboard in this photo, the game could never have taken the course that was stated in the published version.
_	He also won 11 Gold Glove awards for his glovework at first base, setting a Major League record for the position that still stands.
_	The research group takes the position that states should enforce use tax laws already on the books without burdening the private sector with the task.
_	At that point, some members of the administration began taking the position that the strikes are political, not economic.
_	In this design the cylinder wall contains several intake ports placed uniformly spaced along the circumference just above the position that the piston crown reaches when at BDC.
_	The historical debate was cast between the Austrian school of economics, represented by Ludwig von Mises and Friedrich Hayek, who argued against the feasibility of socialism, and between neoclassical economists and Marxian economists, most notably Cläre Tisch (as a forerunner), Oskar Lange, Abba Lerner, Fred M. Taylor, Henry Douglas Dickinson and Maurice Dobb, who took the position that socialism was both feasible and superior to capitalism.
_	Complexity is provided in negotiating the choice of an action to perform, the security of the position that roll has, and the special factors, such as weapon or tool quality, which the player can leverage in the task.
_	This challenge was a patently alien idea, discarding core Zoroastrian tenets in favor of the position that the spiritual world – including heaven and hell, reward and punishment – did not exist.
_	Most nontrinitarians take the position that the doctrine of the earliest form of Christianity was nontrinitarian, but that early Christianity was either strictly Unitarian or Binitarian, or Modalist as in the case of the Montanists, Marcionites, and Christian Gnostics.
_	He said "You'd never think yourself to be in the position that these two are in.
_	In arguing for a basic heuristic split between Plato and the contemporaries of Democritus, Havelock was directly contradicting a very long tradition in philosophy that had painstakingly assembled innumerable connections between Plato and the pre-Socratics, to reinforce the position that Plato, as his own dialogues imply, was primarily informed by his teacher Socrates, and that Socrates in turn was a willing participant in a philosophical conversation already several hundred years old (again, with a seeming endorsement from Plato, who shows a young Socrates conversing with and learning from the pre-Socratics Parmenides and Zeno in his dialogue the "Parmenides"—a historical impossibility that might represent figuratively an intellectual rather than direct conversation).
_	This finding supports the position that gang members are typically defiant and tend to continue their criminal activity until being stopped by arrest and incarceration.
_	Theory takes the position that entertainment users are just an audience, they are not active.
_	In the years after World War II, Greenberg pushed the position that the best avant-garde artists were emerging in America rather than Europe.
_	In 1976 the newly established ANG Council advertised for a permanent director to fill the position that Mollison had been acting in since 1971.
_	Ford said: "The U.S. further supports the position that a just and lasting peace, which remains our objective, must be acceptable to both sides.
_	The chance to influence change in a public school in the position that research showed had the most direct influence, the principalship, was just such a challenge.
_	Socialist Alternative maintain the position that parliamentary elections are not the key to social change.
_	("When the Spears Break", 1953) was a comedy; "Sonet Petrarki" ("Petrarch's Sonnet", 1956) "takes the position that there are certain individual matters--personal feelings and affairs of the heart--which are none of the collective's or the Party's business."
_	Although he acknowledges that the death toll for the massacre of over 300,000 used by Nanjing Massacre Memorial Hall is a baseless overestimate, he takes the position that “between more than 100,000 and about 200,000” were massacred not only in the city but also in the surrounding areas and six neighbouring counties though “there is a possibility this number will continue to increase based on future discoveries and disclosures of data and the future course of research.”
_	However, guns rights advocates take the position that, regardless of the storage method, and whether access to the detail A/D record is automated or manual, this system is a system of registration of firearms, firearm owners and firearm transactions prohibited by 18 U.S.C. 926(a).
_	In the second round of balloting, the incumbent Edward C. Scogin of Slidell, was unseated for the position that Shirley nangst sought by Suzanne Mayfield Krieger.
_	In line with this, too, is his demand that psychology should be cleared of metaphysics; and to his lead is no doubt due in great measure the position that psychology has now acquired as a distinct positive science.
_	The opposition was based on the position that the lawsuit violated Oey's First Amendment rights.
_	American Association of Attorney-Certified Public Accounts (AAA-CPA), the only organization of both attorneys and certified public accountants, takes the position that while the Marketplace Fairness Act addresses the issue of sales tax collection, it will place "crippling burdens" on interstate commerce and will harm the new internet marketplace.
_	Fuel was carried in two pannier cells behind the front wheels, in the position that Bristol road cars traditionally have battery and spare wheel compartments; their central position also resulted in minimal disturbance to the handling character of the 450, whether running on full tanks or empty.
_	Her 2,819-page report accused the regulators, i.e. the DTI, GAD, and FSA, of "comprehensive failure", found the Government guilty of ten counts of maladminstration, and called for a compensation scheme "to put those people who have suffered a relative loss back into the position that they would have been in, had maladministration not occurred".
_	We've made tradeoffs, accommodations, or compromises, if you will, taking the position that the need for jobs and industrial development and stimulation to our economy justified the temporary tradeoffs, and in some instances, some serious tradeoffs, where the environment became totally or partially damaged, and in some instances permanently.
_	Author Timothy Robertson takes the position that the Consecration of Russia was a step in the eventual defeat of Satan by the Archangel Michael.
_	Hacked material from Parrish was leaked during the campaign, but the Costello campaign took the position that they would not use the illicitly obtained materials during the election.
_	Most take the position that the religious right are just nuts who are loud but frankly undeserving of a response...
_	The episode also takes the position that parents who blame their children's behavior entirely on television are evading true responsibility for problems that likely have roots elsewhere.
_	They always have taken the position that they do not want to interfere in the Colombian conflict," said Santos.
_	Incompatibilism is the position that free will and determinism are logically incompatible, and that the major question regarding whether or not people have free will is thus whether or not their actions are determined.
_	Although the investments made by a private equity fund are actively managed, Blackstone took the position that the investments they engaged in fell squarely within literal language of this exception to the usual treatment for publicly traded partnerships.
_	He holds the position that the alternative seems to be the elaborate philosophical reduction of the word "moral" into a vacuous, useless term.
_	This example represents the position that any kind of open sustainability innovation incurs on the market.
_	The French and German governments, amongst others, took the position that the UN inspection process should be allowed to be completed.
_	He had been firmly of the position that Catholicism and its claims were both false and treasonable, however, while visiting a Catholic friend, he began casually flicking through a book of theology and was struck by the force of an argument he read there.
_	Bárdossy advocated the position that the Hungarian Army should only move into areas of Yugoslavia occupied by the Hungarian minority under the conditions agreed on 28 March.
_	The Turkish authorities maintain the position that the Ottoman Empire did not exercise the degree of control which the opposing parties claim.
_	Tamimi argued that it was an issue on which legal jurists disagreed and therefore interpretation should be permitted; he personally advocated the legal marriage age be raised to 18 and older while Sabri supported the position that minors could be married at puberty.
_	The plastic slot where the pin is normally held is deformed by the drop and the leader pin is no longer in the position that the drive expects it to be.
_	Moffett's Initiative takes the position that by denying loans to high credit families pursuing lower-value homes, illegal drug activity is perpetuated in dilapidated, owner-vacancy lots in urban neighborhoods like Kensington.
_	Later in a number of books Bauman began to develop the position that such order-making never manages to achieve the desired results.
_	All formulas require an estimation of the position that the IOL will sit in the eye, a factor known as the ELP, which is defined as the distance between the cornea and the IOL.
_	Einstein emphasized the importance of general covariance for the development of general relativity, and took the position that the general covariance of his 1915 theory of gravity ensured implementation of a generalized relativity principle.
_	The United Kingdom, by contrast, takes the position that the treaty transferred sovereignty as well as possession.
_	Regarding the perspective of the inquiry, as both tests are premised on an objective basis, Leo and Chen also appear to agree with the position that the court personifies the reasonable man, as stated in "Gough" and endorsed in "Tang Kin Hwa".
_	The magazine took the position that in charging me with libel, Hiss had impugned my veracity, not merely as an individual man, but as an editor of Time.
_	Louis Marshall, President of the American Jewish Committee, was also present in Paris at the time and he, too, favored dealing sternly with the Polish government and took the position that Gibson was willfully minimizing the whole matter to protect it.
_	Baricevic resigned his position, and then ran for the position that he resigned from.
_	The critic Frederick Crews, writing in "Out of My System" (1975), argued that Marcuse's proposed liberation of instinct was not a real challenge to the status quo, since, by taking the position that such a liberation could only be attempted "after culture has done its work and created the mankind and the world that could be free", Marcuse was accommodating society's institutions.
_	The European Court took the position that the plaintiffs were the children, not their parents, and declared "children are unable to foresee the consequences of their parents' decision for home education because of their young age...
_	The "Handbook of Seventh-day Adventist Theology" takes the position that speaking in tongues refers to "previously unlearned human languages" (xenoglossy), using the experience on the day of Pentecost in as the "criterion" for later interpretation.
_	However, when co-authoring "The Point of View of the Universe" (2014), Singer shifted to the position that objective moral values do exist, and defends the 19th century utilitarian philosopher Henry Sidgwick's view that objective morality can be derived from fundamental moral axioms that are knowable by reason.
_	As terminology, it was coined to concisely express a counter-view against the position that other means, such as aerial bombardment (as used both by Germany and the Allies in World War II, and massively by the United States in Vietnam), economic incentives, or satellite intelligence could achieve victory.
_	"The New York Times" in 2004 reported that Chaput took the position that it was sinful for Catholics to vote for Democratic presidential nominee John Kerry.
_	Nativism is the position that humans are born with innate domain-specific knowledge, especially inborn capacities for language learning.
_	The CCP works from the position that safeguarding the dignity of every human person, especially the well-being of children and vulnerable persons, is the responsibility of everyone.
_	He continued, "The depiction of Terri in the "Family Guy" episode on March 21 is not only inaccurate, it seems to take the position that certain people are simply not worthy of receiving medical care because they are viewed as burdens on the health care system."
_	Under the suggestion of Li Qi, he took the position that he was succeeding Li Cunxu legitimately, and, after a ceremony in which he first mourned Li Cunxu, took the throne as the new emperor.
_	Becker eventually came to the position that psychological inquiry can only bring us to a distinct threshold, beyond which belief systems must be invoked to satisfy the human psyche.
_	The current parish board has taken the position that the purpose of Burke's actions was to take control of the assets of the parish primarily for economic reasons.
_	Wilkes adopted the position that Mason and Slidell would qualify as "contraband," subject to seizure by a United States ship.
_	Mainstream Sakyas (following Rongtön and Gorampa) also hold the position that the distinction between these two schools is merely of a pedagogical nature.
_	Brundage took the position that despite similar concerns about state sponsorship as with the USSR, once the PRC's committee was recognized and reported to the IOC that all eligibility rules were observed, the international committee had to accept that unless it had evidence to the contrary.
_	"Human Rights Watch does not take the position that employer silence is required under international standards.
_	In June 2002 she heard a broadcast on NPR stating that the Department claimed they had never taken the position that Lindh was entitled to counsel during his interrogation.
_	He seems to take the position that different systems may be better suited to the peculiar circumstances of different countries.
_	The HSUS takes the position that all sexual activity between humans and animals is abusive, whether it involves physical injury or not.
_	Since the label could no longer provide Flicker as producer as the contract specified, the band took the position that they were free to move to another label and signed with Portrait Records.
_	The brief characterized the theory of brainwashing as not scientifically proven and advanced the position that "this commitment to advancing the appropriate use of psychological testimony in the courts carries with it the concomitant duty to be vigilant against those who would use purportedly expert testimony lacking scientific and methodological rigor".
_	Amaechi took the position that Kalabari leaders themselves were to blame, and should do more to develop their communities and discourage militancy.
_	Like Ringer, Ladd was seen as a strong advocate for authors' rights, and he adopted the position that the Copyright Office should play an active role in favor of copyright protection in public policy discussions.
_	In cases where the Munsee and Unami terms differ, the Pidgin term corresponds to its Unami congener, confirming the position that Unami is the source language for Pidgin vocabulary.
_	Perry's public relations office promoted the position that he advocated an emphasis on accountability, raised expectations, and funded programs that worked to improve the quality of Texas schools.
_	Gottfried Leibniz, belonging to the generation immediately after Descartes, held the position that the mental world was built up by monads, mental objects that are not part of the physical world (see "Monadology").
_	Steinsland has also readily written newspaper opinion articles, for example in 2000 taking the position that Thor Heyerdahl's Odin expedition to Azerbaijan was a "charade" orchestrated by Snorri Sturluson.
_	BJU has taken the position that orthodox Christians of the late 19th and early 20th centuries (including fundamentalists) agreed that while the KJV was a substantially accurate translation, only the original manuscripts of the Bible written in Hebrew and Greek were infallible and inerrant.
_	Kubekeli and Maseko maintain the position that traditional healing knows no colour.
_	Arguments supporting the position that settlement in the territories does not violate international law are,
_	This belief strengthened the policy of restraint and led to the position that there was no room for defense institutions in the future Jewish state.
_	When his father died in 1890, and Kurtuvian offered him the position that he would have inherited from his father as head of the community, he did not accept it because he had a sister who was left an orphan and he rejected the rabbinical seat in favour of his future brother-in-law.
_	Seeking to distance itself from polygamy and Mormon fundamentalism, the LDS Church has taken the position that the term "Mormon" should only apply to the LDS Church and its members, and not other adherents who have adopted the term.
_	According to the Babylonian Talmud, the Sun makes a 28-year cycle to return to the position that it was in when the Universe was first created at the time (Tuesday evening) it was created.
_	. . [and] some trade presses that publish educational and scholarly film books also take the position that permission is not necessary for reproducing frame enlargements and publicity photographs."
_	Myers has voiced the position that many of the responses to Richard Dawkins' "The God Delusion" are what he calls "Courtier's Replies".
_	In its submissions to the Supreme Court, Shell Oil took the position that the invention was not in the substances themselves, but in the discovery of a new use for these known chemical compositions, namely as plant growth regulators.
_	The D.C. Bill of Rights Coalition and the Montgomery County Civil Rights Coalition circulated a petition against random bag searches, taking the position that the practice violates the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution and would not improve security.
_	In "Russell Stover Candies v. FTC", the FTC, "in an admitted effort to test the viability of "Colgate"," took the position that an unlawful combination or agreement could be found when a buyer unwillingly submitted to and complied with a supplier's pricing policy in order to avoid termination.
_	On May 20, 2009, the Justice Department, in a brief filed by Solicitor General Elena Kagan, Assistant Attorney General Tony West, and Justice Department attorneys Mark B. Stern and Charles W. Scarborough, took the position that, "The decision of the court of appeals is correct and does not conflict with any decision of this Court or any other court of appeals...Further review is unwarranted."
_	China took the position that the Tibetan government should not have been allowed to make such a treaty, rejecting Tibet's claims of independent rule.
_	Central to this strategy is the position that the airline maintains at London Heathrow Airport.
_	He rejects the position that animals have to have humanlike cognitive characteristics, such as reflective self-awareness, language ability, or preference autonomy in order to have the right not to be used by humans as resources.
_	The governments of Canada and Manitoba took the position that Provincial Road 374, including a ferry crossing over the Nelson River, was an all-weather road.
_	Hasdai Crescas resolved this dialectical tension by taking the position that free will doesn't exist.
_	Blamey took the position that it was the job of the police to enforce the laws, even if they did not support them.
_	The Petitioner sarcastically notes that "The Respondent now takes the position that the State of Hawaii has a compelling interest in engaging in blatant discrimination today – and indefinitely into the future – in order to make up for even-handed treatment of all Hawaiian citizens, regardless of race, in the past" (32).
_	The company took the position that because the student was under 18 years old he did not qualify to participate in the program in violation of the program's terms and conditions.
_	One analyst took the position that his stat line did not reflect how well he actually played (even though he was responsible for five turnovers – the four interceptions and a lost fumble), and that several of his passes that should have been caught were dropped.
_	The All-Africa Peoples Conference was conceived to represent the position that Africa should be returned to the peoples and groups, such as ethnic communities, from who it was grabbed by colonialism.
_	Negative views of Hollywood marriages take the position that the divorce rates are indeed unusually high among celebrities and that this is caused by faults within Hollywood as a culture or by personal faults of the celebrities themselves.
_	If a multi-position player is to be selected, coaches are encouraged to vote for the player at the position that was "most advantageous for the All-Star team", regardless of where the player was listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he was listed in box scores.
_	After "Benson", the Court of Customs and Patent Appeals took the position that the reasoning of "Benson" did not apply to "machine" claims, such as a claim to a conventional digital computer programmed to carry out a new algorithm or computer program.
_	In 1979, the Wage and Hour Division of the United States Department of Labor took the position that SAMTA's operations were covered by the FLSA because they were not a traditional governmental function.
_	The assembly took the position that his position was provisional.
_	In July 2008, the Inspector General ruled that he had not acted improperly, noting that he had been asked by Governor Pataki to stay on as chairman through 2006, that he had raised the issue that the Public Authorities Accountability Act prohibited him from being paid a salary as chairman and that he had received two written legal opinions that supported the position that a full-time chairman could be compensated.
_	The early view that Israeli gunfire had killed the boy developed into the position that, because of the trajectory of the shots, Palestinian gunfire was more likely to have been responsible.
_	Jews for the Preservation of Firearms Ownership takes the position that an armed citizenry is the population's last line of defense against tyranny by their own government.
_	Christians strongly dispute the scientifically accepted Neo-Darwinian theory of evolution and have influenced schools to teach Creationism or "Intelligent design" (the position that God or another active intelligence intervened at various points over the course of an otherwise uninterrupted natural evolutionary history to produce the complexity and diversity of life observed on Earth).
_	In August, he was named commander of the Cavalry Corps of the Army of Northern Virginia, filling the position that had remained open since the death of J.E.B. Stuart.
_	In response to the position that spandrels are just small, unimportant byproducts, Gould and Lewontin argue that "we must not recognize that small means unimportant.
_	The band took the position that since Mushroom was unable to provide the services of Flicker they would be free to sign with another label.
_	Exploring the position that Muslims are oppressed within Western culture because of their religion, the group aims to express the hardships and rejection which Western Muslims experience at the hands of their governments, and to assert though their lyrics the beauty of being Muslim.
_	Nonetheless, in 1925 the Society as a whole formally took the position that it would not discriminate on color or race.
_	Black Rock Studio also wanted to make the HUD as simple as possible by taking away all unnecessary elements such as the speedometer and the track map (rendered useless due to the dynamic nature of the track) leaving only the lap count, the position that the player is in, and the power play meter, all positioned behind the player's car to avoid detracting from the scenery.
_	As the lyrics continued to depict creatures from old folklore, written in the style of dark poetic fairytales, some defend the position that Siebenbürgen merely opted to use a more widely spoken language for their lyrics, in order to be more inclusive to fans who do not understand their native language, whilst leaving the actual content of their output unchanged.
_	Arthur Glass observed that the minority judges began their judgments from the position that indefinite non-judicial detention and the curtailment of personal freedom were troubling consequences, and he noted that "as is not uncommon in statutory construction, where you start from is critical to where you end up".
_	The archeologist Scarlat Lambrino defended the position that the Lusitanians were a tribal group of Celtic origin related to the Lusones (a tribe that inhabited the east of Iberia).
_	O'Reilly took the position that the President should be allowed to sue Jadakiss for slander.
_	After the boys complete the drive to Belle Fourche and sell the cattle, they use some of the proceeds to pay a stonemason to carve a marker with Andersen's name and the legend "Beloved Husband and Father," in clear reference to the position that Andersen had earned in their lives.
_	In his early work he argued for a disengagement of the law from industrial relations, taking the position that problems and disputes were better resolved through bargaining than through litigation.
_	AXS stated; "Jerry Cantrell has always maintained the position that Alice in Chains was more a metal band than a grunge band and the guitar in this song leans more to the side of metal.
_	Most American leaders took the position that the cause of the explosion was unknown, but public attention was now riveted on the situation and Spain could not find a diplomatic solution to avoid war.
_	Three basic assumptions of these early texts included the distinction between sex and gender, the treatment of gender as a social construct, and the position that men are harmed by proscriptive gender roles.
_	This is not necessarily the position that everyone strives for, but that is what I like about Sean."
_	When contacted by a reporter, a Toronto Police spokesman reiterated the position that they were treating the deaths as "suspicious".
_	In the court's words: "Notwithstanding the considerable preference that the Riverside Superior Court generally afforded the trial of criminal cases over civil cases, the District Attorney of Riverside County consistently has taken the position that a California statutory provision required the Riverside court to extend its efforts even further and make every superior court judge and courtroom – including the specialized superior court departments devoted to hearing and resolving family law, probate, and juvenile matters (as well as the judges from outside the county who had been assigned to that court specifically to assist with the backlog of long-delayed civil trials) – potentially available for the trial of any criminal case that was facing dismissal under the applicable California speedy-trial statutes."
_	According to the California Building Industry Association, construction of a median priced house results in a slight positive fiscal impact, as opposed to the position that housing does not "pay its own way".
_	While acknowledging the existence of the Holocaust in 2006 and 2014, Abbas has defended the position that Zionists collaborated with the Nazis to perpetrate it.
_	The International Confederation of Free Trade Unions (now the International Trade Union Confederation) maintains the position that the ACFTU is not an independent trade union organisation, and states in its policy:
_	Members of the Christian right take the position that the Establishment Clause bars the federal government from establishing or sponsoring a state church (e.g., the Church of England), but does not prevent the government from acknowledging religion.
_	Although not without critics, the position that the gospels are a type of ancient biography is the consensus among scholars today.
_	After World War II, Delsuc became commissioner-general of the Scouts de France until 1946, officially occupying the position that he had occupied unofficially in the North Zone since his demobilization.
_	Photographs of Baker and de Francisci examining the final plaster model appeared in newspapers, along with written descriptions of the designs, since the Treasury at that time took the position that it was illegal for photographs of a United States coin to be printed in a newspaper.
_	The story is based on the life of an underworld mafia don, Rudra Pratap Singh, who is searching for a true or suitable "Waaris" (inherent, heir) for the position that he created in his criminal-world.
_	Western churches have arrived at the position that, although the "Filioque" is doctrinally sound, the way that it was inserted into the Nicene Creed has created an unnecessary obstacle to ecumenical dialogue.
_	It was through the position that Turner started his lifelong study of the Ndembu tribe of Zambia.
_	Émeric Crucé was a French monk who took the position that wars were the result of international misunderstandings and the domination of society by the warrior class, both of which could be reduced through commerce, as that brought people together.
_	These results were not anticipated by critics of the position that Aufderheide and Jaszi have taken.
_	He rejoined the Office of the Solicitor General as Acting Deputy Solicitor General to cover the position that longtime deputy Michael Dreeben vacated while on leave to teach.
_	In 1875, they endorsed the position that continued Chinese immigration was resulting in a general lowering of wages, both for whites and for Chinese already in America.
_	Following the airing of the program, Beth Twitty, adhering to the position that the tapes represent the way events transpired, believed that Van der Sloot dumped Natalee's body, possibly alive, into the Caribbean.
_	His Council met and while they urged either negotiation or a formal declaration of war, Cornwallis took the position that there was no sovereignty to negotiate with or declare war on and that the Mi'kmaq were British subjects and therefore should be considered "rebels."
_	In "Second Treatise of Government" (1690), John Locke took the position that all rights come from the people, and that the people must give their consent to be governed by elected representatives.
_	Some commentators take the position that bringing together a group of lawyers and accountants to create a multidisciplinary association ultimately benefits clients as they often need a wide range of professional services advisors when involved in large transactions, e. g., when incorporating a new business or in litigation matters, when for lawyers, the litigation support services of accountants can be very valuable.
_	Herbert Thurston in the saint's entry in the early 20th century "Catholic Encyclopedia" takes the position that there are no grounds for doubting the historical existence of Saint George, "but no faith can be placed in the attempts that have been made to fill up any of the details of his history."
_	Black as the first Senior Enlisted Advisor, the position that would evolve into Master Chief Petty Officer of the Navy.
_	George Siemens takes the position that educational data mining encompasses both learning analytics and academic analytics, the former of which is aimed at governments, funding agencies, and administrators instead of learners and faculty.
_	The 9.18 Incident Exhibition Museum at Shenyang, opened by the People's Republic of China on 18 September 1991, takes the position that the explosives were planted by Japan.
_	At the October 4, 2017 hearing, Bolton held the position that "she had no choice but to validate Arpaio's Aug. 25 pardon by President Donald Trump and throw out the finding of guilt in his criminal contempt case because he had not yet been sentenced and was not afforded an opportunity to appeal the verdict."
_	Franklin's essay argued against such policies by advancing the position that labor is more valued in self-owned farming given the availability of land in America.
_	In effect, he took the position that only the states that shared a border with Pakistan could choose to accede to it.
_	He is noted for the position that evolutionary processes need to be considered in determining how the mind deals with symbolic information and language.
_	The Israeli government did not uphold the position that they would find a way for the Women of the Wall to pray, which resulted in an appeal from the Women of the Wall to the High Court of Justice in 1995.
_	The astronaut lay in a sitting position with his back to the heat shield, which was found to be the position that best enabled a human to withstand the high g-forces of launch and reentry.
_	In schools with many staff members, however, one may be lenient, and some "poskim" take the position that this halacha applies only to situations where the teaching takes place in the private home of the teacher.
_	Arguments supporting the position that establishing, funding, or allowing settlements in the territories is a violation of international law are,
_	In a submission to the Department of Attorney-General and Justice regarding the statutory review of the "Surveillance Devices Act 2007" (NSW) dated 27 September 2013, the NSW Council for Civil Liberties state that they never supported this extension, and maintain the position that the 90-day period should be reduced to 21 days.
_	While the FDA is responsible for protecting and promoting public health through the control and supervision of food safety, the agency holds the position that "the use of genetic engineering in the production of food does not present any safety concerns for such foods as a class", and , as there is "an absence of reliable data indicating safety concerns" with GMO foods as a class, voiced no opposition for USDA having the responsibility of regulating GMO food labeling.
_	Though Georgism has historically been considered as a radically progressive or socialist ideology, some libertarians and minarchists take the position that limited social spending should be financed using Georgist concepts of rent value capture, but that not all land rent should be captured.
_	As stated by University of North Carolina School of Law professor Michael J. Gerhardt, this is the position that "the critical inquiry is not whether the letter of the law has been broken (it has) but rather whether the problem that the clause exists to preclude—conflicts of interest in nominating a member of Congress who has been able to vote himself or herself a raise—has been avoided".
_	Although the Design-Build Institute of America (DBIA) takes the position that design–build can be led by a contractor, a designer, a developer or a joint venture, as long as a design–build entity holds a single contract for both design and construction, some architects have suggested that architect-led design–build is a specific approach to design–build.
_	There is no evidence to support the position that the peasant uprising was carried out by the PCS, but due to the dates on which both uprisings occurred, the armed forces responded equally to both movements.
_	It is thought that Japanese students studying in China adopted this practice, and, taking the position that the Chang'an-based manner of elocution were the correct ones, they also began to refer to the previously imported, unfashionable kanji readings as ""go-on"".
_	For the next leg of the journey to the United States and Britain, the Chinese took the position that they would only issue exit visas on the Chinese passports.
_	Later that April, Trump took the position that states have the right to enact such legislation and that the federal government should not become involved.
_	The half guard is the position that is in between a full guard and side control or full mount.
_	He took the position that "stored electronic communications" are subject to the statute's interception prohibition, rather than, as the majority held, solely to "contemporaneous acquisition."
_	In 2017, Autism Speaks took the position that "Each family has a unique experience with an autism diagnosis, and for some it corresponds with the timing of their child's vaccinations.
_	Stars therefore do not remain forever in the position that we now see them in, but pass through the arms as they travel in their orbits.
_	In particular, Einstein took the position that quantum mechanics must be incomplete, which motivated research into so-called hidden-variable theories.
_	From the close of the 18th century to nearly 1828, Congress maintained the position that it was legally responsible for the protection of Indians from non-Indians, and in establishing this responsibility it "continue[d] to deal with Indian tribes by utilizing agents to negotiate treaties under the jurisdiction of the Department of War."
_	Infralapsarianism, sometimes called "low Calvinism", is the position that, while the Fall was indeed planned, it was not planned with reference to who would be saved.
_	This organization takes the position that man-made climate change is occurring.
_	"The Branded Mind" examines the neuroscience of brand decisions, taking the position that brand decisions were largely dependent on homeostatic factors.
_	According to historian Kemal Karpat, the movements that perceive Islam as a political movement or particularly the view of Islam as a political religion hold the position that Atatürk was not a Muslim (true believer or religious Muslim).
_	Significant to this problem is the position that carbonate-associated sulfate occupies in the structure of carbonate minerals.
_	Berry's 2015 meeting with Vatican officials from the Holy See's Secretary of State office garnered significant media attention given that the Catholic Church's holds the position that gay and lesbian sexual behavior a sin and restricts marriage to unions of one man and one woman.
_	This consideration could hardly escape any author, however wedded to his own system, and Hutcheson attempts to extricate himself from the difficulty by laying down the position that a man may justly regard himself as a part of the rational system, and may thus be, in part, an object of his own benevolence (Ibid), a curious abuse of terms, which really concedes the question at issue.
_	In her writings she has defended the position that Valencian is not Catalan.
_	However, USCIS takes the position that the L-2 spouse must obtain the Employment Authorization Document for I-9 purposes.
_	Despite World War I-era interest in ricin, as World War II erupted the United States Army still maintained the position that biological warfare (BW) was, for the most part, impractical.
_	Where it differs with many is on the question of the Soviet Union, the IST adopting the position that it was a "state capitalist" economy, rather than a "degenerated workers' state" along with their theories of the "permanent arms economy" and "deflected permanent revolution".
_	During the trial, he'd successfully maintained the position that Yates would be found innocent.
_	Yashpal had already reached Lahore by thattime and had spread the word about the plan of his killing among his friends by taking the position that the decision of the Central Committee of the party had been arrived at in his absence – without hearing his side - which was contrary to justice.
_	However, the position that there was an early information exchange between Greeks and Chaldeans are weak inferences; possibly, there had been a stronger information exchange between the two after Alexander the Great established his empire over Persia in the latter part of the 4th century BCE.
_	Others regard him as taking the position that nothing can be known on the basis of his philosophical arguments.
_	While in the famous debate during the '70s between the linguists Elaine Chaika and Victoria Fromkin on schizophrenic speech, Chaika long held the position that schizophasia was sort of an intermittent aphasia while Fromkin stated that schizophrenic speech errors could also occur in "normals," the debate has now been ended because according to Chaika (1995)
_	Under Article 376 of the Penal Code, abusive behavior is to violate the normative basis using the position that the subject (official) supports.
_	During that rest, he succumbed to the excessive heat, slipping over onto his side into the position that rescuers found him in.
_	In reply, each country tried to evade Hay's request, taking the position that it could not commit itself until the other nations had complied.
_	Two common strands of thought within these theories are the idea that money originated as a unit of account for debt, and the position that money creation involves the simultaneous creation of debt.
_	The Chinese also started to pressure the British to return all of Hong Kong, taking the position that they would not accept so-called "unequal treaties" that were imposed on them by colonial powers.
_	Dwane's great-grandson, Bishop S. Dwane, became the first black bishop of the Order of Ethiopia; the position that his great grandfather had sought but never achieved.
_	While Laroche saw in this a procedure similar to one employed by Babylonian scribes in longer texts to provide continuity at the transition from one tablet to another, Güterbock and Kilmer took the position that this device is never found within the text on a single tablet, and so these repeated syllables must constitute refrains dividing the text into regular sections.
_	Amon crashed his Ensign N176 after a suspension failure, allowing championship leader Niki Lauda to move into the position that became third in his Ferrari 312T2.
_	In March 1938, during a debate on a workman's compensation act, Brown took the position that he would support a committee's recommendation that chiropractic services not be covered by the act, up to and until the point at which somebody moved an amendment to include them, in which case he would support the amendment.
_	In 2016, when asked about events in Honduras, Clinton took the position that the removal of President Zelaya was legal, although "I didn't like the way it looked or the way they did it."
_	Restorationist churches, like Jehovah's Witnesses and LDS Church, take the position that homosexual activity is immoral.
_	In contrast, moral scientists defend the position that such a division between values and scientific facts ("moral relativism") is not only arbitrary and illusory, but impeding progress towards taking action against documented cases of human rights violations in different cultures.
_	In the current case, the Supreme Court clearly takes the position that in weighing whether any doubt exists as to the defendant's competency, the trial court must consider any evidence suggestive of mental illness, even one factor alone in some circumstances, may be sufficient to warrant an evaluation Therefore, the threshold for obtaining a competency evaluation is not very high.
_	The court takes the position that when the issues is raised, regardless of who raises it, the motion should be granted.
_	Further, the court suggests that it would be unconstitutional for a court to take the position that the defendant must bear all the burden for raising the issue.
_	Aguilera took the position that Cespedes' revolt should wait until more money could be raised before attacking, and though his viewpoint did not prevail, he deferred total control of the insurrection and subsequent war to Cespedes, who became de facto leader of the independence movement.
_	Conference of the Philippines hold the position that the bells are inappropriate as trophies of war.
_	Very early in his ministry, Joseph Smith began to advocate the position that priesthood does not come directly from God through the Holy Spirit, as many Protestants believe, but through a line of direct or apostolic succession.
_	Holdheim, in his "Ueber die Beschneidung Zunächst in Religiös-Dogmatischer Beziehung" (Schwerin and Berlin, 1844), takes the position that circumcision is not, like baptism, a sacrament of initiation, but is merely a command like any other.
_	The administration maintains the position that China is not the threat but rather the victim of an increasing number of cyber-attacks.
_	Francis Collins describes theistic evolution as the position that "evolution is real, but that it was set in motion by God", and characterizes it as accepting "that evolution occurred as biologists describe it, but under the direction of God".
_	Arlosoroff would ultimately come to the position that strength-based compromise with neighboring Arabs would not weaken or undermine efforts to establish a Jewish national homeland.
_	The established role of DCC and netrin-1 during organization of the spinal cord could be viewed as a further challenge to the position that DCC inactivation might play a significant role in tumorigenesis.
_	The four dissenting justices argued that the majority had broken prior precedent on the Second Amendment, and took the position that the amendment refers to an individual right, but in the context of militia service.
_	This increase has not resulted in improved outcomes resulting in the position that C-sections may be done too frequently.
_	Then, during the concert, the engineer can call up the settings from memory, and the faders will automatically move to the position that they were placed in during the soundcheck.
_	Saints Augustine and Aquinas tried to reach an accommodation between foreknowledge and free will, but Martin Luther argued against randomness and took the position that God's omniscience renders human actions unavoidable and determined.
_	TIMF Foundation, the managing body of the Festival and other related business branches, announced that TIMF would appoint a new artistic director, the position that had been left unfilled since the birth of the Festival. , the primary conductor and artistic director of Munich Chamber Orchestra, was the main character of this new era.
_	The article, which begins "This article might have been entitled 'The Composer as Specialist'", does not refer to serialism at all, but rather takes the position that "serious", "advanced" music, like advanced mathematics, philosophy, and physics, is too complex for a "normally well-educated man without special preparation" to "understand".
_	Some testimony supported the position that a rocket was fired into the neighborhood, while other witnesses claimed an overflying aircraft had dropped an aerial bomb filled with sarin.
_	Since the foundation of the modern Greek state in 1830 the government had maintained the position that Ancient Greek, in its simplified "katharevousa" form, was the language of the nation.
_	Another feature of a traffic collision in China is that in many cases, neither party will move their vehicle from the position that it came to rest following the collision, regardless of its effect on the flow of traffic.
_	The Army took the position that unless the Korean Government resurrected their original offer, it was "not in a position to officially recognize or approve acceptance of the medal."
_	Gendler advocates the position that religious nonviolence is as much a part of Judaism as it is of other religions.
_	The crisis could not be resolved since so many members held the position that the “nation triumphed over class” and “nationalism overrode internationalism.”
_	Helmke took the position that the second amendment to the constitution is a collective right of government and not an individual right of citizens.
_	RSPCA NSW has taken the position that the live export trade should be banned, that animals should not be kept in circuses, that puppy farms should be closed, and opposes the use of sow stalls.
_	Similarly, in Christianity, "moderationism" is the position that drinking alcoholic beverages temperately is permissible, though drunkenness is forbidden (see Christianity and alcohol).
_	The League of Nations Permanent Mandates Commission took the position that the Mandate contained a dual obligation.
_	Collins interviewed for the position that ultimately went to Scott Frost.
_	To do this work, they used what they called the "Principle of Relevance": namely, the position that "any utterance addressed to someone automatically conveys the presumption of its own optimal relevance".
_	Barnett's "Progress" opposed any sort of compromise, Franklin's "Enterprise" supported Washington's leadership in making a compromise, while Bell's "Sentinel" openly endorsed the position that higher education for blacks should be limited, writing "the race is in too big a hurry," and that there were not yet jobs for blacks who had higher education, and thus the education was disruptive to society.
_	Midnight Ridazz and its most prominent promoters do not overtly claim to be engaging in activism, apart from taking the position that "riding a bicycle in this country in and of itself IS the political act."
_	The earlier historian Anant Sadashiv Altekar, in his (1938) "The Position of Women in Hindu Civilization From Prehistoric Times to the Present Day" held the position that the Vedic Age saw an active discontinuation of pre-historic burning of widows, on basis that a 1000 BCE funerary custom describes that of "symbolic sati", where the widow lies down by her deceased husband, but is then bidden to rise again, to enjoy the bliss of children and wealth remaining for her.
_	Carter is arguably most infamous for Logos Foundation's political campaign in the 1989 Queensland State election where he pushed the position that adherence to fundamentalist Christian doctrine was a more important consideration than opposition to the widespread corruption in the conservative Queensland government that had been exposed by the Fitzgerald Inquiry.
_	In British Columbia, St. Laurent took the position that there were hardly any national issues worth discussing—the Liberals had brought Canada prosperity and all that was needed for more of the same was to return the party to office.
_	Infallibilism's opposite, fallibilism, is the position that a justified true belief may be considered knowledge, even if one's evidence does not guarantee its truth, or can, given one's evidence, rationally doubt it.
_	In countries with national health care systems (such as the UK and Canada), many of those national health services have restricted bevacizumab on the basis of cost-benefit calculations; in the U.K., for example, the National Institute for Health and Care Excellence has taken the position that bevacizumab should not be funded by the NHS because it costs nearly £21,000 per patient but only minimal benefit in many cancers.
_	Several points are made to argue the position that NFTs are perhaps protective instead of harmful.
_	Also interviewed were psychiatrist Charles Socarides, who strongly advocated the position that homosexuality is a mental disorder, and fellow psychiatrist Irving Bieber, who shared Socarides' opinion of homosexuality as pathology.
_	Supporters of the legislation take the position that accommodation of non-English speakers discourages assimilation.
_	Langer, however, took the position that they must remain where the Polish army in exile was forming—on French soil.
_	"In fact, so many members of the family occupied the position that it had begun to be considered as practically a familial apanage to which the Salignac-Fénelon had a right as seigneurs of the locality"
_	In response to growing criticism arising from the seemingly contradictory commitments undertaken by the United Kingdom in the McMahon-Hussein correspondence, the Sykes–Picot Agreement and the Balfour declaration, the 1922 Churchill White Paper, took the position that Palestine had "always" been excluded from the Arab area.
_	For best results they are molded in the ear while in the position that they will be used.
_	The respondents took the position that by applying the principle of ejusdem generis, it cannot be said that William dropping the ring into the garbage disposal was like or similar to a “fire, storm, or shipwreck.”
_	Furthermore, the respondent took the position that the replacement value of the ring, which William subsequently purchased for Nancy, and the salvage value of the original ring, must be offset against the gross loss suffered by Nancy.
_	Foxman said that Judt has "taken the position that Israel shouldn't exist [and t]hat puts him on our radar," while David A. Harris, executive director of the AJC, said that he wanted to tell the consulate that the thrust of Judt's talk ran "contrary to the entire spirit of Polish foreign policy."
_	Stevens focused on Article XI, taking the position that Johnson could be removed for political crimes; he need not have committed an offense against the law.
_	At least six states responded to the Resolutions by taking the position that the constitutionality of acts of Congress is a question for the federal courts, not the state legislatures.
_	The federal government takes the position that the agreement does not require payment until 2020.
_	During the Chinese Civil War, the RCP took the position that "both the KMT and the CCP should unconditionally stop the war."
_	"Note: In compliance with the accepted terminology used within the Shakespeare authorship question, this article uses the term "Stratfordian" to refer to the position that William Shakespeare of Stratford-upon-Avon was the primary author of the plays and poems traditionally attributed to him.
_	The legitimacy of other secession actions has been actively challenged by the Episcopal Church, which takes the position that dioceses and parishes may not leave without the Episcopal Church's governing bodies.
_	Macht was an Orthodox Jew and a Doctor of Hebrew Literature, and he frequently advocated the position that there was a harmonious relationship between religion and science.
_	Pentecostal churches such as the Assemblies of God, as well as Restorationist churches, like Jehovah's Witnesses and Mormons, also take the position that homosexual sexual activity is sinful.
_	William Labov, in "Principles of Linguistic Change", takes the position that there are two types of sound changes: regular sound change (respecting the Neogrammarian hypothesis) and lexical diffusion.
_	"I take the position that since it takes a long time for any word to get out, that what is laconic on the page can seem quite expansive on the opera stage," he says.
_	DFLA maintains the position that many religious or pro-life Americans would be more willing to support a Democratic candidate, if that candidate were to work to limit or end abortion in the United States through positive social programs and means.
_	Here he defended the position that Portugal should remain a Kingdom, in personal union with the Kingdom of Spain.
_	When Gilbert Foliot, the Bishop of Hereford, objected to Becket's candidacy, Hilary took the position that the king desired the election, so the bishops and electors should elect the king's choice.
_	A 2003 New South Wales Court of Appeal case ("Toll (FGCT) Pty Limited v Alphapharm Pty Limited") gave some support for the position that notice of exceptional terms is required for them to be incorporated.
_	Recipients with no medals wear the device in the position that a single medal would be worn.
_	He argued in favor of the equal consideration of interests, the position that there are no grounds to suppose that a violation of the basic interests of a human—for example, an interest in not suffering—is different in any morally significant way from a violation of the basic interests of a nonhuman.
_	On 29 January 2011, he was named Vice President of Egypt during the civil unrest, ending a vacancy in the position that lasted almost 30 years.
_	Responsibility is the position that actually does the task.
_	Creative Commons takes the position that there is an unmet demand for flexibility that allows the copyright owner to release work with only "some rights reserved" or even "no rights reserved."
_	Other ministers took the position that only a military response would eliminate the threat.
_	Agnosticism is the position that it is impossible to know for certain whether a deity of any kind exists.
_	Similarly, they take the position that those who have attempted to sue the Japanese government for compensation have no legal or moral case.
_	Some North American veterinarians hold the position that people with compromised immune systems, due to conditions such as AIDS, should have their cats declawed to prevent health risks to themselves.
_	Vennemann held the position that they spoke an Atlantic language.
_	Some historians have taken the position that while brutal, Columbus was simply a product of his times and being a figure of the 15th century should not be judged by the morality of the 20th-century.
_	The Free Software Foundation maintains the position that GPL software cannot be combined with Oculus SDK’s license.
_	The George W. Bush administration took the position that the Geneva Conventions do not apply to unlawful combatants, while other prominent Republicans strongly oppose the use of enhanced interrogation techniques, which they view as torture.
_	She participated in two commissions over the question of whether Vasil Levski's grave had been found at St. Petka's and maintained the position that without proof, linking a person or event to a place, undermined the authority of historians and archaeologists.
_	This is most common in fundamentalist and evangelical denominations that take the position that the Bible is God's inerrant word, and contains sufficient information for the Christian to understand their faith and how they should live their lives.
_	In "The Case for Bureaucracy: A Public Administration Polemic", Charles Goodsell takes the position that the generally disparaging view of bureaucracy is unwarranted, and that the "quality of public service in the United states is vastly underrated".
_	And this progressive history would only occur through a dialectical process: namely, the tension between the purpose of humankind (freedom), the position that humankind currently finds itself, and mankind's attempt to bend the current world into accord with its nature.
_	Due to his empirical approach, Bernstein took the position that economic prosperity under capitalism was causing a reduction in class conflict as well as increasing the differentiation of the working class.
_	The opposite position was taken by Nick Mediati in an article for "PC World", in which he takes the position that every wireless access point should be protected with a password.
_	There has been controversy that Adetoyese was at loggerhead with his brother, Adesola Olusi on who should contest for the position that year.
_	Muir has published a number of articles on genetics and ethnicity, defending the position that ethnicity is a matter of language and customs, not genetic descent.
_	Chipman took the position that if there were to be conscription, wealth should be conscripted first, and this was agreed after some debate.
_	The mostly autonomous rural paramilitary squads took the position that “violence could only be met by greater violence,” which lead to violent incidents that began to resemble a civil war.
_	The church belongs to the Baptist Union of Great Britain, although there is no authority link between the union and the church, reflecting the position that the Baptist Union is an association with administrative functions rather than a denomination.
_	General Butler, who was educated as an attorney, took the position that, if Virginia considered itself a foreign power to the U.S., he was under no obligation to return the three men.
_	The null PRO is added to the predicate, where it occupies the position that one would typically associate with an overt subject (if one were present).
_	Yoram Dinstein, has dismissed the position that they are not occupied as being “based on dubious legal grounds”.
_	The Coalition took the position that Kerr could dismiss Whitlam if the Government could not secure supply.
_	The League believes that the Fourth International became centrist in 1951 when it adopted the position that the Stalinist parties in Eastern European countries like Yugoslavia could be reformed back to a healthy state and that the Stalinists were roughly 'blunt instruments' for carrying out the proletarian revolution.
_	In 1834, when doctor Mariano Gálvez was head of State of Guatemala, he found the Science Academy in the State, which took the position that the Pontifical University had previously occupied; the new university eliminated religious education altogether and implemented clases of Algebra, Geometry, Trigonometry and Physics; besides, the institution began to offer studies in engineering.
_	As Ian Watt states, modern realism "begins from the position that truth can be discovered by the individual through the senses" and as such "it has its origins in Descartes and Locke, and received its first full formulation by Thomas Reid in the middle of the eighteenth century."
_	Such was his skill in the position that he revolutionised the art of wicket-keeping and was known as the "prince of wicket-keepers".
_	The British, however, had previously taken the position that the border should leave Lake Superior at "Fond du Lac" (the "head of the lake") in modern Duluth, Minnesota, proceed up the Saint Louis and Embarrass rivers, across the height of land, and down Pike River and Lake Vermilion to the Rainy River.
_	Both popes strongly advocated for the episcopal authority of the Catholic Church against secular authority, the position that Palafox advocated when he served in Mexico.
_	He admits to having a tough time adjusting to the position that he was assigned to play.
_	However, even as of September 1978 President Mengistu still maintained the position that the new party would emerge from Imaledih.
_	Despite remaining undefeated with an away draw to Iraq and home wins over the United Arab Emirates and Saudi Arabia, by the middle of the year Australia hadn't improved from third, the position that sends a team into further qualification matches.
_	The government took the position that an elected government, especially one elected with a large mandate, should direct monetary policy.
_	The PLO retained its original option of a single secular bi-national state west of Jordan, but began to take the position that it was prepared to accept a separate Palestinian state in the West Bank and Gaza in land from which Israel had withdrawn under Security Council Resolution 242.
_	Paul was a strong advocate of the position that gentiles need not be circumcised or observe dietary laws.
_	When slaves began escaping to Union lines at the fort, General Butler took the position that, since the Confederate states considered slaves to be chattel ("property"), and that certain individuals were property obtained by the Union through war, his refusal to return escaped slaves to masters supporting the Confederacy amounted to classifying them as "Contraband of war".
_	The final report of the Sub-Commission (1997) invoked numerous legal conventions and treaties to support the position that population transfers contravene international law unless they have the consent of both the moved population and the host population.
_	Preus and others, including C. F. W. Walther, one of the leading founders and first president of the theologically conservative Lutheran Church–Missouri Synod in 1847, took the position that the only cause that moved God to elect saints unto salvation is grace, and that election or predestination of saints to salvation is not the same as God's foreknowledge.
_	Some medical associations take the position that the parents should determine what is in the best interest of the infant or child, while others say that circumcision of male minors should be restricted "as much as possible," and that "it is reasonable to put off circumcision until the age at which ... the boy himself can decide about the intervention, or
_	In 2015, Bush took the position that people in the United States illegally should have a path to legal status, but not a path to citizenship, and said that legal status and avoiding deportation should require immigrants to pay fines, get work permits, pay taxes, not receive government assistance, learn English, and not commit crimes.
_	Latter Day Saint history comes from the position that other churches were the product of the apostasy, as referenced in the Bible.
_	He has written about issues surrounding medical ghostwriting with the position that it is scientific misconduct.
_	Unlike their Greek counterparts, many Latin scholars took the position that interjections did not rely on verbs and were used to communicate emotions and abstract ideas.
_	Yoram Dinstein, has dismissed the position that they are not occupied as being "based on dubious legal grounds".
_	Though such tactics are arguably legal, the new right/new left takes the position that some of the civilian deaths caused by these scorched earth tactics are wrongly attributed to the Japanese military.
_	The administration took the position that the Supreme Court should apply "heightened scrutiny" to California's ban—a standard under which legal experts say no state ban could survive.
_	Tenor, baritone and bass concertinas often have an air valve in the position that would otherwise be occupied by the instrument's highest note.
_	Six of these states took the position that the power to declare acts of Congress unconstitutional lies in the federal courts, not in the state legislatures.
_	They take the position that directors who experience life outside Cuba represent Cuba through a distorted lens, and that the films they make are largely works of propaganda.
_	Maintaining the position that they were pacifists, Ann Lee and her followers did not side with either the British or the colonists.
_	Though the Army was of the position that it no longer had the authority to award the Certificate of Merit, commanders in the field continued to recommend soldiers for the award, but the Army did not act on the nominations.
_	If a multi-position player is to be selected, coaches are encouraged to vote for the player at the position that was "most advantageous for the All-Star team," regardless of where the player was listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he was listed in box scores.
_	White accepted the position that the Eighth Amendment to the United States Constitution required that all punishments be "proportional" to the crime; thus, in "Coker v. Georgia" (1977), he wrote the opinion that invalidated the death penalty for rape of a 16-year-old married girl.
_	At the time that Tolkien debated the usefulness of myth and mythopoeia with C. S. Lewis in 1931, Lewis was a theist and liked but was skeptical of mythology, taking the position that myths were "lies and therefore worthless, even though 'breathed through silver.
_	He had clutched the motor and had to exit the race on lap 208 with a 31st-place finish; 13 places worse than the position that he qualified for.
_	Some annihilationists accept the position that hell is a separation from God by taking the position that God sustains the life of his creations: when separated from God, one simply ceases to exist.
_	A key issue to the immediate future of Fortis is the portfolio of toxic credits, with De Boeck taking the position that there is an existing contract, resulting in an immediately imminent bankruptcy of Fortis, while the newly elected Ugeux arguing that the portfolio belongs to Fortis Bank and was split off only after (and as part of) the now illegitimate sale of Fortis Bank to the Belgian government: for the immediate future it is the worry of the Belgian government, and Fortis is doing fine.
_	Sensing the tides changing, the Inspector of Jing Province (the position that had the authority to raise troops from within the entire Jing Province), Hu Xiu (胡修), and Cao Cao's Administrator of Nan Town (Nan Town was located southeast of present-day Xichuan County, Henan), Fu Fang (傅方), both defected to Guan Yu.
_	Military Keynesianism is the position that government should raise military spending to boost economic growth.
_	Operation Clambake maintains the position that posting these internal Church of Scientology documents is permitted under "fair use" allowance of internationally recognized copyright law.
_	Due to the importance of the position that the Angel has been called the son of Ahura Mazda.
_	She is noted for the position that many of the social structures of agrarian India, particularly the large class of landless labourers pre-dated the British era.
_	She refused, taking the position that she no longer had an obligation to Paramount.
_	The SBA List has taken the position that the legislation in question allows for taxpayer-funded abortion, a claim which was ruled by a judge to be factually incorrect.
_	The Legion took the position that the pilgrimage would be funded by its members without subsidies or financial aid from Canadian taxpayers, and by early 1935 they had established that the price of the 3½-week trip, inclusive of all meals, accommodation, health insurance, and sea and land transportation would be per person ($ as of 2016).
_	On June 2, 1941, Andrews became Washington bureau chief for the "Herald-Tribune", the position that made him famous (the "number two" newsman in Washington, according to David Halberstam).
_	The Catholic Church holds the position that there is no moral impediment to gambling, so long as it is fair, all bettors have a reasonable chance of winning, that there is no fraud involved, and the parties involved do not have actual knowledge of the outcome of the bet (unless they have disclosed this knowledge).
_	However, Belichick decided shortly after taking the position that he no longer wanted it and instead chose to become the head coach of the Patriots.
_	With the outbreak of World War II, Ljotić supported Yugoslavia's policy of neutrality in the conflict while promoting the position that Yugoslav diplomacy should focus on relations with Berlin.
_	In "A Theory of Justice" (1971), John Rawls compared Rashdall's ethical views to those of G. E. Moore, writing that the position that the capacity for a higher life may be grounds for treating men unequally is implicit in Moore's "Principia Ethica" (1903).
_	Norbert Wiener laid out the position that humans, machines and ecology are simply nodes in a network in his book "Cybernetics, or Control and Communication in the Animal and the Machine", and this book became the bible of cybernetics.
_	Stanton retired from the presidency in 1892, after which Anthony was elected to the position that she had in practice been occupying all along.
_	Meanwhile, a 1987 segment of the CTV Television Network show "Live It Up!" took the position that the line’s product packaging wasn't doing enough to adequately distinguish relatively harmless cooking sprays from more dangerous cleaning products.
_	Because of the severe impediments to marriage which "mamzer" status accords in Jewish law, Israeli civil law has taken the position that the paternity of a child born within a marriage cannot legally be challenged in civil courts, in order to avoid creating a body of evidence that might be used to declare the child a "mamzer", or create difficulties for a future marriage.
_	From the start, mine managers and owners took the position that they were meeting and negotiating with miners, and refused to acknowledge that the miners were union representatives.
_	that his empirical and organic theory could produce a closed or real definition of art" according to Aili Bresnahan and it is "this revised version that many philosophers have considered the "sine qua non" in support of the position that theories of art should be 'open'".
_	Fallin took the position that Oklahoma law did not recognize such relationships.
_	Williams now clearly takes the position that he has been deserted by the left.
_	He takes the position that he is entitled to make any maneuver to keep from going to jail for kidnapping...
_	Although some courts have taken the position that a white person must meet a heightened standard of proof to prove a reverse-discrimination claim, the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC) applies the same standard to all claims of racial discrimination without regard to the victim's race.
_	Edsger W. Dijkstra took the position that the use of a formal language is essential to prevent the introduction of meaningless constructs, and dismissed natural language programming as "foolish".
_	As the discussion developed, Galileo took the position that all bodies denser than water sink, while all lighter than water float, regardless of their shape.
_	Taken together, the vast majority of Islamic scholars of every fiqh have traditionally held with the position that there should be punishment for apostasy in Islam.
_	There were people [in the BLA] who absolutely took the position that it was just time to resist, and if black people didn't start to fight back against police brutality and didn't start to wage armed resistance, we would be annihilated."
_	In 1998 Volf took the position that he still holds, that of Henry B. Wright Professor of Theology at Yale Divinity School in New Haven, Connecticut.
_	This sparked some controversy, with some people siding with the Boogaards, saying that they are teaching children how to not get hurt in a fight, and others opposing them, with the position that the Boogaards' camp encourages children to fight.
_	Psychologism in the philosophy of mathematics is the position that mathematical concepts and/or truths are grounded in, derived from or explained by psychological facts (or laws).
_	The newly elected Czech President Miloš Zeman has an even more critical approach to Kosovo's independence than his predecessor; he announced maintaining the position that no Czech embassy shall be opened in Pristina, but that the Czech liaison officer shall be withdrawn.
_	Leary took the position that LSD is a beneficial tool in exploring consciousness.
_	Lettvin took the position that LSD is a dangerous molecule that should not be used.
_	"Many times in my experience I have been called upon to meet the attitude of a certain class, who acknowledged that the testimonies were from God, but took the position that this matter and that matter were Sister White's opinion and judgment.
_	To admit that his illicit activities had been conducted for profit would have conflicted with the position that he wished to occupy in literature.
_	Throughout the history of the People's Republic of China, the position that effectively reigned as the Commander-in-Chief of the Armed Forces changed from time to time.
_	The Federal Government assumed the position that materials must be preserved so that they can be referred to, if more lawsuits are brought in the future.
_	Collins and colleagues, most notably M.R. Quillian and Elizabeth Loftus, developed the position that semantic knowledge is represented in stored category representations, linked together in a taxonomically organized processing hierarchy (see semantic networks).
_	He boosted his defence with a £1.75 million move for Queens Park Rangers and England right-back Paul Parker, with the previous season's first choice right-back Denis Irwin being switched to left-back – the position that Clayton Blackmore and Lee Martin had spent the last couple of seasons competing for.
_	One source believes Valera and Bautista Llópis were the vocalists while a second source holds to the position that Eugenio Pérez was the sole sonero.
_	In "Kalevala Questions" he instead took the position that the poems were born as complete works, and had fragmented over time.
_	Rebecca Brink argued in "The Frisky" that, as well as illustrating the nature of sexual consent, "Ceci N'est Pas Un Viol" challenges the position that art, once made public, is removed from the artist's control and is for the viewer alone to interpret.
_	Although the city subsidizes rental space for more than 75 community and activist organizations, including 14 other youth organizations and several religious groups that have restrictive membership policies, the Mayor took the position that the Boy Scouts were not in compliance with the city's anti-discrimination ordinance.
_	Both D.C. mayor Muriel Bowser and the Council of the District of Columbia took the position that the voter-approved initiative became self-enacting.
_	For instance, he opposed the death penalty, taking the position that it was cruel and didn't deter crime.
_	Easily confused with its often non-interactive sibling art form video game art, and the concept of video games as an art form (irrespective of artistic intent), the essential position that art games take in relation to video games is analogous with the position that art film takes in relation to film.
_	He was selected from 114 applicants to fill a vacancy on the Council in January 1997, was elected to the position that fall, and was reelected in 2001 and 2005.
_	Day takes the position that Australia's stringent urban planning regulations have the effect of driving home prices up artificially and pricing new and low income home buyers out of the market.
_	Thereafter, Norris took the position that communism was more dangerous than Catholicism, and some of Norris's erstwhile allies, such as Toronto evangelist T. T. Shields, criticized him for "folly."
_	She largely stayed out of municipal politics, but did criticize a suggestion from alderman Robert Noce that the city borrow from the fund created by the sale of the formerly municipally-owned Edmonton Telephones to cover operating shortfalls; Reimer took the position that city council should be less deferential towards engineers on spending decisions, and that it should consider cutting costs by reducing urban sprawl.
_	The Russians were driven from their trenches with severe losses, and the survivors fell back to the tops of the hills, the position that Zasulitch's advisors had unsuccessfully encouraged him to fall back to earlier.
_	A mixed pool of probe oligonucleotides is then brought in (eight or nine bases long), labeled (typically with fluorescent dyes) according to the position that will be sequenced.
_	Trendelenburg's position on the debate (the position that "Kant may establish that space and time are "a priori" and intuitive conditions for experience in the "Transcendental Aesthetic," but this in no way entails that space and time have nothing to do with the objects outside of possible experience") has been variously dubbed as "Neglected Alternative," "Trendelenburg's gap" ["die trendelenburgische Lücke"], "Pistorius's gap ["die pistorische Lücke"]" (named after ), or "third possibility" ["die dritte Möglichkeit"].
_	It took the position that because the Educational Testing Service voided Rose's SAT score after Rose's freshman year at Memphis, strict liability required that Rose be retroactively declared ineligible.
_	Some Protestants, however, reject the position that contraceptive use is a matter of conscience.
_	Other later accounts repeat the position that Cunard originally intended to name the ship "Queen Elizabeth" and the addition of a 2 by the Queen was a surprise to Cunard, in 1990 and 2008, although two books by William H. Miller state that Queen Elizabeth 2 was the name agreed on before the launch between Cunard officials and the Queen.
_	Some who interpret the king of Tyre in Ezekiel 28 as a symbol for Satan believe sin originated when Satan coveted the position that rightfully belongs to God.
_	Mearsheimer and Walt took the position that "What the Israel lobby wants, it too often gets."
_	Belgium and Uruguay also took the position that no element of intent was necessary for the crime of severe damage to the environment (Article 26).
_	Vermont took the position that because its petitions for admission to the Union were denied, it was not a part of the United States, not subject to Congress, and at liberty to negotiate separately with the British.
_	The Whitechapel Foundry, still in business today, takes the position that the bell was either damaged in transit or was broken by an inexperienced bell ringer, who incautiously sent the clapper flying against the rim, rather than the body of the bell.
_	Levinson advocates the position that music has the same relation to thought as does language;
_	The Andhra Pradesh High Court, in "D. Ramlinga Reddy v. State of AP", took the position that provisions of Rule 7 are mandatory and held that investigation under the SC/ST (Prevention of Atrocities)
_	The Supreme Court's broad statement of the law of patent exhaustion simply cannot be squared with the position that the "Quanta" holding is limited to its specific facts.
_	The FDA takes the position that a drug manufacturer may not promote its drug for an unapproved use, and that any such promotion is false and misleading simply "because" it is not FDA-approved.
_	Although both McLachlan and Nettwerk acknowledged that Neudorf was involved in the album's production, both took the position that his contribution had not been primarily in songwriting.
_	The Georgians argued that Armenian soldiers from the 4th Infantry Regiment had disguised themselves as bandits and were fomenting rebellion; whereas, Armenia took the position that the events were the result of Georgia's oppressive behavior towards the local ethnic-Armenian population.
_	Later in life, Parker was appointed to the position that Morgan had wanted for himself—the Commissioner of Indian Affairs.
_	Thus Appel, in his article ‘Information on Moscow’ and ‘Where is Rühle heading?’ in the KAZ, defended the position that Laufenberg and Wolffheim ought to be excluded “since we can have more confidence in the Russian communists than in the German nationalists who have left the terrain of the class struggle”.
_	This case, which also revived Thomas Jefferson's statement regarding the "wall of separation" between church and state, introduced the position that although religious exercise is generally protected under the First Amendment, this does not prevent the government from passing neutral laws that incidentally impact certain religious practices.
_	To "indemnify" means to make whole again, or to be reinstated to the position that one was in, to the extent possible, prior to the happening of a specified event or peril.
_	Furthermore, Steven Levitt, Professor of Economics at the University of Chicago and co-author of Freakoconomics took the position that, “I'm no conservative, but I loved "Left Turn".
_	The team's president, Bruce Allen, addressed a letter dated May 23, 2014, to Senator Reid repeating the position that the name was originated by Native Americans to refer to themselves, that the logo was also designed and approved by Native American leaders, and that the vast majority of both Native Americans and the public do not find the name offensive.
_	Breen told of the pressure advocates for nickel put on House Coinage Committee chairman John Adam Kasson, finally winning him over to the position that even 25% nickel coins (which would be hard on the Mint's equipment) would be better than the continued use of shinplasters, and presenting him with a draft of a bill for a three-cent piece of that alloy.
_	There is some debate on the matter, multiple courts and the U.S. Department of Justice have taken the position that the ADA requires website and app operators and owners to take affirmative steps to make their websites and apps accessible to disabled persons and compatible with common assistive technologies such as the JAWS screen reader, while other courts have taken the position that the ADA does not apply online.
_	The dismissal case went to binding arbitration where Rancourt's union took the position that the grading issue was a pretext to remove Rancourt and that the termination was done in bad faith.
_	In 1921, the French government took the position that the ILO was not competent to deal with agricultural matters and the Permanent Court of International Justice was requested to give an advisory opinion on the question.
_	New England states were unsympathetic to the war and when the government attempted to withdraw deposits from a Boston bank to make interest payments on October 1, 1814, the bank took the position that it could tender Treasury Notes to the government which were then rejected by the holders of the government bonds who expected payment in specie.
_	This never came to fruition as both Britain and the United States, in consideration of their relations with China, continued to take the position that Tibet was not a sovereign country.
_	This finally convinced supporters of the systematic languages, and IALA from that point assumed the position that a naturalistic language would be best.
_	Some, like Giovannitti, Elizabeth Gurley Flynn, and Vincent St. John, took the position that while the union did not favor violence, it would not shy away from its use if necessary to accomplish the social revolution.
_	Until the late 19th century, creation was taught in nearly all schools in the United States, often from the position that the literal interpretation of the Bible is inerrant.
_	But Schurman also took the position that "whoever by nature has a desire for arts and science is suited to arts and science: women have this desire, therefore women are suited to arts and science".
_	In the 2000s, the Vietnamese government has held the position that claims that prisoners were tortured at Hoa Lo and other sites during the war are fabricated, but that Vietnam wants to move past the issue as part of establishing better relations with the U.S. Tran Trong Duyet, a jailer at Hoa Lo beginning in 1968 and its commandant for the last three years of the war, maintained in 2008 that no prisoners were tortured.
_	Washington established, in principle, the position that the executive branch should refuse to divulge any papers or materials that the public good required them to keep secret and that at any rate they not provide any originals.
_	“I’m only in the position that I’m in now because that experience gave me a voice at a very young age.
_	If there is no prior knowledge of the position that a currently living individual, "X", has in the history of humanity, we may instead compute how many humans were born before "X", and arrive at (say) 59,854,795,447, which would roughly place "X" amongst the first 60 billion humans who have ever lived.
_	It instead takes the position that integration of existing materials separation technology into harvesters is a straightforward task, and will be accomplished by public and private agricultural engineers when the demand arrives.
_	In response, Dean Virgil Eady recommended a name change to Oxford College of Emory University and advocated the position that Oxford is part of Emory University and not a "quasi-independent college at Oxford".
_	He hold the position that faith and mind together are capable of comprehending truth.
_	However, the Supreme Court rejected this request and, in 1962, adopted the position that English case law did not have binding authority.
_	He co-authored a memorandum with Brigadier General Dwight Eisenhower in which they advanced the position that the determinations of the Joint Chiefs of Staff "must be taken as authoritative unless and until modified by the same or higher authority."
_	He takes the position that the life and thinking of Jesus must be interpreted in the light of Jesus' own convictions, which he characterizes as those of "late Jewish eschatology", and that Jesus defies any attempt at understanding him by making parallels to the ways of thinking or feeling of modern men.
_	For example, research supports the position that to be able to recognize cross-race faces one has to be attentive and effortful when encoding the face into memory.
_	They argue that the site provides a "unique and extensive diachronic record of milestones in the development of symbolic behaviour" and "evidence to support the position that elements of symbolic behaviour emerged long before the dispersal of modern humans out of Africa."
_	Mark Naumovich Lipovetsky (Mарк Наумович Липовецкий) (born June 2, 1964) is a Russian literary, film, and cultural critic who advocates the position that postmodernism is replacing socialist realism as the dominant art movement in Russia.
_	The U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS) takes the position that, for Federal income tax purposes, "qui tam" payments to a relator under FCA are ordinary income and not capital gains.
_	Journal entries from Propaganda Minister Joseph Goebbels support the position that Hitler was the driving force behind the destruction of the Jews as well; Goebbels wrote that Hitler followed the subject closely and described the Führer as "uncompromising" about eliminating the Jews.
_	Google originally took the position that it would not alter the result (or any other Google bombed results) because it wished to preserve the integrity of its search engine.
_	The object of these forgeries was to produce alleged instances from earlier times to support the whole procedure of the adherents of Symmachus, and, in particular, the position that the Roman bishop could not be judged by any court composed of other bishops."
_	Noticed by Emperor Gramis, Gabranth joined the Archadian Judges with the Emperor's backing and rose to become a Judge Magister, the position that he holds at the beginning of the game.
_	“I have never expressed the position that individuals who leave Islam or convert from Islam to another religion must be killed.
_	By the publication of the seventh German edition of "Agricultural Chemistry" he had moderated some of his views, admitting some mistakes and returning to the position that nitrogen-based fertilizers were beneficial or even necessary.
_	SNG took the position that it was entitled to a 10-month period to prepare for the race and, because it was based in the Northern Hemisphere, the races could not take place until May 2009.
_	GGYC took the position that the 10-month notice period should run from the November 2007, when the court of first instance ruled that CNEV was not a valid challenger, so the races should take place in October 2008.
_	After dark, around 22:00 hours, the Japanese began probing the defences around the position that 'C' Company had established.
_	"Mind and World" rejects, in the course of its argument, the position that McDowell takes to be the working ideology of most of his philosophical contemporaries, namely, a reductively naturalistic account that McDowell labels "bald naturalism."
_	Many developing countries take the position that the current international trade system is unfair because it has caused tariffs to be lowered in industrial goods while allowing for low tariffs and agricultural subsidies for agricultural goods.
_	The book takes the position that the towers' destruction was a controlled demolition.
_	Advocates of the position that Euclidean geometry is the one and only "true" geometry received a setback when, in a memoir published in 1868, "Fundamental theory of spaces of constant curvature", Eugenio Beltrami gave an abstract proof of equiconsistency of hyperbolic and Euclidean geometry for any dimension.
_	Bulte took the position that downloading music, films, novels and other works of art without permission robbed the creators of their right to profit from their creativity.
_	Accounts that repeat the position that "QE2" was not named after the reigning monarch have been published in 1991, 1999, 2004, 2005, and 2008.
_	Abe has advocated the position that Japan accepted the Tokyo tribunal and its judgements as a condition for ending the war, but that its verdicts have no relation to domestic law.
_	It is unreasonable and inconsistent to take the position that a party like the BNP is acceptable enough for the public to vote for, but not acceptable enough to appear on democratic platforms like "Question Time".
_	Walter Cook used the position that the player filled to determine how much they earned.
_	Initially in his book "Absolutely Free!" and later in more detail in his book "Harmony with God" Hodges took the position that the process of repentance may be a preparatory step in coming to salvation and should be evident in the life of a believer, but eternal life is received by believing in Jesus, not by turning from sin.
_	In 1984, manager Sparky Anderson searched for the right third baseman, as five different players appeared in 19 or more games at the position that season: 108 by Howard Johnson, 68 by Brookens, 33 by Marty Castillo, 20 by Bárbaro Garbey, and 19 by Darrell Evans.
_	The Earth rotates about its axis within this orbit, and the relative motion of the spacecraft and the movement of the Earth's surface determines the position that the spacecraft appears in the sky from the ground, and which parts of the Earth are visible from the spacecraft.
_	While recognizing that games may contain artistic elements in their traditional forms such as graphic art, music, and story, several notable figures have advanced the position that games are not artworks, and may never be capable of being called art.
_	The weight of available evidence does not support the position that there are any clinically relevant differences between organic and conventionally produced milk, in terms of nutrition or safety.
_	In 1997, Clayton Christensen (1997) took the position that great companies can fail precisely because they do everything right since the capabilities of the organization also define its disabilities.
_	The NFL is taking the position that players knew the risks when they made football their career and that there was "no misconduct or liability" on the league's part.
_	"Bulgarism" is a term for the position that the Volga Tatars are significantly descended from the Volga Bulgars.
_	They take issue with the position that "the direct words of God to the individual can also be imparted through the words of others, such as a preacher in a worship service or a friend who counsels them."
_	Benjamin Keen took the position that the assessment of Spanish mistreatment was largely true.
_	Langer, however, took the position that the Polish team must remain where the Polish Armed Forces were being formedon French soil.
_	Maclean's consistently took the position that Steyn's article, an excerpt from his best-selling book, "America Alone", is a worthy contribution to an important debate on geopolitical and demographic issues, and that plaintiff's demands for equal space for a rebuttal was unreasonable and untenable.
_	If a multi-position player is to be selected, coaches are encouraged to vote for the player at the position that is "most advantageous for the All-Star team", regardless of where the player is listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he is listed in box scores.
_	While Goldfeder commended the extension, he maintained the position that his work is not done until the ferry service is made permanent.
_	He resigned the position that same year to assume the duties of campaign manager for Illinois Governor Adlai E. Stevenson’s pre-convention and later presidential campaign in 1956.
_	Samuel's brother Orion Clemens (who "had moved toward the position that slavery was morally wrong") had stumped for the presidential ticket of Abraham Lincoln in northern Missouri during the election of 1860 alongside St. Louis lawyer Edward Bates (whose law offices Orion had worked in during the 1840s).
_	For example, Ibn Taymiyyah took the position that since tafsir and sira-maghazi reports were commonly transmitted by incomplete isnads, these reports should not be assessed according to the completeness of the chains but rather on the basis of recurrent transmission of common meaning between reports.
_	When he presented "A Book of Mormon Study" to church leaders, he emphasized that he was "taking the position that our faith is not only unshaken but unshakable in the Book of Mormon, and therefore we can look without fear upon all that can be said against it."
_	James Pohl, another Presiding Officer, took the position that the President didn't have the authority to order him to suspend the commissions.
_	Whereas the instrumentalist position argues that the institutions of the state are under the direct control of those members of the capitalist class in positions of state power, the structuralist perspective takes the position that the institutions of the state must function in such a way as to ensure ongoing viability of capitalism more generally.
_	In response, the Peruvians took the position that the episode was an internal police matter better handled by the Peruvian justice system and that no apology was due.
_	But the federal Department of Justice continues, publicly, to take the position that the Wire Act covers all forms of gambling.
_	However, Arlott was subjected to some strong, not entirely unexpected, criticism from the English cricket establishment over his stance particularly by the former England captain Peter May, a Test selector, who wrote directly to him condemning the position that he had adopted.
_	This was also confirmed in UN General Assembly Resolution 194 in 1948, which maintained the position that Jerusalem be made an international city, under United Nations supervision.
_	Despite this legislation, the Kahnawake First Nation in Quebec has taken the position that it is a sovereign nation, able to enact its own gambling legislation, and has licensed and hosted nearly 350 gambling websites, without ever being prosecuted.
_	However, in the aftermath the U.S. government took the position that all persons who had lost U.S. citizenship under Section 1482 should be treated as never having lost citizenship, regardless of whether they made a subsequent claim to the benefits of U.S. citizenship, were ignorant of their restored citizenship, or were even unwilling to have it restored.
_	The judge said of the report that there was a considerable degree of consensus but further MRI scans were needed to establish whether the position that GOSH had for some time been maintaining is correct.
_	The police took the position that if they had publicized the fact that a serial rapist was attacking women in the area, he would have simply committed his crimes in a different location, making his apprehension difficult.
_	The NHL had originally taken the position that neither Moyes nor Gretzky were legitimate creditors because they were owners.
_	In 1962, the state of Wisconsin took the position that the hunting and fishing rights were abrogated by the termination act and that the tribal members were subject to state hunting and fishing regulations.
_	In her 2003 book "Unpacking Queer Politics: A Lesbian Feminist Perspective", Australian radical lesbian feminist Sheila Jeffreys advances the position that lesbian culture has been negatively affected by emulating the sexist influence of the gay male subculture of dominant/submissive sexuality.
_	With the rise to power of Adolf Hitler's regime, Wise took the position that public opinion in the United States and elsewhere should be rallied against the Nazis.
_	He maintained his membership in the LDS Church throughout his life, but took the position that many religions were equally acceptable and sufficient.
_	"Monism" is the position that mind and body are not physiologically and ontologically distinct kinds of entities.
_	Nevertheless, Ridley reversed the position that the Government would not bailout investors, announcing a compensation package that would guarantee investors of less than £50,000 a 90% refund.
_	The Midshipmen's opponents were coached by former Navy player and coach, as well as future hall-of-fame inductee, Tom Hamilton, who had just taken over the position that week.
_	The refusal of prime minister Telavi to recall the Parliament of Tuvalu after the Nukufetau by-election, 2013 resulted in a constitutional crisis when he adopted the position that, under the Constitution of Tuvalu, he was only required to convene parliament once a year, and was thus under no obligation to summon it until December 2013.
_	Many defendants have taken the position that the USAO "Laffey" Matrix should be used instead of the Legal Service Index (LSI) update method presumably because the USAO "Laffey" Matrix produces lower hourly rates than the LSI-Updated "Laffey" Matrix.
_	Her former boss however prefers Audrey, a candidate who is much younger than Constance but Constance will do anything to reclaim the position that she considers to be hers.
_	Alvin Plantinga is a Christian analytic philosopher known for his free will defense with respect to the logical problem of evil, the evolutionary argument against naturalism, the position that belief in the existence of God is properly basic, and his modal version of the ontological argument for the existence of God.
_	The ECU is programmed to operate control valves that adjust the delivery of the hydraulic pressure in order to move the camshaft into the position that will provide the engine with the best performance while minding emissions standards.
_	It also confirmed the position that the New Zealand Bill of Rights (1990) took precedence over any other enactment, and that evidence obtained in breach of someone’s rights ought to be thrown out.
_	The BSA established the position that African Americans should be included, but that local communities should follow the same policies that they followed in the school systems.
_	While the profession are warring against corsets, is it not ridiculous, not to say criminal, for us to take the position that the corset is harmful and the open drawers is not?
_	In the very large Imperial German and Russian armies infantry facing colours were often allocated according to the position that a particular regiment held in the order of battle - that is within a brigade, division or corps.
_	A constitutional crisis developed when Telavi took the position that, under the Constitution of Tuvalu, he was only required to convene parliament once a year, and was thus under no obligation to summon it until December 2013.
_	Shackley concluded his statement: "I was not a participant in the Iran weapons transfer; I was not in the past, nor am I now, involved in providing aid of any kind of the contras; and I completely endorse the position that no U.S. intelligence operation that is in violation of an act of Congress should be undertaken."
_	Both Presidents Clinton and Bush sided with Morocco and maintained the position that, “Genuine autonomy under Moroccan sovereignty [is] the only feasible solution.”
_	In general, the history of the interpretation of Plato and Aristotle has largely followed the outline of those who subscribe to the position that (a) Aristotle was sympathetic to the reception of Plato's early dialogues and writings, that (b) Aristotle was sympathetic to the reception of Plato's later dialogues and writings, and (c) various combinations and variations of these two positions.
_	The declaration advances the position that the Holocaust was "unique" as compared to other genocides, a subject of some debate.
_	Some pre- and post-"Bilski" decisions of the PTO appellate board (BPAI) take the position that a programmed general-purpose digital computer is not a "particular machine," and that corresponding "Beauregard" claims to an encoded medium are equally nonstatutory.
_	He has been criticized by socially conservative Republican presidential primary opponents Rick Santorum and Michele Bachmann for not consistently supporting the position that life begins at conception.
_	The first edition of John Frederick Archbold's "Pleading and Evidence in Criminal Cases" in 1822 reiterated the position that: "A husband also cannot be guilty of a rape upon his wife".
_	The established role of DCC and netrin-1 during organization of the spinal cord could be viewed as a further challenge to the position that DCC inactivation might play a significant role in tumorigenesis.
_	Willis Van Devanter argued the case for the United States, taking the position that Congress had the power to abrogate the treaty at will.
_	Primarily a second baseman in the minors, the Dodgers used his stint with the 51s to give him some playing time at third base, figuring that was the position that he might get the best chance to advance.
_	In the abortion debate, for example, the term "freedom of choice" may be used in defense of the position that a woman has a right to determine whether she will proceed with or terminate a pregnancy.
_	The Prime Minister, Harold Macmillan, advanced the position that nuclear weapons would give Britain influence over targeting and American policy, and would affect strategy in the Middle East and Far East.
_	(The 1790 census of the United States did not reach Vermont until the following year, 1791, because the government of Vermont took the position that Vermont was not a part of the United States until its admission to the Union in 1791.)
_	Greece doesn’t formally take the position that Ericsson installed before the Olympic games a “legal interception” software, which was subsequently locked and shut down.
_	This occurred despite several previous Imperial bulls reinforcing the position that the two abbeys should be subject to a single abbot.
_	In making this concession, Parliament was taking the position that American colonists had advocated a decade earlier, most notably John Dickinson in his "Letters from a Farmer in Pennsylvania".
_	Many conceptual works take the position that art is the result of the viewer viewing an object or act as art, not of the intrinsic qualities of the work itself.
_	This position is based on the position that war could be justified on the grounds of liberating a helpless people being victimized by a tyrannical ruler.
_	The Patent Office took the position that a process for making a known product could be patented only if the product had a known utility, while Manson argued, and the Court of Customs and Patent Appeals subsequently agreed, that it was sufficient for the process to be useful in making the product regardless of whether the product itself had any particular utility.
_	This finally convinced supporters of the systematic languages, and IALA from that point assumed the position that a naturalistic language would be best.
_	A person’s anchor point is considered to be the center of his latitude of acceptance, the position that is most acceptable to him.
_	The year 1857 was marked by preparations for future Oregon statehood, including the holding of a constitutional convention, and the ruling Democratic Party found itself divided over the question of slavery, attempting to sidestep the issue by passing in state convention a resolution binding Democratic delegates to such a gathering to the position that the matter of slavery in Oregon be settled later by a vote of the people.
_	Atheism is the absence of belief that any gods exist, the position that there are no gods, or the rejection of belief in the existence of gods.
_	The Roman Catholic Encyclopedia of 1913 credited Cheverus, more than any other, for the position that Boston then held in the Roman Catholic Church of America, as well as the general growth of that church in New England.
_	Yet Schumpeter also notes that the prevailing view among the elite solidified on the position that technological unemployment would not be a long term problem.
_	During the dispute over the status of Vermont in the 1770s and 1780s, a Yorker was any inhabitant of Vermont who took the position that Vermont was by rights a part of the state of New York, against the position that Vermont was entitled to the de facto independence that it had after January 15, 1777.
_	He rejected the position that God loves or hates a soul based on its inclination toward good or evil, before the soul actually commits a good or evil act.
_	Churchill noted to the Minister of Works and Buildings that he had told King George V on taking up the position that he doubted that he would be able to live at Walmer Castle during the war, as it was within range of the German artillery along the French coast, or indeed that he would able to afford to live there afterwards, and for that reason he hoped that the state would maintain the castle and gardens, and decide what use it should be put to after the war.
_	Robert Kennedy, one of the President's brothers, took the position that the steel executives had illegally colluded to fix prices.
_	Thus the argument goes, textual proof for the position that all forms of interest are "riba" and hence prohibited by Islamic law is based on "hadith".
_	This interpretation is consistent with the position that the Second Amendment protects a modified individual right.
_	Lázaro González, backed by local Cuban Americans, took the position that the boy should remain in the United States and not be returned to his father.
_	She defends the position that there is no scientific evidence of any significant disparity in the intellectual faculties of males and females.
_	Originating in the political tradition of the International Socialist Tendency, Socialist Alternative defend the position that a socialist revolution can only come about through "workers taking control of their workplaces, dismantling existing state institutions (parliaments, courts, the armed forces and police) and replacing them with an entirely new state based on genuinely democratic control by the working class".
_	The small faction headed by Zahid Hussain took the position that criticizing so called 'Afghan saur revolution' would meant to be supporting the Mujahideen and see this as support to the Army Junta and dictatorship of General Zia-ul-Haq, playing into the hands of the USA.
_	It maintains the position that the sovereignty of the Sultanate over the territory was not abolished and that North Borneo was only leased to the North Borneo Chartered Company.
_	He remembered his earlier life in the wilderness, so he asked God with tears and supplication saying: "O God, you know how much I love solitary life and I have no aptitude for the position that I am in."
_	In 1987, Flynn took the position that the very large increase indicates that IQ tests do not measure intelligence but only a minor sort of "abstract problem-solving ability" with little practical significance.
_	However, many opponents of the PPACA have claimed that the individual mandate exceeds Congress's authority thereunder, primarily on the position that the law attempts to define the non-purchase of insurance as "commerce".
_	This is not to say that Jones took the position that blacks who believe in God should not love God.
_	The index formula_8 of a fraction formula_9 in the Farey sequence formula_10 is simply the position that formula_9 occupies in the sequence.
_	In effect, the Bush administration took the position that Iran was too dangerous to be allowed "the technology to produce nuclear material for electricity".
_	I have never questioned and I do not now question, the position that in all these matters Your Highness' decision must be final.
_	In a narrower sense, atheism is specifically the position that there are no deities.
_	In 1953 her husband was running for the position that Wauneka had been holding, but she felt he was not a good candidate, so she ran against him and defeated him.
_	Sawyer took the position that the federal government should stay out of Nevada's affairs.
_	Laxalt took the position that Nevada had to cooperate with "the Feds" in order to be in a position to regulate gambling credibly.
_	Sisana, however, refused to work for the new owner, taking up the position that he would only render services to the former owner, although he still claimed the right to remain on the land.
_	Accountability is the position that ensures a particular task is being done.
_	It was also in 1921 that the post of Principal, Pachiappa's College was offered, he was to become the first Indian Principal of that institution, the position that he successfully held till 1927.
_	HSUS took the position that animal experimentation should be regulated, and in the 1950s it placed investigators in laboratories to gather evidence of substandard conditions and animal suffering and neglect.
_	Kamen takes the position that the Inquisition in Spain was motivated more by political considerations than religious, that the monarchs routinely protected those close to the crown, and that in Aragon large areas either defied or hindered its operation.
_	Western commentators took the position that the lack of official non-Syrian Arab condemnations of Israel's action, threats of retaliation against Israel, or even professions of support for the Syrian government or people must imply that their governments tacitly supported the Israeli action.
_	He is pro-life and supports the position that abortion should be prohibited except when the mother's life is in danger.
_	It is a matter known to all persons of common intelligence in the state of Oklahoma that the Governor takes the position that legal executions are judicial murder; and that he refuses to permit them to be carried into effect, upon the ground that he would thereby become a party thereto; and that he has expressed his fixed determination to strictly adhere to this policy until the expiration of his term of office.
_	The Reagan administration took the position that the Soviets had arrested Daniloff without cause, in retaliation for the arrest three days earlier of Gennadi Zakharov, an employee of the Soviet UN Mission.
_	Such rule led some thinkers to take the position that what mattered was not the design of governmental institutions and operations, as much as the character of the rulers.
_	In the philosophical debate about thought experiments, Norton has taken the position that all thought experiments (without exception) can be reconstructed as straightforward arguments.
_	When Henry was eventually removed by death, the monk again takes the position that this was divine remedy, for Henry had tried to make Peterborough part of the Cluniac Order and had attempted to have his own nephew be the next abbot, "oc Crist it ne uuolde" ("but Christ did not will it").
_	The effect was that the test became difficult to satisfy, and the courts adopted the position that the scope of the plea was not to be further widened (e.g. "Carraher v HM Advocate") held that the plea was not available to a person suffering from psychopathic personality.
_	As a result of traveling to Iraq four times, the latest being in September 2007, Nelson took the position that a transition of the mission was necessary in Iraq as opposed to a full withdrawal of troops.
_	The grievance of general similarity of the plot characterization and incidents in the two works” also overlooked the position that there is no copyright in ideas.
_	The cattle industry takes the position that the use of growth hormones allows plentiful meats to be sold for affordable prices.
_	He appreciates Mbembe’s analyses of time and nothingness to travel from the “positive vision of African existence” with which the book begins to the position that “learning to enjoy as complete men and women…
_	Pancomputationalism is the position that everything can be said to compute.
_	The story took the position that the Patriots almost certainly cheated, and that the proof of it is that when accounting for warming during half-time prior to measurement, the ideal gas law could not explain the Patriots’ football pressure.
_	Later, Joe Nocera of the "New York Times" took the opposite position: the January 22, 2016 article, "True Scandal of Deflategate Lies in the N.F.L.’s Behavior," took the position that the analysis by Professor John Leonard, concluding that "no deflation occurred and that the Patriots are innocent.
_	With the failure of these talks, Law accepted that a compromise was unlikely, and from January 1914 he returned to the position that the Unionists were "opposed utterly to Home Rule".
_	In the published version of his dissertation, "God of Justice: A Study in the Ethical Doctrine of the Qur'an" published by E. J. Brill in 1960, Rahbar advanced the position that God's mercy is always subordinate to justice, so mercy is only available to believers.
_	The Pierce Court rejected the position that substantial justification requires more than mere reasonableness.
_	At least six states responded to the Resolutions by taking the position that the constitutionality of acts of Congress is a question for the federal courts, not the state legislatures.
_	General Butler, who was educated as an attorney, took the position that, if Virginia considered itself a foreign power to the U.S., then he was under no obligation to return the three men; he would hold them as "contraband of war."
_	In 2010, during a hearing for Florida House Bill 11 (Crimes Against Homeless Persons), which was to revise the list of offenses judged to be hate crimes in Florida by adding a person's homeless status, the League lobbied against the bill, which subsequently passed in the House by a vote of 80 to 28 and was sent to the Senate, taking the position that adding more categories to the list would dilute the effectiveness of the law, which already includes race, religion, sexual orientation, disability, and age.
_	Despite calls to recognise these championships, the Albanian Football Association maintains the position that the championships were not organised by them and cannot be formally recognised.
_	Diderot wrote to his mistress, telling of a visit by Hume to the Baron D'Holbach, and describing how a word for the position that Huxley would later describe as agnosticism didn't seem to exist, or at least wasn't common knowledge, at the time.
_	,""It appears that the Department has taken the position that these rocks belong to Japan and has so informed the Korean Ambassador in Washington.[...]it did not appear that they had ever before been claimed by Korea.
_	Elected officials, including Congressman Brad Sherman and Senator Henry Stern, took the position that no decision about whether to reactivate the facility until the health study and an ongoing search for the leak’s cause are complete.
_	Kroon, though expressing sympathy for Nozick's view that the claim that people know many facts about an independently existing world can be reconciled with the position that people do not know that certain skeptical possibilities do not obtain, questioned whether Nozick had correctly identified how to accomplish this, and suggested that a better way was available.
_	Upon reaching his majority, Matthew Brend promptly sued Sir John Bodley, in the Court of Wards in 1622 for the return of his properties, including the Globe, and although Bodley took the position that the document signed by Nicholas Brend on 10 October 1601 had been an absolute sale, the Court ruled against him, and stipulated that the properties should be returned to Matthew Brend upon payment by him of £750 to Bodley as recompense for money owed to Bodley by Nicholas Brend and for Bodley's superintendence of the properties since Nicholas Brend's death.
_	Despite the World War I-era interest in ricin, as World War II erupted, the United States Army still maintained the position that biological weapons were, for the most part, impractical.
_	St. Leger sent a detachment of light infantry from Sir John Johnson's Royal Yorkers toward the position that evening to monitor Herkimer's position, and Brant followed early the next morning with about 400 Indians and Butler's Rangers.
_	Though he argued that the One-China policy would lead to another February 28 Incident, he took the position that Taiwan was already "de facto" independent so a formal declaration of Taiwan independence was unnecessary unless the PRC attacked.
_	The capacity of the airport and its role as the main gateway to Porta del Sol has led local officials to take the position that the airport is extremely underserved in a region which accounts for one third of Puerto Rico's total population, with the mayor of Aguadilla asking for the airport to be transferred to the city on several occasions.
_	In the collection of studies that was published in 1973, she appears to have moved to the position that both sides had actually more common features than she had previously thought.
_	He takes the position that "violence done in the name of religion is not a perversion of religious belief... but flows naturally from the moral logic inherent in many religious systems, particularly monotheistic religions..."
_	This was done by the position that the sails were set at.
_	As editor of the "Volkszeitung," Shevitch took the position that the participation of the tiny Socialist Labor Party of America (SLP) in electoral politics was premature and that effort should instead be spent on the building of the trade union movement.
_	This included a disavowal by Regnerus' department chair at the University of Texas-Austin, in which Christine L. Williams cites the American Sociological Association, "which takes the position that the conclusions he draws from his study of gay parenting are fundamentally flawed on conceptual and methodological grounds and that findings from Dr. Regnerus’ work have been cited inappropriately in efforts to diminish the civil rights and legitimacy of LBGTQ partners and their families."
_	If a multi-position player was to be selected, coaches were encouraged to vote for the player at the position that was "most advantageous for the All-Star team", regardless of where the player was listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he was listed in box scores.
_	He consequently adopted the position that all surgical procedures should be used only as a last resort.
_	Modal fictionalism is a term used in philosophy, and more specifically in the metaphysics of modality, to describe the position that holds that modality can be analysed in terms of a fiction about possible worlds.
_	Conservative Jewish thinkers take the position that halakha can and should evolve to meet the changing reality of Jewish life.
_	Rhombomeres have also been shown to be able to affect the position that reticulospinal and branchiomotor neurons grow in.
_	A minority of scholars have taken the position that, in fact, Burke did write the "Vindication" in earnest, later disowning it only for political reasons.
_	The French Supreme Court has twice taken the position that perfumes lack the creativity to constitute copyrightable expressions ("Bsiri-Barbir v. Haarman & Reimer", 2006; "Beaute Prestige International v. Senteur Mazal", 2008).
_	In the process of describing this discrepancy, Bose for the first time took the position that the Maxwell–Boltzmann distribution would not be true for microscopic particles, where fluctuations due to Heisenberg's uncertainty principle will be significant.
_	The new resolution took the position that Northern Blacks sought integration and assimilation giving Blacks in the South the exclusive right to secession.
_	In the "Eli Lilly" case the Supreme Court also took the position that subsequent purchasers are not bound by any contractual limitations imposed by the patentee, unless they are brought to their attention at the time of sale: "restrictive conditions imposed by a patentee on a purchaser or licensee do not run with the goods unless they are brought to the attention of the [subsequent] purchaser at the time of their acquisition."
_	At the second hearing, on June 23, the Secretary took the position that the Nonintercourse Act did apply to the Maine (and the original states), but that it only applied to federally recognized tribes.
_	The opinion advanced the position that copyright law should serve the public interest by promoting the creation of new educational and useful works, rather than focusing on publishing rights.
_	Lucy noted that Stone took the position that "whatever is proper for a man to do is equally right for a woman provided she has the power."
_	The City of Burlington has taken the position that the city's site alteration bylaw is applicable and must be complied with.
_	He said, "I have learned that success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has had to overcome while trying to succeed."
_	AJC took the position that prejudice was indivisible, and that the rights of Jews in the United States could be best protected by arguing in favor of the equality of all Americans.
_	If a multi-position player is to be selected, coaches are encouraged to vote for the player at the position that was "most advantageous for the All-Star team", regardless of where the player was listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he was listed in box scores.
_	In 1997, a legal dispute opposing ISKCON Inc. / BBTI (Bhaktivedanta Book Trust International) to the sole trustee of Bhaktivedanta Book Trust (at this time, Hansadutta Swami), ISKCON Inc. supported the position that Bhaktivedanta Book Trust was non-existent; in 1995 it was claimed by ISKCON that Bhaktivedanta's work was done as a "Work for hire".
_	Conservative Judaism takes the position that the "Mechitza" referred to in Talmud Tractate Sukkah applied only to the festival of Sukkah in the Temple and that its use to separate men and women for synagogue worship and other occasions represents a custom rather than a requirement of core Jewish law, and is subject to contemporary Rabbinic re-examination.
_	The court also took the position that "the condom mandate ... has only a de minimis (negligible) effect on expression."
_	The DPP counsel took the position that the law does not require the DPP to make any further clarification of the Act: they argue that the Act and further information contained in the Code for Crown Prosecutors provide sufficient information.
_	Rather, the CIA took the position that trading in opium was legal in Laos until 1971.
_	This may include criticism of transitioning or sex reassignment surgery as a personal choice or medical invention, or the position that trans women are not women in a literal sense and should not be in women-only spaces.
_	He found his best form of the season playing majority in the number 10 position but was switched to fullback now and then throughout the season after he showed his versatility for the Hurricanes in the position that year.
_	Being in the position that I am, I should know better."
_	Consequently, in recent years, the General Counsel of the National Labor Relations Board has often taken the position that employee conversations about common workplace issues which make use of social media such as Facebook and Twitter are protected against retaliation.
_	The Obama administration took the position that Title IX's prohibition on discrimination on the basis of "sex" encompasses discrimination on the basis of gender identity and gender expression.
_	The Liberal-Progressive Party took the position that the meeting was conducted properly, and endorsed Casper as their candidate.
_	The IC Curriculum takes the position that because of the great language distance between Thai and English, learning core subjects at a high level should be done in the mother tongue.
_	The French government took the position that the UN inspection process should be allowed to be completed.
_	He was a major proponent of the hereditarian position in the nature and nurture debate, the position that genetics play a significant role in behavioral traits, such as intelligence and personality.
_	In 1854, after Admiral Matthew C. Perry forced the signing of the Treaty of Kanagawa, Japanese elites took the position that they needed to modernize the state's military capacities, or risk further coercion from Western powers.
_	Then second group will discuss who will be chosen for the position that one person needs to take responsibility to cross the opposite side’s chain.
_	Steen was appointed by Governor Rick Perry on November 27, 2012 after Esperanza Andrade resigned four days earlier from the position that she had held for more than four years.
_	Ruse takes the position that it is possible to reconcile the Christian faith with evolutionary theory.
_	The court also reiterated the position that the management of immigration was under the purview of the executive branch, within parameters set by legislative acts of Congress.
_	In contrast, he held the position that
_	The literary conventions mentioned by these historians have therefore led them to the position that Menander’s actual words, not just Josephus’s own ideas, are to be found in the various texts where Josephus says he is citing Menander.
_	Ninja supporters hold the position that a ninja would win over a pirate because of their superior mental and physical capabilities, as well as usage of gadgets such as nunchaku and shuriken.
_	However, following the death of Collins in an ambush on 22 August 1922, the Free State provisional government, under the new leadership of W. T. Cosgrave, Richard Mulcahy and Kevin O'Higgins, took the position that the Anti-Treaty IRA were conducting an unlawful rebellion against the legitimate Irish government and should be treated as criminals rather than as combatants.
_	In regards to their needs with the pass rush "Sports Illustrated" writer Chris Burke said that defensive end was the position that most needed to be improve for the Cowboys.
_	By backward reasoning, one can recursively evaluate a non-final position as identical to the position that is one move away and best valued for the player whose move it is.
_	At the end of the American Civil War, Booth had proved so well her fitness for the position that the Messrs.
_	In March 2012, Republican presidential candidate Rick Santorum was criticized by some Republican delegates from Puerto Rico when he publicly took the position that Puerto Rico, a Spanish-speaking territory, should be required to make English its primary language as a condition of statehood.
_	In May 2007, Sweden became the first EU country to take the position that all EU farm subsidies should be abolished, except those related to environmental protection.
_	According to the Canadian Paediatric Society, "The research that is available supports the position that spanking and other forms of physical punishment are associated with negative child outcomes.
_	Until 2010, Pakistan had always maintained the position that it would sign the NPT if India did so.
_	Greenlees made his Leicester debut against Old Blues on 20 March 1926 at Welford Road in the unusual position of scrum-half, Greenlees played 5 games in the position that season.
_	Their incomes from London crime diminished as the position that Bow Street had once held in the commitment of felons to trial continued to erode with the expansion of the patrol and the creation of new police offices from 1792.
_	The federal Cabinet and Crown counsel took the position that if the British Crown—in council, parliament, and on the bench—was to exercise its residual sovereignty over Canada, it did so at the request of the federal ministers of the Crown only.
_	Despite that, the introduction of same-sex marriage in the Netherlands has to be attributed mostly to the Gay Krant: until the mid-1990s the COC kept the position that marriage as an institution had to be rejected.
_	In agreeing to various Roman usages, Melanchthon started from the opinion that they are adiaphora if nothing is changed in the pure doctrine and the sacraments which Jesus instituted, but he disregarded the position that concessions made under such circumstances have to be regarded as a denial of Evangelical convictions.
_	They took the position that allowing gay men and women to serve in the military without restriction would have a negative impact on the ability of chaplains who think homosexuality is a sin to speak freely regarding their religious beliefs.
_	All these writings take the position that the orders conferred by sinful and excommunicated bishops are not in themselves invalid.
_	One took the position that they saw no point in living in the past even if the claims were true.
_	In the debate, which was held in the presence of many North African bishops, Maximus took the position that Jesus possessed both a human and a divine will.
_	Property is related to control and ownership; prestige is the position that gains value determined by interactions with others; power is influence, relations, and position.
_	Hollywood industry lawyers in the 1920s, 1930s, and 1940s took the position that an exclusive personal services contract should be treated as suspended during the periods when the artist was not actually working.
_	Early leaders had a commitment to the position that the Scriptures were to be the source of doctrine and life.
_	Moor rejected the "soft Zionists" who take the position that there is "nothing wrong with Israel's existence, even at the expense of another people."
_	Southern Company took the position that Fred was not permitted to testify because his knowledge was subject to attorney-client privilege.
_	The Second Council of Orange in 529 also condemned the position that "some have been truly predestined to evil by divine power".
_	GC leaders have never taken the position that ordination of women is contrary to the Bible, but they have insisted that no one ordain women until it is acceptable to all parts of the world church.
_	Which in turn, took the University fire demepatment back to the position that they could rely on civil service personnel and was considered equal to the public professional fire departments.
_	Added Joel Sherman, "Torre erred in turning down the Yankees' proposal to stay in the position that has made him rich and famous beyond what he could have dreamed a dozen years ago."
_	The State Department's Foreign Affairs Manual takes the position that this issue was settled by the "Wong Kim Ark" ruling.
_	Coming into the draft he was listed at 6'0 250 pounds and was considered too small to be a defensive end but was a good size to be a linebacker, which is the position that New England coaches moved him.
_	Consistent in tone with the rest of his works, he takes the position that whether the phenomenon in question is real is not important to a sociologist.
_	His weak arm and throwing difficulties weakened his fielding abilities at second base, as seen by the 17 errors he committed in the 54 games he played at the position that season.
_	The California Governor's Office website lists nearly 200 worldwide scientific organizations hold the position that climate change has been caused by human action.
_	Initiated by al-Ma'mun just four months before his death, the "mihnah" required officials, judges and scholars to be tested on their beliefs regarding the nature of the Qur'an; individuals who refused to adhere to the position that it had been created were subject to dismissal, arrest or torture.
_	Käsemann advanced the position that although the gospels may be interpreted for theological purposes, they still contain historical memories which can yield information about Jesus.
_	Matlock takes the position that the military build-up by Ronald Reagan in the early-1980s has contributed to the inaccurate characterization of Reagan as a war hawk.
_	(a) Hegel adopts the position that chance is not the basis of phenomena and that events are governed by laws.
_	Some have falsely attributed to Hegel the position that phenomena are governed by transcendent, supersensible ideas that ground them.
_	He assumed the position that was held by John Liu, the New York City Comptroller.
_	Schleiermacher thus takes the position that the real Socratic problem is understanding the dialectic between the figures of the "Stranger" and "Socrates".
_	Although Quesada would initially take the position that the changes to the timeline did not have to be explained since they were the result of magic, subsequent writers would, in short order, provide detailed, in-continuity explanations for the changes.
_	Stickler consistently defended the position that the Tridentine Mass was never forbidden or suppressed.
_	Others of the Port Chicago 50 had refused to ask for a pardon, reasoning that a pardon is for guilty people receiving forgiveness; they continued to hold the position that they were not guilty of mutiny.
_	"The attention became national...May (1991) with the airing of a documentary, 'Innocence Lost,' on the PBS series "Frontline", which took the position that abuse of the extent alleged by the state was impossible."
_	Soral starts from the position that women have always worked, for instance in the retail and agricultural sectors: the exception has been women at the top end of society.
_	USA FAIR took the position that if sex offender management was to be done by a private organization, ATSA would be more suitable candidate.
_	With PoA, individuals earn the right to become validators, so there is an incentive to retain the position that they have gained.
_	In the past, the Government took the position that the Prime Minister had discretion whether or not a by-election should be called to fill a casual vacancy in an SMC, and could leave a parliamentary seat unfilled until the next general election.
_	Franklin pointed to the contract all had signed, and took the position that the new requirement to raise additional capital was a violation of that contract.
_	He rejected the doctrine of free will (which was the main tenet of the Classical School) and supported the position that crime can be understood only if it is studied by scientific methods.
_	The United States' criticism flows from the fact that, even owing to the use of force against Al-Qaeda in Afghanistan, and the acceptance of the legality of such action, the ICJ still maintains the position that non-state groups cannot commit an "armed attack".
_	Boyle further stated that ""Native Hawaiians operate in accordance with the Aloha spirit, which is similar to Mahatma Gandhi's Satyagraha force, and I take the position that if Gandhi can throw the mighty British Empire out of India with Satyagraha, Native Hawaiians can throw the mighty American empire out of Hawaii with Aloha.""
_	The Kinānah tribe, during the time of Muhammad, was in charge of authorizing the intercalation; that the Kinānah tribe had taken over this task from the Kindah tribe, which had been Judaized for hundreds of years previously, lends credence to the position that the process of intercalation may have been borrowed from the Jewish tradition.
_	The Eastern Orthodox Church maintains the position that it is their communion which actually constitutes the One, Holy, Catholic, and Apostolic Church.
_	He reasoned that even those who take the position that the states have the right to regulate foreign and interstate commerce in the absence of federal regulation readily admit that when the federal government actively regulates some aspect of foreign or interstate commerce, the states are prohibited by the Supremacy Clause from enacting or enforcing any law inconsistent with the federal law.
_	Ms. Amin has taken the position that Mr. Tabandeh, the director and coordinator of the website and author of at least one of the materials which Mr. Parsi was accused of authoring, is not a real person.
_	She searches tirelessly - on the road or in the studio - for the subject, the light, or the position that delivers the right emotional experience, and then produces it with dazzling skill, through vigorous and brilliant brushwork, composition and architecture supported by strong solid drawing.
_	The four dissenting justices said that the majority had broken established precedent on the Second Amendment, and took the position that the Amendment refers to an individual right, but in the context of militia service.
_	Like all Yeshivot Hesder, Kerem B'Yavneh is a religious Zionist institution, advocating the position that the State of Israel is a concrete step forward in the coming of the final redemption.
_	Beginning in 1910, he described aspects of karma relating to health, natural phenomena and free will, taking the position that a person is not bound by his or her karma, but can transcend this through actively taking hold of one's own nature and destiny.
_	Universalism, in human geography, signals the position that ideas of development produced in Western social sciences hold for all times and places.
_	In 2002, he met with British intelligence and helped define the position that Labor would take in regards to the 2003 invasion of Iraq.
_	As a general matter, reviewers of the issues of decision uniformity and court diversity take the position that identical sets of facts in a tax case should result in identical court decisions.
_	However, after the unconditional German surrender, Britain adopted the position that the Convention no longer applied, since the two sides were no longer at war.
_	Richard Allison (1757 – March 22, 1816) was Physician General of the U.S. Army, the position that later became Surgeon General, from 1792 to 1796.
_	In "Natural Law Liberalism", Wolfe advances the position that American public policy should be based on classical natural law theory in the Thomist tradition, which he argues results in policies characteristic of political liberalism.
_	In Spinozism, the concept of a personal relationship with God comes from the position that one is a part of an infinite interdependent "organism".
_	"The Economist" took the position that regulation of factory hours was harmful to workers and also strongly opposed state support for education, health, the provision of water, and granting of patents and copyrights.
_	In media theory many writers take the position that political arrangements are determined by the mass media images that people see, and that these, by displacing other forms of culture, determine the economic and political arrangements.
_	In the US, there has been an effort for it to become the entry level degree since 1964, when the American Nurses Association (ANA) advanced the position that the minimum preparation for beginning professional nursing practice should be a baccalaureate degree education in nursing.
_	The "Oxford Literary Guide to Australia" identified Cullen as an "author of verse, short stories and serials", and as an editor of "Country Woman and Producer's Review", the position that she held until her retirement.
_	When states did make objections, not many have taken the position that the treaty is not in force between them and the reserving state, in the hope that they can influence the reserving states into eventually accepting all the provisions in the treaty.
_	(Breach invokes remedies such as an interdict to enforce the contract and damages to place the option holder in the position that he would have occupied had the option been honoured.)
_	This brings them close to the position that Crowley held just prior to 1904.
_	The CNT held a congress in Saragossa on 1 May, ratifying the position that the union should make no pacts with any political party, despite UGT leader Largo Caballero's attempts to persuade the union to stand in unity with the UGT.
_	Pakistani investigators took the position that Davis did not shoot the two men acting in self-defence and the police recommended he face a charge of double murder.
_	He said it would never be possible to satisfy all of the demands made by them because "their complaint often boils down to the position that it is always right to intervene when Muslims are victims... and always wrong when Muslims are the oppressors or terrorists.
_	The CCPOA takes the position that correctional officers perform an essential public service that puts in great danger, and strives for a safer California
_	In 1976, the newly established ANG Council advertised for a permanent director to fill the position that James Mollison had been acting in since 1971.
_	She also advances the position that the prevalence of hardcore pornography is a contributing factor in increasing "demand" for sex trafficking.
_	Stampp's study lacks the racist interpretation found in "American Negro Slavery" and approaches the issue from the position that there is no innate difference between blacks and whites.
_	While stars, therefore, do not remain forever in the position that we now see them in, they also do not follow the arms.
_	Officials took the position that Indians who refused to abide by it were hostile and planning a war.
_	She was Miss New Jersey in 1983, and served as Miss America 1984 for seven weeks after Vanessa Williams was forced to resign from the position that July.
_	Lawrence took the position that such auxiliaries and societies were without scriptural command or example, and became one of the leading voices on the east coast against them.
_	For many years, the USPTO took the position that "methods of doing business" were not patentable.
_	Consequently, they took the position that examiners would not have to determine if a claimed invention was a method of doing business or not.
_	The Selective Service System takes the position that it would be able to register and draft women with its existing infrastructure, if given the mission and additional funding.
_	The rural paramilitary leaders took the position that “violence could only be met by greater violence” in a situation that was almost comparable to a civil war.
_	In 2007, both the US Senate and House of Representatives passed simple resolutions and to Make clear that the United States Government supports the position that, as an integral part of any comprehensive peace, the issue of refugees and the mass violations of human rights of minorities in Arab and Muslim countries throughout the Middle East, North Africa, and the Persian Gulf must be resolved in a manner that includes (A) consideration of the legitimate rights of all refugees displaced from Arab and Muslim countries throughout the Middle East, North Africa, and the Persian Gulf; and (B) recognition of the losses incurred by Jews, Christians, and other minority groups as a result of the Arab-Israeli conflict.
_	Langer takes the position that the liturgy developed gradually and over many centuries and that during that period of development, when rabbinic authority differed from popular custom on questions of liturgy, the liturgy always followed popular custom.
_	More broadly, this inconsistency has been used to support the position that the theoretical distinction between social reality testing and physical reality testing is untenable.
_	In 2016, Our America Initiative funded a lawsuit filed by the Libertarian Party and the Green Party (as well as Gary Johnson and Jill Stein, the eventual presidential nominees for the respective parties) against the Commission on Presidential Debates; the lawsuit advanced the position that "the exclusion of qualified candidates from the general election presidential debates by the commission violates federal antitrust laws."
_	The political parties Svoboda, Right Sector and National Corps have the position that the population should keep and bear arms, as in Switzerland.
_	Several US multinationals, including Apple subsidiaries, had taken the position that they did not owe taxes anywhere in the world.
_	On the other, there is the position that genetic variation in the extant human population is large enough to justify its division into several subspecies.
_	Governor Cuomo took the position that municipal employees responsible for solemnizing or licensing marriages were obliged to solemnize and/or license same-sex marriage licenses as well.
_	The Nuremberg courts, however, took the position that superior orders could never constitute a justification and at most could amount to a mitigating factor.
_	Obvious and fundamental points of agreement between the two authors include the analogy drawn between beauty and virtue, the functions assigned to the moral sense, the position that the benevolent feelings form an original and irreducible part of our nature, and the unhesitating adoption of the principle that the test of virtuous action is its tendency to promote the general welfare.
_	The Clinton defense team took the position that the trial should be delayed until the president was no longer in office, because the job of the president is unique and does not allow him to take time away from it to deal with a private civil lawsuit.
_	Chief Justice Rehnquist wrote the majority opinion, noting the long tradition of attorney-client privilege and stating that, "The great body of this case law supports...the position that the privilege does survive in a case such as the present one."
_	The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) also holds the position that BPA is not a health concern.
_	On the subject of suicide, Hauerwas challenges the claim that autonomous suicide is morally acceptable, but also wants to distinguish himself from the position that denies rational suicide.
_	In 1922 Golf was appointed to a full professorship of animal husbandry (""Tierzucht"") at Leipzig University in the "Mathematics and Natural Sciences" department of the Faculty of Philosophy, taking on the position that had fallen vacant through the death, the previous summer, of .
_	Beginning in the 1970s, "liberal feminists" have argued in favor of extending conscription to women, taking the position that "the best way to insure women's equal treatment with men is to render them equally vulnerable with men to the political will of the state".
_	In high school, Clark played numerous positions for head coach Ted Ginn, Sr. at Glenville High School, but he was least interested in playing the position that Ginn felt he was most naturally suited to play (outside linebacker/rush defensive end).
_	Another former Majlis deputy has denied the existence of the position that Palizdar claimed to hold on the committee and further stated that he was not even present at the committee's meetings.
_	Backed by this linguistic research, the company holds the position that vocabulary is more fundamental to language learning than grammar.
_	Godfrey held the position that all specific forms are “in their nature indivisible, invariable, and lacking in degrees” (43) and “the specific form of a quality in itself does not undergo any intension or remission but does so insofar as it is individuated in a subject.”
_	Despite the findings in the report, NRK stated that it stood by the position that its program documented a Harrier incident.
_	Years later, the official investigation into the assassination concluded that Galman was a fall guy in a larger plot to kill Aquino; despite this conclusion, many prominent individuals continue to support the position that Galman was the perpetrator.
_	Blanshard distinguished epistemological idealism (the position that all objects of direct experience exist only in consciousness) from ontological idealism (the position that the world in itself is mental, or made of mind-stuff).
_	Singapore took the position that Pedra Branca, Middle Rocks and South Ledge should be considered a single group of maritime features as Middle Rocks and South Ledge were dependencies of Pedra Branca.
_	As a House whip, she persuaded legislators to vote against bringing the matter before a legislative constitutional convention, championing the position that human rights should not be determined by popular vote.
_	Its embrace of "stare decisis" and presumption of congressional inaction as a justification, is notably at odds with the position that Justice Felix Frankfurter took when writing for the Court in a 1940 trust-law case, "Helvering v. Hallock", where prior flawed decisions had not been corrected through legislative action, that "it would require very persuasive circumstances enveloping Congressional silence to debar this Court from re-examining its own doctrines"
_	While Simpson and the C&MA wholeheartedly embraced the Filling of the Holy Spirit and the spiritual gifts, including speaking with tongues, they rejected the position that tongues was the only initial evidence for that Baptism experience; instead, they held that the primary evidence is the Fruit of the Holy Spirit and that "fruitful ministry" is another strong proof.
_	Ibrahim also announced the appointment of Abu Zamira to the position that Shekau had held, and the end of violent tactics.
_	Based on the criteria put forward by Joseph Stalin in "Marxism and the National Question" regarding what qualities make up a nation as well as on the theories of African American Communist Harry Haywood, Ray O. Light takes the position that there is an African American oppressed nation in the Black Belt Region of the United States with the right to self-determination and independence, and a substantial Chicano national minority in the US Southwest.
_	Polshek is unusual among top-tier architects for taking the position that architecture is more craft than fine art, and that architects have some measure of social responsibility.
_	Traditionally you're either an anarchists or a Christian, but she defended the position that you can be both.
_	The Pentagon had already taken the position that having a single contractor (Pratt & Whitney) will save money.
_	The majority of critical scholars thus support the position that, while the Ritual Decalogue was replaced by the Ethical Decalogue, the Holiness Code was chosen, or designed, to replace the Covenant Code.
_	Arguments as to acceptability of suicide in moral or social terms range from the position that the act is inherently immoral and unacceptable under any circumstances to a regard for suicide as a sacrosanct right of anyone who believes they have rationally and conscientiously come to the decision to end their own lives, even if they are young and healthy.
_	The state archaeologist, Mark Dudzik, was skeptical, maintaining the position that it was "just not logical" to believe that Scandinavian explorers — who, he argued, specialized in exploiting resources along coastlines — had penetrated to Minnesota in the 1360s.
_	Kehoe soon became the main medical advocate for the position that the use of TEL in gasoline is safe and gained prominence as the industry's expert at government and public health hearings.
_	The museum takes the position that this was a result of genocide.
_	He murdered in order to get the position that he had, and then he authorized hundreds and hundreds of murders."
_	By thinking of subjectivity as fluid, she navigates between two extremes that plague contemporary attempts to theorize difference: at the one pole, the position that I can understand anyone by just taking up her perspective, which makes communication unencumbered; and at the other, the position that I can understand no one because of radical alterity that prevents me from taking up her perspective, which makes communication impossible.
_	He was the president of the Indian National Congress again in the 1892 session in Allahabad where he denounced the position that India had to prove her worthiness for political freedom.
_	In it, he argued against then-prevalent ideas about the innate inferiority of African-Americans and for the position that social disparities stemmed from the longstanding economic and cultural mistreatment of African-Americans at the hands of America's ruling classes.
_	This was also confirmed in UN General Assembly Resolution 194 in 1948, which maintained the position that Jerusalem be made an international city, under United Nations supervision.
_	He made his debut in 1948 and although he started as a forward he soon developed into a centreman, the position that he would play the majority of his career in.
_	NOFAS takes the position that no amount of alcohol is safe to consume during pregnancy and opposes the view that light drinking during pregnancy (an occasional glass of wine) is safe.
_	Mia’s father takes the position that the colonists will do best if they learn to fend for themselves and not expect aid from the Ships.
_	Heidegger by 1941 had hardened his line to the position that Schelling is still a theorist of an enclosing subjectivity, while treating the "Freiheitsschrift" as the apex ("Gipfel") of the metaphysics of German idealism.
_	W. V. O. Quine describes naturalism as the position that there is no higher tribunal for truth than natural science itself.
_	The peaks don't refer necessarily to the position that a record reached when it was first released.
_	Friedman has been criticized both by skeptics and other Roswell researchers for taking the position that there are no substantive grounds for dismissing the authenticity of some "Majestic 12" documents.
_	Turkey does not recognize Cyprus' EEZ agreements with Egypt, Lebanon, and Israel due to the position that as a "de facto" divided island Republic of Cyprus cannot represent the interests of Northern Cyprus in the case the island will be reunified with a single EEZ.
_	In 1916, the General Council (the denomination's governing body) took a strong stand against the Oneness teaching and upheld the position that speaking in tongues was the initial evidence of baptism in the Holy Spirit.
_	Mountbatten took the position that only states that shared a common border with Pakistan should choose to accede to it, but he had no power to impose this point of view on the states.
_	Professor Wayne R. LaFave has taken the position that the rule is sound because it is well-tailored to the governmental interests at stake.
_	The Independents were the party most committed to experimental predestinariaism, the position that one can have assurance of election in this life.
_	COI(ML) held the position that India was multi-national, in which some nationalities dominated the government and suppressed less advanced national groups.
_	Other important points in which Hutcheson follows the lead of Locke are his depreciation of the importance of the so-called laws of thought, his distinction between the primary and secondary qualities of bodies, the position that we cannot know the inmost essences of things (""intimae rerum naturae sive essentiae""), though they excite various ideas in us, and the assumption that external things are known only through the medium of ideas ("Syn. Metaph".
_	Then, in the next cycle, he identifies the position that, in his view, gives the maximum value to one of the two sectors so determined.
_	As literary critic Ian Watt states in "The Rise of the Novel", modern realism "begins from the position that truth can be discovered by the individual through the senses" and as such "it has its origins in Descartes and Locke, and received its first full formulation by Thomas Reid in the middle of the eighteenth century."
_	The Browns and the NFL now both support the position that the team was indeed named after Paul Brown.
_	The Wildlife Society takes the position that free-roaming horses are an invasive species: "Since native North American horses went extinct, the western United States has become more arid and many of the horses’ natural predators, such as the American lion and saber-toothed cat, have also gone extinct, notably changing the ecosystem and ecological roles horses and burros play."
_	I have long taken the position that Native Americans don't have a fair piece of the pie, and I'm going to continue to work on that."
_	Psychologism in the philosophy of mathematics is the position that mathematical concepts and/or truths are grounded in, derived from or explained by psychological facts or laws.
_	By way of comparative example, California has long held the position that clients must be encouraged to speak candidly to their legal counsel about both past and future actions knowing their statements will be held in complete confidence.
_	Moral realism is the position that ethical sentences express propositions that refer to objective features of the world.
_	This omission, together with the exclusion of the Sultan from the Holy Alliance, was interpreted by many as supportive of the position that the Eastern Question was a Russian domestic issue that did not concern any other European nations.
_	The Socialist Party holds the position that the tunnel 'is not about making the lives of ordinary people easier' but is 'about serving the needs of the big transport companies', and they contend that it will not substantially ease traffic congestion, but will divert funds from public transport as well as causing damage to the areas through which the tunnel will be built.
_	Finally in 1410, d’Angelo achieved the position of papal scribe under John XXIII, the position that he had wanted five years before.
_	In 2005, Israel called for Iran to be expelled from the UN based on the position that Iran had "persistently violated" the principles of the UN Charter by calling for Israel's destruction, thus meeting the criteria for expulsion defined in Chapter II, Article 6.
_	Governor Romney took the position that "Massachusetts should not become the Las Vegas of same-sex marriage".
_	Caldwell attacked the position that environment was the cause of racial differences and argued instead that four races, Caucasian, Mongolian, American Indian, and African, were four different species, created separately by God.
_	This evaluation notes that the position that he expressed is not sufficient to overcome the doctrinal problems that are at the basis of the rift between the Holy See and the aforesaid Society.
_	BJU has taken the position that orthodox Christians of the late 19th and early 20th centuries (including fundamentalists) agreed that while the KJV was a substantially accurate translation, only the original manuscripts of the Bible written in Hebrew and Greek were infallible and inerrant.
_	The Queensland Government, which has constitutional responsibility for land tenure, holds the position that this issue is extremely complex and that it will not be bullied by the Commonwealth.
_	"Mythopoeia" takes the position that mythology contains spiritual and foundational truths, while myth-making is a "creative act" that helps narrate and disclose those truths:
_	In 1872, the Reform party formed in Louisiana and was made up of conservative New Orleans businessmen, advocating an economical state government and recognition of black civil and political rights, and held the position that black political power was a reality and should be accepted.
_	Following the airing of the De Vries programme on Dutch television, Beth Twitty adhered to the position that the tapes represented the way events transpired and told the "New York Post" that she believed her daughter might still be alive if Van der Sloot had called for help.
_	An exclusivist approach takes the position that “my way is the only way”.
_	During the George IV's reign Ivane Mkhargrdzeli, to whom his mother Tamar honored with the position of atabag (tutor), the position that became prominent was respected even more than certain Eristavis.
_	The masque, of course, takes the position that the match will come about and be a great success — a prediction that would, over the next few years, prove totally wrong.
_	Taylor took the position that:
_	Logically, Vietnam would take the position that Bach Long Vi Island should have its full impact in any agreement on how to divide the Gulf.
_	The 1999 film "The Cosmonaut Cover-Up" takes the position that Ilyushin was the first man in space and discusses the alleged cover-up in detail.
_	Rav Ashi's son Tabyomi, always spoken of as "Mar (Master), the son of Rab Ashi," was a recognized scholar, but it was not until 455, 28 years after his father's death, that he was invested with the position that his father had so successfully filled for more than half a century.
_	Foods published the position that the levels of heavy metal content in Soylent "are in no way toxic, and Soylent remains completely safe and nutritious".
_	The Roman Catholic Church, for example, takes the position that it involves the destruction of human life.
_	Comorera's USC took the position that the Socialists should unify into one group, the Communists into another, and then the two groups should join.
_	Under intense questioning by the Court in oral argument, however, counsel for the accused infringer (who initially sought to argue that the patented antenna structure should have been held obvious over the prior art) receded to the position that in the particular circumstances of the case (the trial court had forced Blonder-Tongue to go to trial without its witnesses) the evidence from the "Winegard" case in Iowa should have been considered.
_	He resigned as an editor of the "Salt Lake Herald" in 1896, giving his reason that the position that the paper had taken on the recent "Manifesto" was apt to place him in a false light.
_	The members of the convention took the position that all class legislation is unjust and that all who are governed by laws should help make those laws.
_	It clarified that it is wrong for courts to take the position that the standard for undue is met simply because electronic evidence is involved in a particular case.
_	This evaluation notes that the position that he expressed is not sufficient to overcome the doctrinal problems that are at the basis of the rift between the Holy See and the aforesaid Society.
_	The CRA took the position that women should not be barred from educational institutions on the basis of their religious dress and actively assisted women who had been previously expelled to gain readmission to their universities.
_	Right Sector has the position that the population should keep and bear arms, as in Switzerland.
_	After wide speculation on the position that Lewis could hold, on 18 September 2015, Lewis was appointed to the Labour frontbench as a shadow minister in the Energy and Climate Change team.
_	The National Collegiate Athletic Association (NCAA), long opposed to sports betting, took the position that no post-season basketball games (which are played at neutral sites) would be held in Oregon so long as Sports Action was available; the NBA criticized Oregon even after its wagering on NBA games was discontinued.
_	O'Reilly took the position that President Bush should be allowed to sue Jadakiss for slander.
_	Bramuglia adopted the position that Soviet demands regarding use of the German mark in Berlin could be addressed, and during his brief tenure, he succeeded in having the four powers involved in the conflict (the U.S., the U.S.S.R., United Kingdom, and France) form a committee to resolve relevant points of contention.
_	Finneran stated upon taking the position that he will continue the school's tradition of academic excellence while increasing the emphasis on community and parochial service.
_	Industry Association (CCIA) an international not-for-profit organization takes the position that the Marketplace Fairness Act, "creates a new imbalance by requiring small online retailers to administer a tax collection regime for multiple jurisdictions, while brick-and-mortar stores need only collect for the jurisdiction of its physical location."
_	After the evacuation of their forces from Bornholm, the Soviets took the position that the stationing of foreign troops on Bornholm would be considered a declaration of war against the Soviet Union, and that Denmark should keep troops on it at all times to protect it from such foreign aggression.
_	The official report by the Rockefeller administration, written by the Arkansas state police, took the position that the bodies must have been from the paupers' cemetery—although the cemetery was a mile away from where the bodies were located.
_	Gamble and his wife, the former Patricia Moneyhan, decided before accepting the position that Gamble would retire in 2009 at the age of 67.
_	With regard to the conscious Ukrainians recommended while promoting the position that:
_	Many courts take the position that it is better to make an error that protects the child as opposed to leaving a child at risk.
_	It affirmed the position that while homosexual orientation is not in itself a sin, it is nevertheless a tendency towards the "moral evil" of homosexual activity, and therefore must be considered "an objective disorder".
_	Supporters of the Act take the position that the Act is not a land distribution measure, and further that the Act is more transparent than existing law and so can help stop land grabbing.
_	The court's majority opinion, authored by Justice Theodor Or, expressed the position that the law prohibited Sheinbein's extradition, and the district court's ruling implied different levels of Israeli citizenship.
_	"The Economist" took the position that regulation of factory hours was harmful to workers and also strongly opposed state support for education, health, the provision of water and granting of patents and copyrights.
_	The USCG took the position that only the captain could decide when it was safe to sail.
_	Within the IACC and other government committees, Robison is known for taking the position that people with autism should have the lead voice in defining autism research goals.
_	The "Louisville Morning Courier" on January 25, 1861, articulated the position that the secessionists faced in the legislature, "Too much time has already been wasted.
_	Later, Masazumi served at the Siege of Osaka; in 1616, he became a "toshiyori"; this was the position that would soon after be renamed as "rōjū".
_	“The state takes the position that their hands are tied, that it’s under the control of the private prison provider, and that’s just not true,” Owens said.
_	Lewis makes a case for the reality of miracles by presenting the position that something more than nature, a supernatural world, may exist, including a benevolent creator likely to intervene in reality after creation.
_	KLT makes use of spatial intensity information to direct the search for the position that yields the best match.
_	Subsequent administrations have maintained the position that Jerusalem's future not be the subject of unilateral actions that could prejudice negotiations, such as by moving the US embassy from Tel Aviv to Jerusalem.
_	Direct Marketing Association (DMA) world's largest trade association dedicated to advancing data-driven marketing takes the position that the Marketplace Fairness Act interferes with the free flow of commerce between the states.
_	These models took the position that fluctuations in aggregate economic activity are actually an "efficient response" of the economy to exogenous shocks.
_	O'Connor took the position that Herrera could not be "legally and factually innocent" because he "was tried before a jury of his peers, with the full panoply of protections that our Constitution affords criminal defendants.
_	The musicians and their union took the position that the proposed cuts were so deep and draconian as to represent an existential threat to the future of the orchestra.
_	In February 1943, Roth was head of the Gestapo office in Dortmund, the position that he held through 1944.
_	The Miaphysite controversy arose after the First Council of Constantinople in 381 and continued until the Council of Chalcedon in 451, which ruled in favour of the position that Jesus was "In two natures" due to confusing Miaphytism (combined) with Monophystism (single).
_	By the second decade of the 21st century, the overall consensus supported the position that there was only a single author who was writing either at the end of the 4th century or the beginning of the 5th century, and who was interested in blending contemporary issues (political, religious and social) into the lives of the 3rd century emperors.
_	Setting the stage, Echeverría's comments mirrored the position that the nurturing nature of women could help to solve the worlds' crises, if marginalization were eliminated.
_	President Barack Obama has taken the position that "Abortions should be legally available in accordance with "Roe v. Wade"."
_	He acknowledged, however, the absence of evidence of a physical process by which a personality could survive death and transfer to another body, and he was careful not to commit himself fully to the position that reincarnation occurs.
_	The Bush Administration took the position that: "Both the United States and Iraq are parties to the Geneva Conventions.
_	The 29 January meeting resulted to an improved and softened version of the statement, extending the ongoing sanctions but avoiding to include further measures, mainly due to the position that the Greek minister held.
_	As the day passed, with ammunition down to about one clip per man and only a few grenades left and no help in sight, McDoniel decided to abandon the position that night.
_	while also specifically taking the position that generic "he" is unacceptable.
_	The researchers found that "Nittany Lions are not more similar to each other than to individuals from the Western U.S. and Florida," which strengthens the position that all North American mountain lions are a single subspecies.
_	During the aftermath of Benedict's Regensburg lecture, he took the position that the Pope was primarily referring to Mahmoud Ahmadinejad and those who force conversions rather than to Islam as a whole.
_	Tanakh is studied in light of the position that: "A passage does not depart from its simple meaning" or the "Peshat."
_	According to Louis S. Casey, a former curator of the Smithsonian Air & Space Museum in Washington, D.C., and other researchers, due to the patent they had received the Wrights stood firmly on the position that all flying using lateral roll control, anywhere in the world, would only be conducted under license by them.
_	For a long time, he maintained the position that Islam was compatible with Western civilization and values and he tried to build and believe in a progressive, moderate and liberal Islam.
_	Unfortunately for the community, Hydro-Quebec and the sector of the government most involved in the project took the position that any social effects on the communities were not their problem, and would not impact decisions made regarding the project.
_	The king resented this infringement of his royal prerogative and, in the so-called 'questions to the judges', he received legal backing for the position that the commission was unlawful.
_	The court took the position that the wreck was outside the jurisdiction of the U.S. Marshals Office, and no determination of ownership was made.
_	The discovery of "Acristavus" is paleontologically significant because it supports the position that the ancestor of all hadrosaurids did not possess cranial ornamentation, and that ornamentation was an adaptation that later arose interdependently in the subfamilies Saurolophinae and Lambeosaurinae.
_	Scully also returned to being the national radio announcer for the World Series, since CBS Radio gave him the position that Jack Buck had vacated in order to become the primary announcer of CBS-TV coverage of Major League Baseball.
_	Becket held the position that all clergy, whether only in minor orders or not, were not to be dealt with by secular powers, and that only the ecclesiastical hierarchy could judge them for crimes, even those that were secular in nature (the benefit of clergy).
_	A common move in the endgame is to checkmate an opponent's king with gold drop when the position that the gold is dropped to is also defended by another piece.
_	Paul was a strong advocate of the position that Gentiles need not be circumcised nor observe dietary laws, a position which some took to advocate Antinomianism.
_	This claim is countered by the position that review and testing procedures can detect fraudulent code or hardware, if such things are present, and that a thorough, verifiable chain of custody would prevent the insertion of such hardware or software.
_	Some of them challenged the constitutionality of the law under which they were charged, but Day and six others took the position that their refusal was not a legal dispute but one of philosophy.
_	California has taken the position that it will only tax income from those series conducting business in California but that each such series will owe the annual franchise fee.
_	On 1 September 2005, Shunmugam Jayakumar took over the position that was renamed as Co-ordinating Minister for National Security.
_	Janko objected and took the position that the legal obligation to provide services in the German Army for the members of the German ethnic groups ("Volksdeutsche") did not exist, as this violated the Hague Regulations on war.
_	Not only does he promote the position that companies can succeed when they pay their workers more, they also have a moral obligation to do so, stating that, "…for the sake of our communities and our people, we need to give other companies the ability to create a better life for more people."
_	They hold the position that "climate science is not settled, that the world is not on the brink of a man-made global warming catastrophe".
_	The group, which was composed of businessmen, journalists, academics, and former elected officials, advanced the position that "common sense" should determine U.S. trade policy with the USSR, specifically, that the U.S. should avoid economic boycotts and sanctions against the Soviet Union as such measures rarely worked.
_	The two extreme views on terraforming are personified by Saxifrage "Sax" Russell, who believes their very presence on the planet means some level of terraforming has already begun and that it is humanity's obligation to spread life as it is the most scarce thing in the known universe, and Ann Clayborne, who stakes out the position that humankind does not have the right to change entire planets at their will.
_	The Pastafarian movement officially is supportive of gays and lesbians, holding the position that homosexuals are gay because "He (the Flying Spaghetti Monster) has touched them with his noodley appendage".
_	She picked up the support of the Republican chairman of the House Education Committee, Nancy Landry of Lafayette, who took the position that only parents should be able to use physical restraint to discipline children.
_	He took the position that music is an art, not a science, and that its source should be human and imaginative, rather than abstract and analytical.
_	The gap inside the relative clause corresponds to the position that the noun acting as the head would have normally taken, had it been in a declarative sentence.
_	Bishop Diomid also took the position that taxpayer IDs, cell phones, passports, vaccination and globalisation were tools of the antichrist, and that the leaders of the Russian Orthodox Church have "departed from the purity of the Orthodoxal dogma" in its support of the Russian government and of democracy, as well as its ecumenism with other confessions.
_	At one point during his career he had even hoped to attain the office of bishop, and apparently it was after he was passed over for the position that he broke from the Catholic Church.
_	As Kopell repeatedly stymies McCoy's prosecutorial efforts, McCoy takes the position that Kopell is not acting as an independent attorney, but as a participant in organized crime, and eventually prosecutes Kopell for conspiracy in the juror's murder.
_	Queen Victoria, who possessed them, took the position that they belonged to the British Crown.
_	South Africa was a member state of the Commonwealth of Nations at the time the agreement was signed, under the name 'Union of South Africa', so the UK and South Africa took the position that the agreement was not an international treaty requiring registration with the United Nations under of the United Nations Charter.
_	Methodological reductionism is the position that the best scientific strategy is to attempt to reduce explanations to the smallest possible entities.
_	The Oriental Orthodox churches (Coptic, Syriac, Armenian, Ethiopian, Eritrean, Malankaran) also maintain the position that their communion constitutes the One, Holy, Catholic, and Apostolic Church.
_	Paranoid cognition captures the idea that dysphoric self-consciousness may be related with the position that people occupies within a social system.
_	The question, prompted by Hume's small paragraph, has become one of the central questions of ethical theory, and Hume is usually assigned the position that such a derivation is impossible.
_	In the aftermath of the 2012 Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting, Dr. Graham appeared to endorse the position that exposure to violent video games increases the likelihood of aggression.
_	As to the power of the U.S. Senate to block treaties, Livingston took the position that Congress could get around the Senate as long as the treaty did not commit the United States for "a longer time" than the two-year duration of Congress.
_	Aristide takes the position that globalization is not a positive factor in the world, and he cites the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund as contributing to the economic downfall of Haiti.
_	American Methodism concentrates on the position that the same-sex relations are incompatible with "Christian teaching", but extends ministry to persons of a homosexual orientation, holding that all individuals are of sacred worth.
_	It is important to distinguish the versions of ethical naturalism which have received the most sustained philosophical interest, for example, Cornell realism, from the position that "the way things are is always the way they ought to be", which few ethical naturalists hold.
_	This was also confirmed in UN General Assembly Resolution 194 in 1948, which maintained the position that Jerusalem be made an international city, under United Nations supervision.
_	There is some support for the position that "prenatal sex differentiation can at least sometimes trump social influences."
_	This debate continued, with many male colleagues taking the position that women should only sculpt children's portraits or small pieces that depicted femininity, when in 1928, Fridman proposed her "Centaur" statue.
_	Specifically, where other researchers adopt the position that stereotyping is second best to other information processing techniques (e.g., individuation), social identity theorists argue that in many contexts a stereotypical perspective is entirely appropriate.
_	In 1974, Anthony Scaduto wrote "Scapegoat," which took the position that Hauptmann was framed and that the police both withheld and fabricated evidence.
_	Pentecostal churches such as the Assemblies of God, as well as Restorationist churches, like Jehovah's Witnesses and Mormons, also take the position that homosexual sexual activity is sinful.
_	Partial insanity, variations of which enjoyed a long pre-history in jurisprudence, was in contrast to the traditional notion of total insanity, exemplified in the diagnosis of mania, as a global condition affecting all aspects of understanding and which reflected the position that the mind or soul was an indivisible entity.
_	Critics of long residency hours note that resident physicians in the US have no alternatives to the position that they are matched to, meaning residents must accept all conditions of employment, including very long work hours, and that they must also, in many cases, contend with poor supervision.
_	Atchison took the position that he would rather see Nebraska "sink in hell" before he would allow it to be overrun by free soilers.
_	He achieved tactical victories on the second day of Trevilian Station and against Gregg at Samaria Church, but failed to destroy the Union cavalry or its trains. in August, he was named commander of the Cavalry Corps of the Army of Northern Virginia, filling the position that had remained open since the death of J.E.B. Stuart.
_	That condition was consistent with the position that his alleged wrongdoing warranted only civil penalties, not criminal punishment.
_	The South African Poultry Association was dissatisfied with this result, taking the position that to be effective, a general tariff would have to be imposed on all frozen chicken imports.
_	More recently, a study of tail spikes by McWhinney "et al.", which showed a high incidence of trauma-related damage, lends more weight to the position that the spikes were indeed used in combat.
_	The Kentucky and Virginia Resolutions (or Resolves) were political statements drafted in 1798 and 1799, in which the Kentucky and Virginia legislatures took the position that the federal Alien and Sedition Acts were unconstitutional.
_	In the 1970s, the white supremacist movement in the United States adopted the position that Jews are "parasites and vultures" who are attempting to enslave Aryans by dominating world banking and media.
_	The Muscovite letter held the position that previous and current separation were purely political matters.
_	The Catechism of the Catholic Church takes the position that Christians are called to express kindness to the world's creatures in general, and people possess a moral obligation to avoid causing unnecessary suffering to animals.
_	Upon reaching his majority, Matthew Brend promptly sued Sir John Bodley in the Court of Wards and Liveries in 1622 for the return of his properties, including the Globe, and although Bodley took the position that the document signed by Nicholas Brend on 10 October 1601 had been an absolute sale, the Court ruled against him, and stipulated that the properties should be returned to Matthew Brend upon payment by him of £750 to Bodley as recompense for money owed to Bodley by Nicholas Brend and for Bodley's superintendence of the properties since Nicholas Brend's death.
_	President George Washington took the position that pre-nomination advice was allowable but not mandatory.
_	The National Medical Association takes the position that ethically it is a physician's duty to provide treatment, regardless of the patient's legal situation.
_	Gunns has maintained the position that they are merely trying to prevent parties enjoined to the writ from undertaking unlawful activities that disrupt their business.
_	The Church of England has also maintained the position that it supports celibate same-sex relationships including civil partnership.
_	Mexican governments had traditionally taken the position that it was "duty-bound" to help repatriate Mexicans who lived in the annexed portions of the southwest United States.
_	South Korea held the position that the Gangneung Danoje Festival is a unique cultural tradition of Gangneung, Korea, completely different from the Chinese Dragonboat Festival, and rejected Chinese contentions for joint-registration.
_	Although the Camp was formally listed as a transit camp, after the war, at the request of its victims, in the 1990s it was re-classified as a concentration camp, with the Polish Institute of National Remembrance taking the position that conditions there didn't differ from those in regular concentration camps.
_	He took the position that American art was to be both democratic and useful.
_	Dualism is the position that mind and body are in some way separate from each other.
_	The PP took the position that these payments were in accordance with law.
_	They were led to the position that dependency is not a relation between commodity exporters and industrialised countries, but between countries with different degrees of industrialisation.
_	He said specifically, "the Second Amendment protects an individual's right to keep and bear arms," expressing the position that the second amendment expresses a right.
_	President Mugabe commented on the incident the next day, saying, "When they criticise the government when it tries to prevent violence and punish perpetrators of that violence we take the position that they can go hang."
_	Scientists of the United States National Research Council have taken the position that it should be assumed that microbial life exists in Lake Vostok and that after such a long isolation, any life forms in the lake require strict protection from contamination.
_	He served for forty years the position of councilman of the Cabildo, occupying the position that had been of Miguel Gerónimo de Esparza, the oldest regidor that had the city of Buenos Aires, who resigned his position at the age of 88.
_	In response, the Indian government took the position that it would sign standstill agreements with only those states that acceded.
_	Mailer held the position that the Cold War was not a positive ideal for America.
_	Historian Stanley Payne points out, "The majority of Republicans took the position that Catholicism was the number one enemy of individualistic middle-class radicalism and must be completely broken as a source of influence in Portugal."
_	Many conceptual works take the position that art is created by the viewer viewing an object or act as art, not from the intrinsic qualities of the work itself.
_	The Court of Appeal for Nova Scotia has taken the position that a single judge of the court may use the inherent jurisdiction of the court to manage its own procedures.
_	Heller suggested that he was supportive of Trump's proposed immigration reforms, saying "I have a tendency to support what the president’s trying to do, and that’s probably the position that’s closest to where I am."
_	Although he could defend the position that the party had never had actual plans for a coup, his reputation had taken irreparable damage, both inside and outside the party.
_	Ruppe publicly took the position that there was no need for the agency to be more independent than it already was under Action.
_	He was an adherent of the position that the state held supremacy over the Church, often called Erastianism.
_	VirtualLogix appears to take the position that an approach based on a dedicated Virtual Machine Monitor (VMM) would be even smaller and more efficient.
_	Materialistic evolution is the acceptance of biological evolution, combined with the position that if the supernatural exists, it has little to no influence on the material world (a position common to philosophical naturalists, humanists and atheists).
_	When Dethier died in 1881, painter and archaeologist Osman Hamdi Bey was appointed to the position that same year.
_	At the time, the studios had adopted the position that California law allowed them to suspend contract players for rejecting a role, and the period of suspension could be added to the contract period.
_	Irenaeus took the position that scripture, interpreted through Christian tradition, is authoritative and the Gnostic exegesis a misstatement.
_	However, it is also possible to take the position that formula_2 is defined as
_	However, "Denali" advocates, including Alaska Congressman Don Young, rejected the position that the 1980 action constituted a real compromise, and instead argued that naming the mountain and park by different names only created confusion.
_	The Council had taken the position that the ecumenical assembly of representatives of all the Church was superior to one member of the Church, even if he was Pope.
_	Tucker came to hold the position that no rights exist until they are created by contract.
_	To replace Nugent the Jets signed Jay Feely, who performed so well in the position that he became the Jets' starter while Nugent, who eventually recovered from his injury, was forced to stay on the bench.
_	The second principle—"Focus on interests, not positions"—is about the position that the parties hold and the interests that led them to that position.
_	The authors recommend that negotiators should focus on the interests behind the position that each party holds.
_	Since late 2016, Verrecchio has publicly held the position that Pope Francis has "judged himself a formal heretic" and, as a consequence, has surrendered the Petrine office and become an antipope by failing to respond to the "dubia" (questions) presented by several cardinals requesting clarification of potential heresies they believe exist in "Amoris laetitia".
_	In 1672 he took the post of professor of mathematics and astrology, the position that Diego Rodríguez had occupied thirty years before.
_	According to the "Ecclesiastical History" in "Nicene and Post-Nicene Fathers", one of Theophilus' disciples was the Gothic bishop Ulfilas, and since Ulfilas was among the Western Goths, this supports the position that Theophilus was from the area of the lower Danube, west of the Black Sea, with the bishop's seat at Tomi.
_	The Christian parties Christian Democratic Appeal (CDA), ChristianUnion (CU) and Reformed Political Party (SGP) and the liberal People's Party for Freedom and Democracy (VVD) take the position that the current royal office should be maintained in its entirety.
_	She came to occupy among evangelical Christians in Scotland the position that in former years had been held by the Countess of Leven and Viscountess Glenorchy.
_	And in 1963, Justice William J. Brennan, Jr. joined with these earlier opinions taking the position that "the Brandeis point of view" was well within the longstanding tradition of American law.
_	This evidence supports the position that Rolfe, telegeniously, but incorrectly attempted to guess at Suetonius' meaning.
_	The vote on United Nations General Assembly Resolution 68/262 (supporting the position that Crimea and Sevastopol remain part of Ukraine) was 100 to 11 in favor, with 58 states abstaining.
_	His chairmanship was short lived, however, because less than two years later he was offered the position that would define his career.
_	Carter is arguably most infamous for the Logos Foundation's political campaign in the 1989 Queensland State election where he pushed the position that adherence to fundamentalist Christian doctrine was a more important consideration than opposition to the widespread corruption in the conservative Queensland government that had been exposed by the Fitzgerald Inquiry.
_	This led to a proclamation by the Freedom Party that U.S. soldiers who executed hostages would not be treated as prisoners of war, which caused consternation among the regular Confederate armed forces, who held the position that regular foreign enemies would be treated as POWs, but blacks in rebellion had no protection under international conventions.
_	The D.C. Bill of Rights Coalition and the Montgomery County Civil Rights Coalition circulated a petition against random bag searches, taking the position that the practice violates the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution and would not improve security.
_	Bunning was also outspoken on the issue of illegal immigration, taking the position that all illegal immigrants should be deported.
_	During 22 August, the right flank was attacked and driven back from the position that the offensive had begun on 14 August.
_	This view is also called Classical Posttribulationism, an original theory of the Post-tribulation rapture view which holds the position that the church has always been in the tribulation because, during its entire existence, it has always suffered persecution and trouble.
_	While original creditors are often exempt from fair debt collection laws, courts and regulators have generally taken the position that debt buyers and any other third-party collection agency are covered by these laws.
_	They took the position that they should baptize to ensure salvation, but also continue pastoral care so that Indians would grow more knowledgeable about their new Christian faith.
_	Algeria also defended the position that the Sahrawis were a distinct people, and not under the subjection of Morocco or Mauritania.
_	The PRCA takes the position that the organization does this and even goes beyond expectation.
_	Plaintiff's attorneys often take the position that birth asphyxia is often preventable, and is often due to substandard care and human error.
_	I mean that up to that point it was only the absurdity of the position that had struck me...after that I began to get angry.
_	After having integrated the list Clean Chile, Vote Happy, one was generated fail between the charter members of ChileFirst with regard to the position that would take the party opposite to the presidential and parliamentary elections of 2009.
_	At the meetings, the board took the position that they too were heartbroken, but that they could not help any of it and that if the EU and government measures in support of banks had been put in effect a few days earlier there would still be a Fortis.
_	Alaska has taken the position that the lawsuit is moot and in any event beyond the statute of limitations.
_	Rather, he took the position that heterosexuality is another example of a societal and therefore superficial, ideological concept.
_	They recognize the position that society has placed on them because of their race, but they don't let it inhibit their growth.
_	"Voice" members hold the position that "The Chinese government was forced to mobilize the army for national security," and that "no one died in Tiananmen Square".
_	The Catholic Church takes the position that the Church itself has a proper role in guiding and informing consciences, explaining the natural law, and judging the moral integrity of the state, thereby serving as check to the power of the state.
_	Also, as is indicated above, Benson is precluded in this action from taking the position that the Sixteenth Amendment was not properly ratified."
_	Tamar honored Ivane with the position of atabag (tutor), the position that became prominent was respected even more than certain Eristavis (duke).
_	He came to the position that believer's baptism was theologically valid and should be done as a matter of obedience to the command of Jesus ().
_	At least six states responded to the Resolutions by taking the position that the constitutionality of acts of Congress is a question for the federal courts, not the state legislatures.
_	Most reviewers took the position that, even if they dislike certain elements, the series as a whole contains something that makes them want to see more; a view summed up by Chris Beveridge of Mania.com, who writes:
_	Gottfried Leibniz made a similar argument in 1714 against mechanism (the position that the mind is a machine and nothing more).
_	Many textbooks argue that radical behaviorism maintains the position that animals (including humans) are passive receivers of conditioning, failing to take into account that:
_	In "Psychologism and Behaviorism", Ned Block takes psychologism as the position that "whether behavior is intelligent behavior depends on the character of the internal information processing that produces it."
_	According to the "Times" article, "Southern Partisan" "takes the position that the Civil War was fought not over slavery, but over the preservation of a Southern way of life that to this day is worth preserving." (2/8/2000)
_	This reaffirmed the position that the logo is the property of Somerset County Council and not the county at large.
_	During this time, Green maintained the position that the U.S. continued to back ousted but democratically elected Prime Minister Chang Myon (John M. Chang).
_	Stuart's 1850 book "Conscience and the Constitution" took the position that slavery is an institution allowed by the Bible, but that, as it was actually practiced in the United States, slavery was morally wrong.
_	This begins from the position that scripture contains within it what is needed to understand it, rather than being understandable only as the product of a historically determined process.
_	In April 1913 Stover said "I do not believe in the policy that the parks are merely places people to walk through and look at the trees and gaze at the landscape from a distance, nor do I believe that any one should be permitted to destroy anything, but I take the position that certain parks of the asphalt and the lawns should be open most liberally to the young people for amusement, proper athletics, and recreation, under proper circumstances."
_	In May 2009, a number of conservative members of the Republican National Committee were pressing the committee and by extension, RNC chairman Michael Steele, to officially adopt the position that the Democratic Party is socialist.
_	As a qualification in his plea bargain, Farinacci forced the court to stipulate of him, "You, however, take the position that the United States government has no authority to criminalize your effort to resist the colonial subjugation of your country, Puerto Rico, and your right under international law to work for the freedom and self-determination of your homeland.
_	In 1998, then-Chairman of the Rules Committee Senator John Warner (R-VA) and Ranking Member Wendell Ford (D-KY) disseminated CRS products through the Committee's website, taking the position that it is appropriate "for Members and Committees to use their web sites to further disseminate CRS products," and, in fact, encouraging them to do so.
_	The Justice Department during the administration of President George W. Bush took the position that “explicit provisions of the Constitution do not permit Congress to grant congressional representation to the District through legislation.”
_	Disregarding an allegorical interpretation, critics have taken the position that the two figures of the text do represent symbolic depictions of people, institutions, and other forces.
_	In the season 7 finale "Search Committee: Part 2", Jim, Toby and Gabe interview several applicants for the position that had been held by Michael Scott (and briefly filled by Deangelo Vickers).
_	Over the years his ideas on ECT have evolved from an early suggestion that the biochemical basis of ECT is similar to that of craniocerebral trauma through to statements that organic mental syndrome is seen in all patients following ECT but is usually transient and finally to the position that ECT-induced memory loss is a hysterical symptom with parallels to the Camelford water pollution incident.
_	"In this context, we recommend a 'Yes' vote, as we believe the status quo is close to the position that we recommended to the Select Committee.
_	The Polar Bear Specialist Group of the IUCN Species Survival Commission takes the position that "estimates of subpopulation size or sustainable harvest levels should not be made solely on the basis of traditional ecological knowledge without supporting scientific studies."
_	The College adopted the position that "America is our Zion".
_	However, the position that Jesus was not a historical figure is essentially without support among biblical scholars and classical historians, most of whom regard its arguments as examples of pseudo-scholarship.
_	The Patriots took the position that those accepting appointments as Mandamus Councillors were enemies of the cause of liberty.
_	He took the position that the “papacy was a malignant tumor in the body of Italy and must 'be rooted out once and for all,’ because there was no room in Rome for both the Pope and himself”.
_	With the outbreak of World War II, Ljotić supported Yugoslavia's policy of neutrality in the conflict while promoting the position that Yugoslav diplomacy should focus on relations with Berlin.
_	The party opposed the Rajapaksa government's militarist solution to the country's civil war, holding the position that military victory in the Tamil-dominated areas will not solve the national question, with ill feeling and further violence likely as a result.
_	Under his influence, she came to adopt the position that the USSR was a state capitalist society and that the Fourth International founded by Trotsky no longer held to the revolutionary programme of Communism.
_	NP-trace is what appears in the position that the DP was in prior to DP movement, and stands for the syntactic space in the tree that the DP previously occupied.
_	In the early 20th century, the German social democratic politician Eduard Bernstein rejected the revolutionary and materialist foundations of classical and orthodox Marxism and advanced the position that socialism should be grounded in ethical and moral arguments and was to be achieved through gradual legislative reform.
_	In an even narrower sense, atheism is specifically the position that there are no deities.
_	He also took the position that the Act of Cannes was invalid under the succession rules of the house of Two Sicilies itself.
_	That people would also be obliged to intervene in nature has been used as a "reductio ad absurdum" against the position that animals have rights.
_	He also claimed that everyone in the turret was qualified for the position that they were filling.
_	They took the position that "Church of God" was the only scriptural church name.
_	Wall and Notley have taken the position that Ontario and Quebec cannot "veto" the pipeline.
_	Mandia is very active in advocacy that takes the position that climate change, specifically global warming, is a threat to contemporary human habitats.
_	There are various science historians, such as Belrose and Bradford, who have cast doubt that the Atlantic was bridged in 1901, but other science historians have taken the position that this was the first transatlantic radio transmission.
_	Christianity is somewhat related to latitudinarianism, the position that differences of opinion on church organization and doctrine are acceptable within a church.
_	Years later, Boon recalled: "I've always had the position that the rating system was a good idea and should be put in place.
_	Ibrahim further announced the ascension of Abu Zamira Mohammed to the position that Shekau had occupied.
_	He has more recently described his position as one that "can accept all that is empirically valid in evolutionary biology, while not axiomatically dismissing the position that structures as well as their "real" instantiations have an intelligent cause", and asserts that the universe emanates from Nous (mind), so that his thinking "is compatible with intelligent design broadly defined."
_	Burgon was outspoken about the Revised Version and maintained the position that the Bible is the inspired Word of God, but his views may have differed from the more recent King-James-Only Movement.
_	If Liz didn't put a perfect ball on my head, I wouldn't have been in the position that I was in."
_	In association football, or soccer, a player's height may somewhat determine the position that they play; however, people of all heights have an equal opportunity to excel professionally at the sport.
_	Her books take the position that each student is unique in the particular details of:
_	Those wishing to use its existence to support dualism have often taken the position that an epistemic gap—particularly if it is a definite limit on our cognitive abilities—necessarily entails a metaphysical gap.
_	Through his arguments with Anabaptists, Zwingli arrived at the position that baptism was a sign of the covenant between God and his people, but that it did not convey grace to the baptized.
_	Langer, however, took the position that they must remain where the Polish Army in exile was forming—on French soil.
_	The second (the "striker's end umpire") takes the position that he feels gives him the best view of the play.
_	Caldwell attacked the position that environment was the cause of racial differences and argued instead that four races, Caucasian, Mongolian, American Indian, and African, were four different species, created separately by God.
_	The NTCOF takes the position that churches are simply units of social organization, intermediate between those of the family and the larger community, that are based on deeply felt shared beliefs concerning "matters of ultimate concern."
_	But after being appointed, Behan appointed another man, Southern Democrat Harry Woods, to the position that Wyatt thought would go to him.
_	More controversially, Saari has taken the position that anomalies in the rotation speeds of galaxies, discovered by Vera Rubin, can be explained by considering more carefully the pairwise gravitational interactions of individual stars instead of approximating the gravitational effects of a galaxy on a star by treating the rest of the galaxy as a continuous mass distribution (or, as Saari calls it, "star soup").
_	Therefore, while the bishops did not agree to performing same-sex marriages, "the bishops have taken the position that it is possible to hold prayer services to bless same-sex couples."
_	By 1962, with the suspension of South Africa from FIFA (the association football governing body), Brundage had come around to the position that South Africa's racist policies were inconsistent with the ideals of the Olympic movement.
_	Chase took the position that President played no role in regard to the "proposition ... or adoption" of amendments.
_	Steve Burton is now the new sports director, while the position that Kulhawik held was eliminated.
_	Furthermore, Greece maintains the position that she has the right to demilitarize her islands in the same context as the rest of Europe, where the appliance of demilitarization statute on islands and territories ceased with the creation of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization and the Warsaw Pact; i.e. the cessation of demilitarization of Italy's Panteleria, Lampedusa, Lampione and Linosa islands, and West Germany from the NATO side, and the cessation of demilitarization of Bulgaria, Romania, East Germany, Hungary and Finland from the Warsaw Pact's side.
_	The two argue about existentialism: the position that murder can be vindicated as an expedient in overthrowing tyranny (Sartre) versus the stance that there are no ends that justify unjust means (Camus).
_	The Germans disputed the removal of the said skull from East Africa and the British government took the position that the whereabouts could not be traced.
_	Regularities in economies are explained by methodological individualism, the position that economic phenomena can be explained by aggregating over the behavior of agents.
_	Craig Evans (and separately Robert Van Voorst) state that most modern scholars accept the position that the "Testimonium" is partially authentic, had a kernel with an authentic reference to Jesus, and that the analysis of its content and style support this conclusion.
_	In answer to the position that Anthony was pro-life, Gordon wrote that "she never voiced an opinion about the sanctity of fetal life ... and she never voiced an opinion about using the power of the state to require that pregnancies be brought to term."
_	Branch took the position that at the time they had an honest belief that had they sued at the time, that they had a reasonable belief that their claim would succeed.
_	Nonsubordination theory takes the position that society, and more especially men in society, use sex differences between men and women to perpetuate this power imbalance.
_	In its opinion, the court rejected the position that Steinberg, acting as his own attorney, put forth:
_	The court responded by saying, "Congress, in enacting RFRA, took the position that 'the compelling interest test as set forth in prior Federal court rulings is a workable test for striking sensible balances between religious liberty and competing prior governmental interests'.
_	For example, the Purified Translation of the Bible, by translation and explanatory footnotes, promoting the position that Christians should not drink alcohol, that New Testament references to "wine" are translated as "grape juice".
_	When Theodosius I took the imperial throne, however, the tables were turned, and at the Council of Constantinople in 381, the position that the Father, the Son and the Holy Ghost were all the same being was agreed upon, and the formulation of the doctrine of the Trinity was complete.
_	For the first time, he took the position that the Maxwell–Boltzmann distribution would not be true for all microscopic particles at all scales.
_	He was a proponent of the position that Judaism was an entire folk culture, not merely a religion.
_	In "State v. Thonesavanh", The Minnesota Supreme Court expressly rejected the position that the rule "...allows a defendant to prevail in every instance in which a criminal statute is ambiguous."
_	Paulinus’ council spent a fair amount of time addressing the subject of the filioque, taking the position that a new council could add a valid interruption to the Creed.
_	Baader starts from the position that human reason by itself can never reach the end it aims at and maintains that we cannot throw aside the presuppositions of faith, church, and tradition.
_	Vivien Kellems was an early advocate of the position that the tax laws were ineffective.
_	The party also takes the position that the "imposition … of Federal income, payroll, and estate taxes … is an unconstitutional Federal assumption of direct taxing authority."
_	Repeating the position that occurred after 61...Ng4!
_	Anthropocentrism is the position that humans are the most important or critical element in any given situation; that the human race must always be its own primary concern.
_	Further, John took the position that because he already lived on the land, that he should have first choice of which portion he would receive in the subdivision.
_	He reaffirmed the position that as slavery was no longer recognized under British law, any foreign slave arriving in British possessions was automatically considered as free — as was also the case in those American states that did not recognize slavery.
_	It did not conduct clinical treatment but held the position that, "reparative therapy - a holistic, counseling approach to addressing unwanted same-sex attraction - can be a beneficial tool."
_	They have also taken the position that even if a woman is infected with HIV she should not abort the fetus because there are ways to prevent the transmission of the virus from the mother.
_	It is contrasted with abolitionism, the position that human beings have no moral right to use animals, and ought to have no legal right, no matter how the animals are treated.
_	In the 2000s, the Vietnamese government has held the position that claims that prisoners were tortured during the war are fabricated, but that Vietnam wants to move past the issue as part of establishing better relations with the U.S. Bùi Tín, a North Vietnamese Army colonel-later turned dissident and exile, who believed that the cause behind the war had been just but that the country's political system had lost its way after reunification, maintained in 2000 that no torture had occurred in the POW camps.
_	He remained in this role until 13 August 1914 when he was promoted to Archbishop of Gniezno-Poznań and hence primate of Poland, filling the position that had been vacant for eight years.
_	"Our client has taken the position that we want the original work preserved in its pristine form," said Lawrence S. Robbins, a lawyer representing the Council.
_	Pollard wrote that "...the position that establishment now occupies in the Australian Army and its reputation overseas is due in great measure to the foresight and determination shown by Colonel Serong."
_	Modern proponents of aerial advertising hold the position that it is a cost-effective method to reach otherwise isolated pockets of consumers (such as people stuck in rush-hour traffic, or at the beach, where advertising tends to be limited).
_	Carlson said on CNBC's "Squawk on the Street" that "We really take the position that we think about the customer and the customer first."
_	The university also took the position that Bakke had been rejected because he was unqualified.
_	One enlisted wrote in a letter home, "We have great faith in Colonel Farnham, having known him long and intimately as one deserving the confidence and esteem of his associates, and fully deserving of the position that he now occupies."
_	The term contributed to the position that was used by British politicians during negotiation of the British Mandate for Palestine following World War I.
_	He debuted at left half but was soon switched to the position that he is always remembered for at right full back.
_	During the Persian Gulf War in 1991, McEwen introduced legislation to end President Gerald Ford's ban on U.S. government employees assassinating foreign leaders (Executive Order 12333) in order to clear the way for Saddam Hussein's removal, McEwen objecting to the "cocoon of protection that is placed around him because he holds the position that he holds as leader of his country."
_	The Governor, Nathan Deal, holds the position that an amendment to the Georgia state constitution would be required, as gambling is involved.
_	Reeves holds the position that parimutuel wagering is distinguishable from casino-style gambling.
_	Pane participated with the organization, he never took the position that he needed to be respected.
_	The societal marketing concept adopts the position that marketers have a greater social responsibility than simply satisfying customers and providing them with superior value.
_	During the Nazi occupation, Dom Bruno opposed active conversion of his charges, but afterward took the position that each case should be evaluated individually with the best interest of the child being the deciding factor.
_	Historian Stanley Payne points out, "The majority of Republicans took the position that Catholicism was the number one enemy of individualist middle-class radicalism and must be completely broken as a source of influence in Portugal."
_	The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) also holds the position that BPA is not a health concern.
_	Because of his being instrumental in Shi Chonggui's becoming emperor, Jing was very powerful early in Shi Chonggui's reign as both chancellor and the commander of the imperial guards, and under his advocacy, Shi Chonggui turned away from Shi Jingtang's submissive posture toward Liao, and took a confrontational stance, taking the position that while personally, he was grandson to Emperor Taizong (because Shi Jingtang was son to Emperor Taizong), he and his state were not Liao subjects.
_	The VC/PAVN attacked the position that night in a 6 hour long assault which was met initially by US mortar and artillery fire, then helicopter gunships and then napalm strikes.
_	They immediately took the position that these flying squadrons were, in fact, coercing their employees to go out on strike.
_	Pratt invites Hopkins over for sex, but when he gets there, she has been murdered and placed on the stove in the position that she last had sex with Hopkins.
_	Note that although “percent” (%) is not formally part of the SI, both the BIPM and the ISO take the position that "“in mathematical expressions, the internationally recognized symbol % (percent) may be used with the SI to represent the number 0.01”" for dimensionless quantities.
_	Other agencies such as Scuba Diving International (SDI) and Professional Association of Diving Instructors (PADI) have taken the position that divers might find themselves alone (by choice or by accident) and have created certification courses such as the "SDI Solo Diver Course" and the "PADI Self-Reliant Diver Course" in order to train divers to handle such possibilities.
_	As part of a 2003 review of the Common Fisheries Policy, and after intense negotiations on a proposal by the then Minister for Communications, Energy and Natural Resources, the Fisheries Council accepted the position that protection of biologically sensitive areas was critical to a conservation policy.
_	In general, the Department of Justice takes the position that renunciation pursuant to a plea bargain is voluntary and demonstrates intent to give up U.S. citizenship.
_	With the failure of Asquith and Bonar Law to reach a compromise on the delayed bill, Law accepted that a compromise was unlikely, and from January 1914 onwards returned to the position that the Unionists were "opposed utterly to Home Rule".
_	I knew when I accepted the position that there would be tough times ahead.
_	Neither the data nor the intellect rise to a level that can support certainty, so the position that faith equals assurance creates tension for some.
_	Paredes took the position that the best way to preserve the country was to turn it into a monarchy with a Spanish sovereign.
_	EPA whistleblower Hugh Kaufman gave an interview to Democracy Now during the height of the Deepwater Horizon Oil Spill news coverage and explained his views on the use of Corexit, saying "EPA now is taking the position that they really don’t know how dangerous it is, even though if you read the label, it tells you how dangerous it is.
_	Barents has held the position that European Union law is autonomous from that of the member states of the Union.
_	Likewise, President George Washington took the position that pre-nomination advice was allowable but not mandatory.
_	The author assumes Smith to be the author of the Book of Mormon and takes the position that the book may be used as a "primary source document" that represents a reflection of Smith’s own life.
_	Biological naturalism is similar to identity theory (the position that mental states are "identical to" or "composed of" neurological events); however, Searle has specific technical objections to identity theory.
_	Fleischer was made Major General (generalmajor) and Commanding Officer of the Norwegian 6th Division, the position that would lead him to become the first allied general to defeat the Wehrmacht in a head-on land confrontation.
_	Holding rejects the position that "rhema" can be used as a measure of truth when considering competing biblical interpretations or competing statements from religious leaders – seeing this "rhema" doctirne as an appeal to mere feeling, sentiment, and emotion.
_	The organized bar traditionally took the position that a lawyer was not permitted to actively publicize his services.
_	When the Court asked if the government took the position that "when the sovereign people adopted the Constitution...it limited the powers of the Congress and limited the powers of the judiciary, but it did not limit the powers of the Executive", he assured Judge Pine that this was the case.
_	Dreamworkers take the position that a dream may have a variety of meanings depending on the levels (e.g. subjective, objective) that are being explored.
_	According to the historian Nicholas Tarling, the United Kingdom took the position that it was "strategically undesirable" for control of the territory to pass to Indonesia because it created a precedent for encouraging territorial changes base on political prestige and geographical proximity.
_	The CSC took the position that Islamism represents a threat to social cohesion, and analysed its impact in this context.
_	Glaucon uses this argument to challenge Socrates to defend the position that the unjust life is better than the just life.
_	In general, however, Georgia was of the position that the border with Armenia should be inline with the border of the former Russian imperial Tiflis Province; whereas, Armenia was of the position that the border should correspond to ethnic composition or more historical boundaries.
_	The Mushroom contract called for two albums and the label took the position that they were owed a second one.
_	In 2002, however, Friends of Canadian Broadcasting filed a brief with the CRTC opposing the station's license renewal — FCB took the position that in practice, the agreement was extending well beyond advertising sales and into both program production and news gathering, and thus constituted an illegal "de facto" local management agreement.
_	When Dabo Swinney took over as interim head coach midway through the 2008 season he was promoted to coach wide receivers, the position that had been held by coach Swinney.
_	Brundage took the position that as the Germans had reported nondiscrimination to the IOC, and the IOC had accepted that report, US Olympic authorities were bound by that determination.
_	The Bush administration had previously adopted the position that it would not finalize any rule subsequent to November 1, 2008.
_	After his second season playing basketball, Roberts tried out for the Michigan State baseball team, becoming a pitcher because it was the position that coach John Kobs needed most.
_	Burley also seems to have been the only 14th-century logician to have taken the position that, in line with modern views on the material conditional, the principle that "from the impossible anything follows" (""ex impossibili sequitur quidlibet"") is both a necessary and sufficient condition for explaining the logical relationship between antecedent and consequent.
_	Some of Borgmann's work has also influenced Catholic theologians, who typically interpret Borgmann's work in support of the position that technology is something to be overcome and that religion (i.e. Roman Catholicism) is to be humanity's saving grace.
_	The paper took the position that virtual items are "prizes", and that, in general "Where prizes are successfully restricted for use solely within the game, such in-game features would not be licensable gambling".
_	The City of Kalispell took the position that an art project of this type should not be funded with taxpayer dollars.
_	Prime Minister Malan took the position that colonial Africa was being directly threatened by the Soviets, or at least by Soviet-backed communist agitation, and this was only likely to increase whatever the result of another European war.
_	The legitimacy of other secession actions has been actively challenged by The Episcopal Church, which takes the position that dioceses and parishes may not leave without the Episcopal Church's governing bodies.
_	In a series of articles in "Nineteenth Century" in 1891 and 1892, Tupper denounced the position that Canada should unilaterally reduce its tariff on British goods.
_	StopBadware took the position that software is badware if it does certain prohibited things, despite any disclaimer in an EULA or purported consent by the user.
_	The Justice Department took the position that Guantanamo Bay detainees whose legal challenges have been dismissed do not need the same level of access to counsel as detainees who are still fighting in court.
_	When either abnormality is present, it changes the position that the femoral head occupies in the hip socket.
_	The Nurturing Network has publicly taken the position that, "legislative battles, rhetorical debates and judgmental protests over abortion have tended to overlook the imminent and practical needs of the women about whom people are arguing."
_	KU took the position that the NCAA had mistakenly concluded Coan was a prospective student-athlete at the time of the trip with Adams, and thus there had been no infraction of conference rules.
_	From early in the Constitutional Convention, Madison held the position that the national government should be federal, because if it was more extensive in relation to the states that would increase the, "probability of duration, happiness and good order".
_	The Alaska Native Language Center, for example, takes the position that recent improved data on Haida have served to conclusively disprove the Haida-inclusion hypothesis.
_	The vote on United Nations General Assembly Resolution 68/262 (supporting the position that Crimea and Sevastopol remain part of Ukraine) was 100 to 11 in favour, with 58 states abstaining and a further 24 of the 193 member states not voting through being absent when the vote took place.
_	Bagenstos took the position that the principle articulated in the U.S. Supreme Court decision in Olmstead v. L.C.—which he described as "that persons with disabilities have a right to spend their lives in the most integrated setting appropriate for them as individuals" -- "is just as sensibly applied to the employment setting."
_	In 1980, Workers Power abandoned the position that the Stalinist states were state capitalist, seeing this position as an error on the part of Tony Cliff who argued that the USSR was state capitalist, functioning as a giant company which competed on the world market militarily.
_	Now that the crank path is found, draw the crank slider arm in the position that places it as far away as possible from the slider.
_	This was not successful and Esnault-Pelterie was later to use its failure to support the position that the Wright Brothers claims were unfounded.
_	Later, the Crown adopted the position that it had failed to obtain title to the entire valley at the time of its purchase from the Mississaugas.
_	The commission has taken the position that the parliament should revise Article 42 of the Constitution, which prohibits the teaching of any language other than Turkish as a first language in schools.
_	King took the position that Byng's refusal was unwarranted Imperial interference in Canadian affairs.
_	Overall, Strange takes the position that the Westphalian model of state sovereignty is failing capitalism as a whole.
_	Another arrangement to avoid long-term serial temporary assignments is to "in-source" the work to be done, and not the position that does the work.
_	In 1895, he became a PPS leader and took the position that doctrinal issues were of minor importance and that socialist ideology should be merged with nationalist ideology, since that combination offered the greatest chance of restoring Polish independence.
_	Their conclusion is consistent with the position that the eighteenth century legal usage of the term "shall be considered as natural born" in the Naturalization Act of 1790 merely naturalized persons or granted them limited rights of the natural born.
_	G.L. Christian and Associates attempted to assign the entire contract to Zachry and Centex, two "highly competent construction companies with extensive experience in large scale-enterprises" but the Department of the Army took the position that a housing contract under the Capehart Act could not be assigned to another company.
_	Through the enactment of N° 26597 in April 1996, the government took the position that physical delivery of the bonds was tantamount to effective payment.
_	Henry was involved in the first dispute within the Congress, on whether each colony should have an equal vote, taking the position that there should be proportionate representation, with the larger colonies to have a greater voice.
_	Christian pacifism is the position that any form of violence is incompatible with the Christian faith.
_	Drawing on the earlier arguments of Karen Horney, Jones, in a series of articles, maintained the position that women were not disappointed creatures driven by penis envy.
_	He took the position that no presidential nomination should ever be filibustered, in light of the wording of the U.S. Constitution.
_	The issue at hand was the position that Odaenathus held as corrector totius orientis (imparting overall command of the Roman armies and authority over the Roman provincial governors in the designated region).
_	However, we do not move from the position that we are against violence and especially the gun violence seen in this portrayal of the Cathedral."
_	Not only did foreign correspondents from the West fail to report on the purges, but in many Western nations (especially France), attempts were made to silence or discredit these witnesses; according to Robert Conquest, Jean-Paul Sartre took the position that evidence of the camps should be ignored so the French proletariat would not be discouraged.
_	Parsimony is often characterized as implicitly adopting the position that evolutionary change is rare, or that homoplasy (convergence and reversal) is minimal in evolution.
_	The Institute for Creation Research lists DBTS as a "creationist college" that subscribes to the position that "God created all life forms according to the literal interpretation of the Biblical record (six-day creation, recent global flood)."
_	Corey has also been a frequent voice against American Nationalism within the Christian community, holding the position that Christians should pledge their loyalty only to God, and never to a nation state.
_	In the past, the Government of Singapore took the position that the Prime Minister had discretion whether or not a by-election should be called to fill a casual vacancy in a Single Member Constituency, and could leave a parliamentary seat unfilled until the next general election.
_	Schlafly held the position that men and women are fundamentally different, and resisted what she termed the "feminist [propagandist]" assertion that "we must redesign society to become gender neutral and that men must shed their macho image and remake themselves to become househusbands".
_	The government has taken the position that it will deal with the concrete consequences of cult affiliation, especially with respect to children.
_	Evidentialism is the position that may be characterized as "a belief is rationally justified only if there is sufficient evidence for it".
_	Schwartz takes the position that copies are an important part of our cultural inheritance and should not be immediately dismissed as inauthentic.
_	(From 1777 until early 1791, and hence during all of 1790, Vermont was a de facto independent country whose government took the position that Vermont was not then a part of the United States.)
_	The "Wall Street Journal" published an op-ed coauthored by Adams, where he advanced the position that Afghanistan did not need more American troops.
_	It is the combination of heat and holding the position that creates the style of curl.
_	The U.S. military acknowledges that it tested several chemical and biological weapons on US military personnel in the desert facility, including the East Demilitarization Area near Deseret Chemical Depot/Deseret Chemical Test Center at Fort Douglas, Utah, but takes the position that the tests have contributed to long-term illnesses in only a handful of exposed personnel.
_	Duhem in his analysis of Hennon's chapter "De Caelo et Mundo", argues that Hennon relied on the Condemnations of 1277 by Stephen Tempier to attack Aristotelian physics, and thus the position that the earth cannot move.
_	The BüSo takes the position that statement refers to the television series "Holocaust" and not to the extermination programs of the Third Reich, which were not disputed by Zepp-LaRouche today.
_	The U.S. Copyright Office has taken the position that "in order to be entitled to copyright registration, a work must be the product of human authorship.
_	This conclusion is also supported by morphological and ecological evidence, thereby strengthening the position that it is a true endemic.
_	Kuhn warned Mantle before he accepted the position that he would have to place him on the list if Mantle went to work there.
_	We all sincerely wish that we could revert time but unfortunately this is the position that we're at.
_	Free migration or open immigration is the position that people should be able to migrate to whatever country they choose.
_	After the failed nomination of Floyd H. Roberts, and the brief tenure of Professor Armistead Mason Dobie (who went on to the Court of Appeals), the position that was ultimately filled by Judge Alfred D. Barksdale, with whom Paul worked as the only two judges for the District for over 17 years.
_	Computational neuroscience is committed to the position that the brain is some sort of computer, but what does it mean to be a computer?
_	This view is related to the position that in defining agent categories, behaviours are ontologically primary to, say, appearance.
_	Nevertheless, Ridley reversed the position that the Government would not bailout investors, announcing a compensation package that would guarantee investors of less than £50,000 a 90% refund.
_	Rev. Scott: "I assumed the position that the principle of slavery—-the principle which justifies holding and treating the human species as property, is morally wrong—-or, in other words, that it is a "sin".
_	The fact that similar misrepresentations of Darwinian thinking have been used to justify and approve racist practices is beside the point: the position that the legislation is attacking and dismissing is a Straw Man.
_	The Department of Social Services, when dealing with children, has a policy of taking the wishes of the child into serious consideration, and holds the position that placing the child with parents or other relatives is preferable to a foster family.
_	Although the naturalisation of Victoria Eugénie's father in the United Kingdom had been initiated in Parliament a week prior to his marriage to Princess Beatrice, the nuptials were completed before the naturalisation, thus the Government was able to take the position that Victoria Eugénie was not bound by the Royal Marriages Act, and therefore the British king had legal authority neither to authorise nor forbid her marriage.
_	A three-judge panel heard arguments in the case on April 4, 2012, during which the DOJ for the first time took the position that it could not defend Section 3 of DOMA under any level of scrutiny.
_	Rubens then volunteered for the position that held significantly reduced responsibilities, but managed to retain her $181,000 salary.
_	In his memoirs, General Henry H. Arnold, commander of the Army Air Forces in World War II, expressed the belief that Andrews would have been given the command of the Allied invasion of Europe—the position that eventually went to General Eisenhower.
_	Three years later, he assumed the vice-presidency of the Board of Directors of the Bank, but only in 2003 assumed the position that he currently holds as Chief Executive Officer.
_	In the Historikerstreit (historians' dispute), Mommsen took the position that the Holocaust was a uniquely evil event that should not be compared to Stalinist terror in the Soviet Union.
_	David Lewis responded to Elga's paper with the position that Sleeping Beauty's credence that the coin landed heads should be 1/2.
_	In 2010 the League adopted the position that China had become imperialist.
_	The societal marketing concept adopts the position that marketers have a greater social responsibility than simply satisfying customers and providing them with superior value.
_	He consequently adopted the position that all surgical procedures should be used only as a last resort.
_	If a multi-position player was to be selected, coaches were encouraged to vote for the player at the position that was "most advantageous for the All-Star team," regardless of where the player was listed on the All-Star ballot or the position he was listed in box scores.
_	Each intermediate value of "n" corresponds to the proportion of the slinky's mass above that point "n", and "p"("n") gives the position that "n" is above the bottom of the slinky.
_	Quimper was still in Lima when the Viceroy was replaced by Joaquin de la Pezuela, who confirmed his appointment as governor of Huamanga and Quimper traveled there to assume the position that he held for three years before returning to Spain in retirement.
_	The U.S. Department of Defense took the position that they would not consider "enemy combatants" held in extrajudicial detention in the Guantanamo Bay detainment camps minors unless they were less than sixteen years old.
_	The Catholic Counter-Reformation group, founded by theologian , takes the position that the released text is the complete Third Secret, but refers to Pope John Paul I rather than John Paul II, pointing out that the latter, after all, did not die when he was attacked, while the bishop in the Third Secret did.
_	After Rule 10b5-1 was enacted, the SEC staff publicly took the position that canceling a planned trade made under the safe harbor does not constitute insider trading, even if the person was aware of the inside information when canceling the trade.
_	In his 2002 campaign for re-election to the post of Secretary of State, Blackwell took the position that he would favor abortions in the case where the life of the mother was at stake.
_	Others have taken the position that the federal government is not a compact among the states, but instead was formed directly by the people, in their exercise of their sovereign power.
_	In a narrower sense, atheism is specifically the position that there are no deities.
_	In lieu of the lithotomy position, the Cochrane Review recommended birthing mothers make informed choices about birthing positions and find the position that is most comfortable for them.
_	Garlow has taken the position that working with Mormon leaders and church activities is appropriate and Christian.
_	Delesalle took the position that the union was a basic part of the worker's life, unlike a political party which people could join or leave at any time as their opinions changed.
_	Joubert did not plan on fighting at Novi Ligure, but the position that his troops held was well-suited for a defensive battle.
